CHAPTER I.
The Yankee predeliction for wandering. Some account of Paul's
percentage. A few passages touching `gentility.' Paul and
his brother
.
New England is the great population nursery of the American
continent
.
The young shoots which it produces annually, are reared with
an eye to transplanting, rather than for domestic growth. Of every
seven juvenile plants five are sent off to be planted in the South and
Westto thrive in Oregon or bear fruit in California. For a family
of children born in the land of Pilgrims to remain there as men and
women within sight of the smoke of the paternal home, is an event
scarcely known. `Where shall I emigratewhere shall I make my
fortune?' is the first enquiry of the Yankee boy as he begins to
discover
a beard upon his lip.
Such was the question our hero, Paul Perril, addressed to himself
one sunshiny morning when he had scarcely reached his seventeenth
year. This was, it is true, rather an advanced age for a spirited New
England youth to put this inquiry for the first time, inasmuch as they
are expected to begin to earn their living by the time they enter their
`teens.' Indeed, two-thirds of the boys do earn their bread and butter
at this early age. Cast an eye through the length and breadth of the
land of `steady habits,' and for every man in business, you will find a
smart little fellow in his employ, smart, shrewd, and with all his
eyeteeth
cut. Boys in Yankeedom are men before they have yet gone
through the period of youth. They leap from their mother's lap right
into the bustle and activity of money-getting. They cast aside their
tops and balls to grasp the sterner tools of the laborer, mechanic and
farmer. Yankee boys are easily weaned from home. It is well it is
so, or there would be much unhappiness undergone, and many, many
bitter tears shed by the courageous little exiles from the domestic
hearth.
Paul Perril was a Yankee boy throughout. He was frank and
fearless
in his bearing, quick-witted, shrewd and intelligent. He possessed,
moreover, a very generous nature, was kind and benevolent, a little
roguish withal, and had a heart large enough to embrace the whole
world within the pinions of his kindly feelings. His birth place was
in the valley of the Kennebec, one of the most beautiful regions of
New England. The town was a thriving business place, situated upon
the river bank, and contained, besides a long street filled with stores,
several back streets lined with genteel dwelling-houses, shaded by
trees, and mostly having before them neat flower-beds, besides spacious
vegetable gardens extending far in the rear. The society was highly
respectable, that is, it consisted of thirty-one or more families who
lived `genteely.' By this vague term we mean, that they were the
families of merchants, lawyers, doctors and clergymen, and two or
three retired wealthy men; that they had green blinds to their houses;
that the houses were two stories in height; (for respectability never
occupies small abodes!) that they contained a handsome front parlor,
never used but two or three times in a year, and which `the children'
were never allowed to enter; that the parlor held a piano-forte; that
the daughters went to the boarding-school, and the boys to the
academy
;
and lastly, that they, the said genteel families, visited each other
and no body else; for those whom they did not visit were `
nobody-elses
.'
One of the families of this exclusive caste of gentility had the good
fortune to produce our hero. Peter Perril was a merchant, and by
virtue of his pursuit belonged to the upper `thirty-one.' If perchance
he had been a cabinet-maker he would not have belonged to this upper
crust, but would have taken his place with the under crust, albeit he
might have been in heart and head, hands and feet, the very identical
Peter Peril, Merchant. There is, evidently, some profound and
mysterious
principle of gentility which, with all our observation, we have
not yet been able to fathom, in buying a glass of rum and selling it
again by the `gill' across the counter to red-eyed topers. For our
part, though we may be singular in our notions, we think there is
something much more genteel and elevating to manhood in taking a
rough board and skillfully shaping it by sawing and planing and
glueing
and polishing it into an elegant book case, or a serviceable table.
We confess we would rather the hand that held the saw were ours than
the hand that extended the gill of rum!
Mr. Perril's store was like all country stores. We would call them
`shops,' but this word has been dropped by country merchants and
bestowed upon the places where mechanics labor. Both are mere
words. We don't quarrel with them. Whether called shop or store
the thing is the same. The shop of the shoe-maker is a more
respectable
place than the `store' of the ramseller. But we are speaking of
by-gone daysdays when all store-keepers sold ram and thought no
evil of it, at least the world had not then began to lift up its voice
against the traffic. Now no `merchant' retails rum. No
respectable
`store-keeper' dare sell the fiery glass to the grovelling wretch
who dares to ask for it. Now the finger of scorn and displeasure
would be pointed at him. He, therefore, unless lost to all
considerations
of respectability, all regard for public opinion, banishes it from
his `store' and by so much has taken from this word its odium. But
twenty years ago, the time when we take up our story, all `merchants'
in country towns were cup-bearers to the town topers.
Peter Perril kept a store for the retailing of every thing under
heaven
,
from a paper of pins to a puncheon of brandy. He sold dun fish,
he sold herring, and molasses, flour and fans, fish-hooks and shingles,
brooms and ginger bread, corn and candy, nuts and raisins, tobacco
and cigars, domestic sheeting, calicos, tea, coffee, butter, lard, indigo,
mats and hats, boots and mittens, scythes and apple-sauce, oats and
pepper sauce, besides rum, gin, sherry, sherbet, and every other sort of
liquor for making men beasts.
Mr. Perril kept out of his store no article that would turn him an
honest profit. He consulted the wants of the miscellaneous
community
and judiciously supplied them. His gains were small in detail but
large in the aggregate. He was a thriving man. He owned his store
and enlarged it yearly by additions, now to the side, now to the end,
new an additional story. He built a house and furnished it, and held
up his head with the best. He always went to meeting where he owned
a pew. He never kept open later than five minutes to twelve of
Saturday
nights, for he had a discreet respect for the Sabbath. His wife
was a notable woman, skillful in household matters, and knew how to
bring up a family of children, of which she had no less than nine. It
was her aim to bring them up `respectably,' that is, to move in
genteel
society. She wished her sons to go to college, or be merchants,
and her daughters to marry `among the first in the land.'
But although Peter made money, he had many bad debts; and a
family of nine children, seven of them boys, is not brought up and fed
and clothed and schooled by miracles. It was an expensive family,
and became more so every year. The eldest son was sent to college,
and there had to be maintained `genteely;' for Mrs. Perril was quite
above suffering her Henry to keep a school to help out his expenses.
Clarissa Ann had to go to Bradford Academy to learn piano-playing
and other accomplishments. The next boy had to be fitted for
College
at the Academy, and the rest had to go to costly schools, to keep
up the respectability of the Perrils.
Now, what with these nine burdens upon his back, Peter, at each
year's end, found that, although he was making money, he was not
growing rich. He had four sons large enough to make their way in
the world, and two daughters that might have maintained themselves
by teaching or some other genteel pursuit, such as milinery or
dressmaking
.
Yet these seven were all on his hands. To support them
took all his `profits.' He at length began to lose money in some
operations
,
and then he opened his eyes and saw that it was time they
should help him in the matter of their own maintenance. He
therefore
boldly told his wife that the three boys who were at the Academy
should go to trades at once. This idea filled the mind of Mrs. Perril
with horror. The bare thought of one of her children becoming a
mechanic was enough to throw her into a paroxysm of hysteria. She
remonstrated. Peter was firm. She plead for the `respectability' of
the family. `What will people say?' was repeated by her not less
than a hundred times. Peter said he cared not what people said; he
was not able to maintain them, as they ate up and wore out all his
`profits.'
`Henry may go through College,' he added, `and Sam may enter if
he will help himself by keeping school. The rest of the boys shall go
into stores or be bound out to trades!'
`You once would not look at a trade for your son, Mr. Perril.'
`I was once a fool. I have grown wise. I was educated, as we have
been educating our boys, in the notion that all mechanical occupations
were low. I have learned better. I have found as good men who are
mechanics as those who are store-keepers; yes, I may say better. I
believe that the mechanics, as a class, are the most honest and upright
Their pursuits are far more honorable than mine, be assured.'
`How can you talk so?'
`Because I feel so. In a word, I have resolved to make my boys
useful, and my girls too. Clarissa shall come home and learn
housekeeping
under your eye. It will save the girl, and make her fitter for a
good man's wife. Now, not another word. I am toiling day by day,
only to spend. I want to get rich. I want to lay up something for
our old age. I dare not trust to my childrent to help me then.
Children
are apt to forget the old people, or begrudgingly help them. No
no, Mrs. Perril; it is time we should take care of ourselves. I shall
save full four thousand dollars in the next five years by putting out my
boys to trades.'
`Don't put them to trades, then, but get them places, dear, in some
genteel counting-room in Boston. I don't see why they should go to
low trades.'
`Low! Go down into the street and step into Mr. Dunning's
cabinet
shop, or Mr. Doler's jeweller's shop, and then go into my store
and see me up to my elbows in rum and flour, molasses and corn, and
say which is the neatest, cleanliest, most genteel employment. But
have your own way. I would make them useful and happy, therefore
I would make mechanics of them. The merchant is daily harrowed
by doubts, fears, perplexities, losses, disappointments, and a thousand
other things that the mechanic knows nothing of. I will leave the
matter to the boys. Let them choose.'
`I know none of them will consent to go to trades.'
`We will see. On Sunday after church, as they will all be at home,
I will have the matter brought up.'
On Sunday, at the time appointed, Mr. Perril called his sons about
him and made a speech in the spirit of the conversation just detailed.
He then asked them what they would choose? Three replied that
they wished to go into stores in Boston. The fourth, who was our
hero, said he much preferred to go to a trade. This preference,
however
,
had to yield to the will of the majority; for one and all said that
it would be a disgrace to them as clerks in Boston to have it known
they had a brother who was a mechanic's apprentice. Paul smiled,
but made no remark. Mr. Perril frankly pronounced him the most
sensible boy of the three, and gave him permission to remain another
quarter at the Gardner Lyceum, where he was then at school.
During the week his brothers embarked for Boston in a Kennebec
coaster, under charge of their father, who was going up to buy goods.
He got one of them a chance in a retail silk store, another he obtained
a situation for in a thread and needle store in Hanover street, and a
third he was so fortunate as to find an opening for in a `genteel'
dry-goods
store in Washington street.
In the meanwhile, Paul availed himself of his father's permission to
remain longer at the Lyceum, where he diligently applied himself to
his studies, and availed himself of all the privileges which that
excellent
seminary affords the youth who seeks a good, practical
education
.
It was on a cheerful sunny morning, the last day of his quarter, as
he was standing near the Lyceum, waiting for his tutor to arrive, that
he put to himself the inquiry in the first part of this chapter, viz:
`Where shall I emigrate? Where shall I go to make my fortune?
And what trade or pursuit shall I engage in? This,' he added, `is my
last day at school. I am now seventeen. The world is all before me
where to choose. I would rather be a mechanic than a store-keeper,
but rather than either I would prefer being a seaman that I might travel
to far countries and see the wonders of the world!'
While he was thus meditating, the chapel bell called him into his
recitation
room, whither we will follow him in the next chapter, and see
what there transpired to shape his subsequent destiny.
CHAPTER II.
Paul's thirst for adventure awakened
.
After Paul and his classmates were seated in the recitation hall, the
tutor rose and remarked that he, that morning, had received a letter
from a gentleman in Boston, which he was requested, by the writer, to
read to the students. He then laid open to them the following
epistle
;
Boston
,
Oct. 3d, 1827.
`SirI am about going to South America for the purpose of
establishing
a mercantile firm. I wish to take out with me three or
four young men, from seventeen to nineteen years of age, as clerks.
I am willing to pay their passage out from Boston, and to allow
them a fair compensation for their services after we shall reach our
destination.
`If, sir, you chance to have in your institution any youths who would
like to embrace this opportunity for entering life and seeing something
of the world, you will confer on me a favor by communicating to them
my letter. If any are desirous of accompanying me, be so kind as to
say to them that the ship will sail on the fifteenth of the present month,
and that I would like to have them here by the 13th, that they may
make their preparations for the voyage.
`I refer you, sir, and the friends of such youths as may wish to go
with me, to Colonel , of Boston, S C, Esq., of Salem,
and P T, of Marblehead. You will oblige me by an early
reply. I have made this application to your institution, as I am anxious
to have young men of character and talent.
`I am, sir, your ob't serv't,
`JONATHAN BEDRICK.'
'To Prof. Benjamin Haley.
`Now, my young friends,' said the tutor, `here is an opportunity
for some of you who are now just about to leave the institution. It
seems to me a very desirable one. Mr. Bedrick I know by reputation.
I believe he is a highly respectable man; and the gentlemen to whom
he refers are individuals of the highest character. I think you would
be safe in embracing the proposition conveyed in the letter. If any of
you are inclined to accept of it, you will oblige me by giving me your
names by to-morrow, as I wish to reply then to Mr. Bedrick's
letter
!'
Before the letter had been half read through by the tutor, Paul had
made up his mind to join the merchant on his expedition. The idea
of visiting at once a foreign land, awakened all his aspirations after
sight-seeing and adventure; for Paul had not a little of the romantic
and adventurous in his temperament. Mr. Haley, therefore, had no
sooner done speaking than our hero rose in his seat and said, that he,
for one, would consent to go. `I will see my father to-night,' he added,
`and I have no doubt that I shall be able to gain his consent.'
Three other youths, inspired by his example, and fired with the
same ambition for `foreign travel,' instantly made known their wish to
accept the proposal in the letter.
Their names were then taken down by the tutor, beginning with
Paul's; and were as followsFerdinand Radworth, Henricus Hewitt,
and George Fairfax. Thus was this important business settled without
trouble or delay; and the same night the tutor despatched his reply
to Mr. Jonathan Bedrick at Boston.
Paul lived but a short ride, in a neighboring town, from the
Institution
;
and the same evening made known to his father what he had
done, and then asked his consent. Mr. Perril was by no means
ungratified
that his son had thus promptly taken himself off his hands, and
was not backward in expressing his pleasure that he had, at length,
resolved
`to make his way in the world!'
`And in a respectable profession, too! That is every thing!' added
the maternal parent. `I knew, Paul, you had too much pride ever to
consent to become a mechanic. You will go to South America, and
I dare say, discover a gold, or at the very least a silver mine, and come
home rich as Crsus, or the Wandering Jew. I shouldn't wonder
if one day, you was able to buy the large house on the hill and ride in
your own carriage. I only want to see the day when I have a son that
can look down on these proud Errickson's and Fawner's! Well, I'll
go to work and get your shirts and clothes ready and every thing nice
for you to start.'
The rumor that our hero was about to go to South America, soon
reached his brothers in Boston, and not a little roused their envy; for
to their minds a clerkship in a foreign country was a princely situation
compared with one in Washington or Hanover street in Boston.
`Distance,' in this as in most other cases, `lends enchantment to the
view,'
At length the day came for our hero to quit his paternal roof and
take his first step in the great world of action. He took a tearful
farewell
of his mother, and a firm one of his father; saw his trunk safely
strapped behind, and then sprang into the waiting coach. The next
moment it was whirling with rattling axles through the village street
on the way to Boston.
The third morning our hero arrived there, and was set down at the
Commercial Coffee House, then kept by Mr. Merriam, on the corner
of Milk and Kilby streets. It was were his father used to put up when
he came to the city to buy goods, and he had told Paul to stop there,
especially as he expected to be in town and to stop there before Paul's
vessel sailed.
Our hero, after being shown to a room in the third story began, for
the first time to feel himself fairly launched upon life. From this
moment
commences his Journal of rather History of his adventures, from
which the remainder of the narrative will be given. We have done
our part in introducing him to the reader. We now let him speak for
himself.
PAUL PERRIL'S ADVENTURES.
FROM HIS OWN PEN.
After I reached Boston, and found myself alone in my room at the
hotel, and had began to realize that I was fairly adrift on the world, I
resolved that I would keep a journal of every thing that happened to
me or in any way concerned me. I immediately commenced it, and I
kept it partiy from memory, but chiefly from records made at the time,
until the end of the Adventures which are to follow. From this
Journal
I have written the veritable History which now challenges the kind
reader's attention. I wish him in the outset to understand and believe
that the narrative of events is truth and verity, not fiction; for I, Paul
Peril, am a man, not of straw, but of flesh and blood: and what I
record
I have seen, and of it bear a part.
My narrative now commences from the moment of my arrival in
Boston, on the morning of October tenth, 1827. After the servant had
set down my trunk, which I remember was covered with hog's hair, and
had a round top, the letters P. P. in an oval of brass tacks upon it, I
began to reflect complacently upon my new position. I was alone in
a large hotel, no father's eye, no mother's care, a trunk of clothing, a
new suit upon my back, and four dollars and thirty-four cents in specie
in my pocket. I was, too, in the great city of Boston. I was destined
to sail for South America. I was a clerk, in embryo, of some vast
Commercial House. These ideas, in themselves, sufficiently great,
were not a little amplified in imagination. I strutted up and down my
little top-of-the-house-chamber, now casting an eye upon my trunk and
upon the brass nails that formed P. P., glittering evidences to the world
that the trunk belonged to me, Paul Perril, and now admiring my new
suit which Tim Lapboard, the tailor, had cut and basted, but which
my mother, by the aid of good Anny Makeman, the village seamstress,
had made. I felt my own importance, and jingled the dollars and
coppers in my pockets, and dented the floor with my high-heeled boots.
After I had sufficiently sacrificed to personal vanity and self, I was
struck with the terrific noises that surrounded the hotel, and at times
made the very walls shake. I looked out of my window and saw that
it was occasioned by the drays thundering over the stone pavements;
but although I discovered the cause, I was none the less amazed by
the uproar which nearly deafened me.
At length I bethought me I would go out and see Boston, which I
had heard so much of, and also pay a visit to my three brothers, who
were clerks in stores here. So I opened my trunk and took out my
hair-brush aud gave my head a Sunday-smoothing, and then brushed
from my coat and trowsers every particle of lint, for I had an idea
that in Boston every body went looking as nice as a pin; that only the
country folks dressed plain and wore old and soiled clothes; but I soon
learned that one must go into a large town to see what wretched
garments
,
what filthy wardrobes bipeds will hang upon their backs. After
I had carefully performed my toilet and let the corner of a blue silk
handkerchief stick a little way out of my coat pocket behind, I put on
my cotton gloves and locking my door (for I had heard of robbers) I
descended to the lower regions of the hotel. I at length reached the
front door where the stage had let me down half an hour before. Two
or three gentlemen were standing upon the steps, and in the street I
beheld crowds as if all were hurrying to a fire, or an alarm had been
given that a man was drowning. The number and hurry of the people,
the throng of dravs and carriages, the thunder and overpowing rumble
of the heavily laden wheels, the shuffle of feet, the confusion of voices,
both bewildered and alarmed me. I stood a few moments upon the
step, undecided and confused. I was afraid to venture up the street,
lest I should be knocked down by the hurrying people, and so I
resolved
till they should get past, not to stir. But I soon discovered that
there was no end to the passing, either of people or drays, and I then
made up my mind to venture to proceed. But I had not taken two
steps before I recollected that I did n't know where my brothers' stores
were. So I re-entered the bar-room, and seeing a respectable,
middle-aged
gentleman reading a paper, I advanced to him, and taking off
my hat I asked him very politely if he would inform me where the store
of Mr. Jeremiah Burns was, this being the tape and needle store where
my brother Josiah kept. He replied very gruffly that he did not know
any such person, and that if I wanted a Directory I had better consult
a printed one.
What a Directory was I had not the least idea. I knew, however,
that the gentleman was very much displeased, and believing that I must
have said something wrong, I begged his pardon, adding, that if he
would be so obliging as to tell me what a Directory was, I should be
very happy to consult it.
`Look at that!' he answered, pointing with his finger to a
well-thumbed
book hanging by a string alongside of the desk.
I approached it, and seeing the title of it and opening it, I learned
that every body who lived in Boston had their names printed in a book,
with the streets they lived in and the very numbers of the houses.
While I was reflecting upon the ingenuity and convenience of this
invention, and suggesting to my mind the expediency of having a
similar one for our village, where, as there were fewer people, the task
would be much less laborious, my brother Tom tapped me from behind
on the shoulder.
`Ah, Paul, so you were poking over the Direc' after some of our
Num's, eh! Glad to see you in Boston alive. How does old 'un and
every body else. Heard of your coming through Fairfax, who came
up yesterday, and have been here twice before, to see if you had come.
So you are going to Buenos Ayres. Devilish fine chance. I'm half
a mind to go off, too to some other country. Boston is getting too
small to hold me. It is no place for a young man of spirit. Why, how
rustic you look! Who the deuce cut that coat?'
Here my brother, who had rattled on without being interrupted by
me, turned me round by the shoulder and coolly surveyed me from top
to toe. I at the same time had not omitted to take notice that he was
dressed in a very extraordinary fashion; at least to my rustic vision
He wore a claret coat with a very high velvet collar, at least five
inches
broad, and a waist so fashionably short that the buttons behind
scarcely came below the shoulder blade, while the two swallow-tailed
skirts fell straight down, a yard in length, nearly to his heels. He were
buff pantaloons so tight that they stuck to the skin of his legs, and so
short and small at the ancle that it seemed to me marvelious, in the
first place, how he got them on, and then, in the second place, having
got them on how he could sit down in them without bursting them at
the seams. He wore also a green taffety waistcoat, that scarcely was
long enough in front for a little boy eight years old, and my brother
was full twenty, and over the vest was a green ribbon to which was
attached a gilt eye-glass. From one of the pockets of the vest I could
detect, peeping forth, the point of a pair of bright scissors, the signam
of his profession as a dry-goods clerk.
While he was surveying me, I was taking the survey I have just
recorded of him. Now, at home, Tom used to dress like other people,
Anny Makeman being the sole arbiter of fashion, and he having no
other tailor save her. Here let me diverge to pay a tribute of respect
to this excellent woman. She was an old maid, but one of the best
old maids on earth. She was the chief support of aged parents, and
heaven having given her clothes-making talent, filial duty unfolded her
industry, she west forth `sewing and to sew.' She was a rare
cutter
,
had undoubted genius in fitting, and her taste in style was
undisputed
.
No one like her knew how to cut the paternal coat
second-handed
into a new garment for the growing juvenile. She could get
suits where a lawyer would have declared a non-suit; and then how
neat were her fits. She worked in every body's family. She seemed
to cut and make and sew for all the boys in town. She was in
constant
requisition, pre-engaged weeks beforehand. Boys would have
to wait till each other had been fitted; and the impatient striplings
have been known more than once to take to the field and do battle for
Anny Makeman, the vanquished to waive his prior claim to the victor.
She had a calm, still face, with a soft clear eye, and she smiled
always
when she spoke; and was very patient with us boys in fitting
and trying on. We all loved her, but I fear now, it was selfish
affection
.
Her needle never rested. She was received in every family
like one of it; and no one withheld family conversations before her,
for she never made mischief. She carried with her, from house to
house, in her quiet bosom, half the domestic secrets of the town; but
she never repeated them. She was discreet and pious. She made me
my first suit of long clothes, and I shall always love her for it.
Twenty years have passed, and yet she still goes forth on her daily
mission of cutting and making for boys of another generation. I called
to see her last week. She was sewing upon a suit for a seven year
old urchin. As I gazed upon her, unchanged by time, her shears, her
cutting-board and the half-made suit, I was once more a boy before
her, and that it was my suit she was making. But to my story.
CHAPTER III.
The Watch-house.
After my brother had sufficiently inspected my outward man, he thus
expressed himself:
`You think, I dare say, Paul, that you are perfection. Your clothes
may be `the thing' down in Kennebec, but here they are decidedly
`green.'
`My coat is olive, Tom,' I answered, not comprehending the
symbolical
meaning of the word.
`And the wearer green,' answered Tom. `Well, as you are going
off to a foreign country it ain't much matter, but if you were to stay
here in Boston you should never be owned for a relation of mine in
such a long-waisted coat.'
I began to get a little irritated at my brother's manner, for I knew
that I was as well dressed as any young man in my native town. My
clothes shone with the gloss of newness, my boots squeaked at every
step their fresh origin from the last, and my white neckcloth was
stiffened
with starch to the smoothness of white paper. But putting down
his words to the score of envy at my superior position as clerk to a
foreign firm, I merely smiled my contempt for his observations, and
asked after my other brothers.
`Oh, they are in fine health,' he answered. `We all have a capital
time here. None of us keep open after eight o'clock, and then we
meet at Bruce's Soda Saloon and have a smack, and then are off to
the theatre or cruising about the streets. Sundays we always ride out
or have a sail in the harbor.'
`Ride and sail Sundays!' I repeated with surprise; for we had, at
home, always been brought up with religious strictness.
`Why yes, Master Simplicity. Sunday in Boston ain't Sunday in
the country. Why, my dear boy, how many things you have got to
learn. How inconceivably verdant you are, Paul! Why what should
we poor devils in stores do if we had no recreation of a Sunday, I'd
like to know? We go to our stores at sun-up Monday morning, and
are in them every day in the week till eight o'clock and sometimes till
nine. If we never rode out Sundays what time should we have for
recreation
and unbending the mind? I know a fellow who has been a
clerk here three years who never had beeu out of Boston into Roxbury,
Cambridge, or any of the beautiful towns in the vicinity, because he
won't go Sundays, and week days he is a slave!'
`But you ought not to break the Sabbath, nevertheless, Tom,' said
I gravely.
`It is not our fault. The merchants should love avarice less, and
give us every Saturday afternoon, or at least every other one. We
could then recreate and on Sundays go to church. But every merchant
loves money more than the souls of their clerks. Some, too, who are
members of the church; they keep their clerks in every hour of
week days; and so if the clerks recreate a little Sundays, why the
blame lies more with the merchant than the poor clerk! But don't
let us moralize here, Paul,' added my brother, putting his arm through
mine. `We will walk up to my store, and I will tell old Hunks, that
my brother has come to the city and I want an hour to go round with
you to see your other brothers. He'll give it to me, but he'll pay
himself
for the loss time by keeping back one of my perquisite boxes.'
`What are your perquisite boxes?' I asked; for as the reader will
see, I was ignorant of many things with which my city brothers were
familiarly acquainted.
`Why they are the boxes goods come in. My Hunks gives me my
board and perquisites. These latter amount to about two boxes a
week on an average. These boxes I sell to draymen or others who
give me a quarter a piece for them. This is all the spending money
I get, and also half the clerks in Boston. Now Hunks, if he gives me
an hour, will give me one less box!'
`What a close hard man he must be!' I exclaimed indignantly.
`It is the custom. He is no worse than many others. Here in
Boston every man's look-out is for his own. No. 1, letter A, is the
chief care. If No. 2 wants a favor he must pay No. 1 for its full value.
Time is money here, and every man pays for it and takes pay for it.
You've got a good deal to learn, Paul.'
`I see I have,' I replied; `but how is it if you get but fifty cents a
week, you and my brothers are able to ride Sundays? It must cost
you a dollar at least for a carriage.'
`A dollar!' repeated my brother with a smile. `I guess it costs a
two-fifty. Horses ain't hired so cheap here as they used to be at
Robinson's
stable, down in Kennebec. Why, you see, we don't ride every
Sunday. Our three perquisites together make up enough to ride every
other. For we go three together; and sometimes, on the bridge, take
up a fourth crony. So we club together and have a fine spree at Fresh
Pond.'
`I am sorry to see you have forgotten the Sabbath, Tom,' I said,
quite shocked at the change which a year's residence in Boston had
effected in my brother, who, at home, had been very steady and moral.
`Well, I am no worse than others. When you are with the Romans
you must do as the Romans do.'
With this proverb, Tom took me along with him out of the door and,
together, we walked up the street.
During the day I saw my other two brothers, and found them, in
dress and habits and conversation, just the counterpart of Tom. They
could talk of nothing but boating, riding, Fresh Pond, bowling alleys,
and young girls of the town. They seemed to be all three wholly lost
to virtue and morality, and all sense of religion. They smoked cigars,
drank wine at soda shops, and visited places where vice and profligacy
nightly held their licentious levees. I had not been with them two
days before I saw that they were by no means fit companions for one
who still professed to have some respect for his character; and so one
night when they all three, accompanied by two other youths of similar
calibre, came to my room to take me away with them, I firmly told
them that I would associate with them no more.
At this they all laughed, and my brother Tom paid me the
compliment
of saying that I had missed my vocation in conseuting to go out
as clerk for a merchant; that I was, without question, cut out for a
parson's clerk: and he went on to add that he had no doubt that he
should hear of me preaching to the Patagonians before I had been in
South America a twelve month.
I laughed good-naturedly at this sally of Tom's, though I was not a
little angry and mortified at being rallied before the two dressy young
men; but reflecting that I was ridiculed only for acting well, I
restrained
my impulse to answer him angrily. After trying to prevail
upon me to accompany them they finally left me to myself, not a little
to my gratification. The next morning while I was dressing a servant
came to my room and handed me a note. I saw it was in Tom's
handwriting
.
I opened it and read as follows:
Watch-house,  street
,
6, A. M.
Dear brother Paul:
Here we are in a fix every mother's son of us! After we left you
last night we went to Bruce's and had a first-rate oyster supper. About
ten o'clock we sallied forth pretty well `up!' If I had known how
tipsy brother 'Siah was, I'd have locked him up in Bruce's back room
before he should have gone out with us. Well, he was as `drunk as a
soger.' He sang songs to the top of his lungs, and took up the whole
side walk as he went. I never saw but one chap before so tipsy and
stand. Well, we got to the corner of Broomfield lane when 'Siah saw
a `Charlie,' and so he began to sing, `O'er the water to Charlie,'
adding
some few personal impromptu, that made the watchman mad; so
he told us to keep quiet: for to tell you the truth we all joined in full
chorus. I told the watchman, gentlemen had a right to sing, and that
there was no law which put them under obligations to ask a `Charlie'
what songs they should select for testing their vocal powers. At this,
`Charlie' seized me by the collar, when brother Sam up fist and
knocked him over. Charlie sprang up and then sprang his rattle. It
was answered from half a dozen corners, and in two minutes we were
every soul of us captured, though we fought hard. 'Sias was taken up
out of the gutter and Sam was only taken prisoner after giving two
bloody noses and a black eye to the enemy. The upshot was that we
were marched off to the Watch-house except Josiah, who had to be
carried between two Charlies; and the best of the joke was, although
he was too drunk to walk he would sing, and all they could do, he
kept up a rip-roarous serenade to all the houses we went by until we
were safely lodged here.
Now my dear Paul, I write to you to ask you to do what you can to
get us off. The watchmen swear unless we pay them ten dollars,
which is two dollars apiece, they will have us up before the Police
Judge, and then our names will get into the papers and we shall be
dished. We have turned our pockets inside out, and all we can raise
is a dollar and fifty-two cents, brother 'Siah planking the two coppers.
Now you have some money I know. If you have n't enough just go
down to the bar and borrow the balance on father's account, and tell
him father will pay it when he comes up on Monday. If he objects,
tell him your trunk is in your room and shall be security. Now, my
dear Paul, do this little act for us; for we know you are a good
fellow
,
and I am sorry I quizzed you. You know if we are put in the
papers it might injure you; for Mr. Bedrick might suppose you were
quite asasas(what word shall I use?)never mind! You
might lose your chance of going to South America; which we should
be very sorry for, as it would be on our account. So not to have your
disappointment on our three consciences, get the `dollars' and hasten
to us without delay. The Court opens in an hour; and if the Charlies
don't have the X by that time up we go!
Your affectionate and loving brother
Tom
.
P. S.Do get the money, dear Paul, that's a fine fellow, and we'll
never say `green' to you again.
Yours faithfully,
Josiah
.
N. B.Paul, my dear boy, don't fail to get us out. We are shut
up in a dog's hole, and nothing to eat or drink. Our safety and only
hope is in you. We must get out in time to open our shops or we shall
all be shipped, and only for an innocent spree! Do your best Paul,
and we 'll never forget you while memory holds a place in our souls.
Your brother in limbo,
Sam
.
P. S.Put a small bottle of Cogniac in your pocket and half a dozen
cigars; for we are so confoundedly stiff we shall have to be carried
home in hand-carts unless we are warmed.
Tom
.
Sam
.
'Siah
.
After I had finished the perusal of this precious epistle. I could not
but laugh heartily at my brothers' predicament, while at the same time
I congratulated myself on having resisted their invitation to accompany
them; for I should without doubt have shared in their present
disgrace
.
Thus had virtue its present reward and commendation; and,
also, I could not but reflect how certainly departure from it was
punished
.
The situation of my brothers both grieved and displeased me. At
first I felt disposed to leave them to their fate; but then I remembered
that they were my brothers, and how their infamy, if they should be
brought up before the Police Court, would reflect upon all the family.
It did not seem just that I should pay for the release of the others, who
were entire strangers to me; but as my brothers had clubbed them
altogether
under the wing of the ten dollar bill, I had no other
alternative
than freeing them also. After some hesitation I at length resolved
to aid them; but with the determination of first obtaining their
promise
to give up all their dissipated habits and try and live upright lives;
though, I must confess, I had little hopes that if they made me such
promises they would faithfully perform them.
I had in my possession but three dollars and a half. This with the
money Tom said they could muster would leave me five dollars to
borrow
.
In my life I had never borrowed a dollar of any one. I felt now
a reluctance to do so that every sensitive mind must experience at
such a time; for I am well persuaded that the most humiliating act
that a man can be guilty of is to borrow money of his neighbor; and
the most humiliating position a man can be in is the debtor behind his
time in the presence of his creditors. The sensitiveness which all
proper men feel when they come to borrow money is a natural voice
in the heart to warn us against sacrifising our native independence of
character; for with the first dollar borrowed, rings the first iron blow
upon the links that bind the soul to moral vassalage. This
sensitiveness
,
this fear and trembling, this besitating advance, this heightened
pulse and stronger heart-beating, this deeper glow in the cheek, and
down-dropping eye, these all eloquently say that the young man is
doing
a thingthat he is making some mighty sacrifice of the elevated
and pure integrity of his being to his fellow-men. Let the voice of
conscience, or sensitiveness, which warns us from evil, whisper to us
that we are selling our birth-right of manhood. I cannot too strongly
urge upon every young man firmly to resist the temptation to borrow
money. The habit once formed is destructive to the finest attributes
of the character, and leads insensibly to the outer verge of all moral
perverseness. There is, of course, a distinction to be made between
`loans' of large sums for the purposes of going into business, and `
borrowing
money' in the ordinary acceptation of the phraseology.
It was with no little difficulty that I prevailed upon myself to apply
to the landlord for the money. I hardly know in what words I made
known to him my wish, for I was too confused to note them. He,
however, no sooner understood what I wished than he very civilly
handed me the five dollars merely inquiring when I expected my father
would be up. I told him in three days; `when he replied, `very well,
it is all right!' I was relieved immeasureably by the ease with which
I had obtained the money, and having inquired the way to  street
I hastened to release my brothers and their two friends from the
Watch-house
.
The street was not very far distant, and on reaching it, I
found the `Lock-up' very readily. It was a small wooden building,
resembling an Engine-house. Over the door was `Ward number .'
A large man was standing in it smoking a cigar, who answered
my inquiry `for the five young men who were taken up the night
before,' by bidding me follow him through an entry towards the
interior.
CHAPTER IV.
The Trio Fraternal.
The
man whom I followed led me through a gloomy passage, at the
extremity of which was a square apartment hung with watch-coats,
glazed helmets, rattles, clubs, and other paraphernalia of the city watch.
Benches, two feet wide, were placed against the wall, and worn smooth
and polished with the greasy clothes of those who had been brought in to
lodge upon them for the night. On one side of this room was a door,
across which was an iron bar secured in a ring by a stout padlock. Into
the wards of this lock my man inserted a key and turning it looked at me
for a moment before opening the door with a searching glance.
`Are you the covey what the young sparks wrote for to get 'em out?'
said he, as if to make sure that my object in coming was what he
doubtless
suspected when he first saw me.
`I am sir,' was my reply.
`Then I guess they'll be glad to see you,' was his rejoinder, as he let
the iron bar drop and pulled open the door.
It led into a dark chamber, dimly lighted by an opaque looking lantern
hung over head. I could not at first see objects distinctly, but I was
made aware of the presence of my brothers, by a burst of joyous
exclamations
from the obscurity in which I had dimly made out a group of human
figures stretched upon wooden pallets.
`Ah, Paul, you are a noble fellow,' cried my brother Tom rushing
towards me and grasping one of my hands, while Sam took the other, and
between them they had well nigh torn my arms from their sockets. Josiah
came up and hugged me round the neck, swearing I was `an Emperor,'
while a little in the back ground stood their two friends, who did not feel
that they could assure so much as my brothers in making demonstrations
of gratitude; indeed, I had no portion of my body at their service unless
they had each kneeled down and grasped a leg. I could now see the
faces of my brothers, my eyes becoming use to the darkness. 'Siah
looked pale and hollow-eyed; and Tom's optics had a sleepy look. Sam's
left orb was swollen and ornamented with a semi-circular blue ring of
bruised blood; while the coats of their two friends were sadly torn in
the back and sleeves, the effects, doubtless, of their battle with the
watchmen.
After my three brothers had given utterance to their expressions of
thanks for my prompt attention to their epistle, they released me and
began
to survey my features to see if they could read in them the `ten dollar
bill' on which all their hopes depended. I assumed a very grave aspect.
The last night, at my room,
they
were in the ascendency, ridiculing me,
and looking down upon me as a person of no spirit. Now the tables
were turned. The whole five, as it were, lay at my mercy. I felt like
showing them my power, while at the same time I wished to manifest to
them my disapprobation of their conduct.
`I am sorry,' said I in my gravest manner, `to find my brothers in
such a place as this!' Here I looked round upon the rough plastered
walls and mean appearance of the room. `I never expected to find any
with whom I claimed relationship prisoners in such a condition! I
assure
you all that I was very much mortified even to be seen coming into
it!'
`We are all confoundedly penitent, Paul,' answered Tom in a whining
one.
`We confess we have been in fault, and swear morality, if you only fork
over the X,' added Sam.
`That's my dear good boy, Paul,' stammered Josiah feebly and still
tipsily, as if he had not yet become fully sobered; `just get us out o' this
and I'll do any ththing for you, won't we felfellows?'
`I will release you on one condition,' I answered.
`Name it, Paul,' they repeated altogether.
`That you promise to ride no more Sundays!'
`Done! If we do may we get our wicked necks broke,' they responded
with commendable energy.
`That you stroll the streets no more nights!' I continued.
`If we do may we be locked up in the watchhouse!' said Tom with
emphasis.
`Aye, or in Leverett street Jug,' added Josiah solemnly.
`That you give up the soda-shops and oyster suppers, and cease to
tipple!'
`Done as if it was already done,' responded brother Tom slapping my
hand. `We'll be as moral as a meeting-house, won't we boys? You
won't hear of us Sundays'cept at church! We'll reform the town!'
`Yes,' reiterated Josiah, `we'll set an example to all the young clerks
in Boston, and they shall go in our foot steps, and the soda shopses, and
the Livery stableses shall all break down for want o' cuscustomers,
shan't they though?'
This sentiment was echoed by the other four with unanimity.
`Now I have one other condition,' said I.
`Name it and we'll do it, if it is to go to prayer meetings before six
o'clock every morning,' answered my brother Tom with an oath; for all
three of my brothers I found had gained, with other things, the
accomplishment
of swearing since they had left the paternal roof.
`It is that you terminate your intimacy at once with these two young
men, who I am aware are no credit to you; and to whom I doubt not you
are indebted for many examples of profligacy; for I was told by Mr.
Merriam
after you left last night that they were `two of the hardest cases' in
town. Nay, young gentlemen,' I added, seeing one of them bristle
up, while the other clenched his fist, `I do not fear your anger or your
hatred
.
You are wholly at my mercy, unless you prefer going before the
Police. I shall, however, for my brothers' sake release you with them!'
`That's noble, Paul,' exclaimed Tom. `You are a good fellow at
bottom. So you have the money! Don't you think I was just beginning
to think you had only come here to read us a lecture and then leave us to
reflect upon it. But you are a trump!'
`I have no idea what `a trump is,' I answered; `I only know that I
do what I think is my duty, and what under the circumstances my father
will approve of!'
Here I saw Tom whisper to one of the strange young men, and the
words `green, not to know a trump,' and from the other, `dare say be
never saw a card in his life!' reached my ears.
`A trump, my dear Paul,' answered Tom, `a trump isis a
devilish
good-fellow. Is n't boys?'
`A devilish good fellow,' repeated all-four, with the fawning
readiness
of persons who look to another for a present-favor.
`I do n't ask any praise,' I answered in a serious tone; `for if you
could be relieved in any other way I would not aid you, for it looks
like conniving at your profligacy; but as you have promised
amendment
,
and as I still trust that you are not so far lost to honor or truth
as to forfeit your pledged word, I am ready to do my part toward
setting
you at liberty. If you will inform me to whom I am to pay the
money I will transfer it to him.'
`To me,' answered the man who had let me in, and who had
listened
to all I had said, and he extended his hand for the price of their
liberty.
I took from my pocket the eight dollars and a half and placed it in
his hand, when the whole nice party of five set up a chorus of joyful
exclamations and surrounded me in high glee. Tom then gave him
the one dollar fifty he had raised in all their pockets.
`You are at liberty to go, young gentlemen,' said the Captain of the
Watch, for such was this dignitary, `and I recommend to you to take
the advise of this young man who seems to have more virtue in his
little
finger than all of you put together. Here, my young gentleman,'
he said turning to me, `I read the note they sent you, and I know you
are not rich, and had to borrow half of this. I have no power to
receive
pay for letting these chaps loose; if I took a bribe I should lose
my place. It is for me either to let them go at once, supposing they
have not done had enough to haul 'em up to the Police, or else
send 'em down to the Court. I did n't intend to buy off the young
men, I only wanted to make 'em pay for their frolic; and I find to
touch the pockets is a good plan as any. The ten dollars I meant to
have sent down to the Court as was my duty; but as circumstances
be, and you seem to have come hard by the money, and are such a
moral young man, I return you not only your eight dollars, but the
part they scraped together. Take it, and you my larks remember all
your lives how much better virtue and morality fare than vice and
busting!'
With this speech the honest Captain of the Watch gave into my
hands the amount he had received, and which he might have safely
kept. I complimented him upon his integrity, and would have
prevailed
upon him to take a dollar at least, as a present. But he
refused
;
and so we all bade him good morning and sallied forth into the
street.
Fortunately it was very early, or the breezy look of my companions
might have told to hundreds of passers by their story. Tom's sunken
and red eyes, Sam's bunged peeper, and Josiah's tipsy look with the
torn apparel of the others, were so many chapters of unwritten spreeing
and Watch-house experiences.
Tom took my arm affectionately while the remaining four locked
two by two and followed after us. When each of the two `cronies'
arrived at the point nearest his store he slunk off, and by the time I
had reached Milk street my brothers only were with me.
`Now Paul,' said Tom winningly, `I propose that as you are flush
you treat us all to a breakfast in at Bruce's; for we are confoundedly
hungry!'
I told them that I thought they were in a great hurry to open their
stores, and advised them first to do that and then come and breakfast
with me. To this they finally consented, though not until Sam had
borrowed a dollar of me, and 'Siah fifty cents, leaving me but the
amount I had taken with me to the Watch-house.
After they had left me I went in and returned the five dollars to Mr.
Merriam, not a little grateful in my heart to the honest watchman for
enabling me to do it. At length my brothers came in and we
breakfasted
together for the first time in eighteen months, our last meal
together having been beneath the paternal roof.
To say the truth the three young men behaved themselves very
humbly and quietly at the table, and on my promising, at their urgent
entreaty of me, not to mention the watch-house affair to their father,
they looked as if they thought me one of the best friends they had in
the world.
I had no been in Boston four days, and it will be seen by the
reader, that during that time, through my brothers, I had picked up no
little experience of metropolitan life. I felt thankful that my fate had
not destined me to a clerkship in a retail-store in the city; for what I
had observed of life among them did not by any means give me a taste
for it.
My brothers did not come near me again until the next evening,
when they acted under a certain restraint, as if not perfectly at ease in
my company; and I was not at a loss to discover that their habits and
tastes had grown so corrupt with loose companionship that they relished
no society where they could not give a free rein to freer speech,
especially
upon the beauty of young milliners, their susceptibility to flattery,
the ease with which their virtue might be conquered by a person of
address; also they loved to discourse about gay females of the town
whom they had fallen in with in the streets in their night-wanderings,
or else encountered at the theatres. They also discussed wines, oysters,
their soda-shop friends, bowling and billiards, and even race-horses;
for I found that my trio of brothers had twice been to horse races at
Cambridge, feigning sickness as an apology for getting off from the
store. In a word, I had not been with my precious brothers
twenty-four
hours before I had my ears shocked, and my sense of delicacy
offended by their free and libidious conversation, not to mention the
profane
oaths with which from time to time they saw fit to garnish it; and
from them I learned for the first time on my reproving their profanity,
that it was genteel to swear, and the sure sign of a man of spirit.
But after the adventures in the Watch-house, my brothers were
careful
what they said in my presence that was offensive to my less genteel
ears; and as they were accustomed to no other conversation but such
as touched upon such subjects as I had little sympathy with, they were
mostly silent or talked very dully upon indifferent matters. In their
eyes I was, doubtless, most wretched company, and I freely confess that
in mine they were. Even Tom had once dared to hint to me the first
day of our meeting in Boston, among other recounts of his `life in
town,' that he had really seriously thought of keeping a mistress!
When he had explained to me what he meant, I was not slow in
expressing
both my astonishment and contempt. Since then, especially
since the affair of the Watch-house, they had all been rather shy of
me, looking upon me as a goat among the sheep, or rather a sheep
among the goats.
At length the time arrived when Mr. Bedrick was to be in town, for
he was absent when I reached Boston, and I sallied forth to the
counting-room
in India street, where I had been informed by Professor
Haley he was to be found. At this place I had not neglected to call
on my first arrival, and there having learned his absence till such a day,
I now once more proposed to present myself before the man to whom
I was to commit my future destinies.
CHAPTER V.
The `Foreign Merchant.'
The
event of the first presentation of a young man to the person
who is to control him for some years to come in the character of a master,
is one of no ordinary importance. While I was preparing myself to
look my best in his eyes, by making my person as tidy as possible, I
was busily forming in my mind's eye some idea of his appearance. All
I knew of him was that he was an elderly man, that his name was
Jonathan Bedrick, and that he had `very respectable' recommendations.
Having properly attired my person I sallied forth and took my way
with a brisk step towards India street. At length I stood in front of
the store in the counting-room of which I expected to behold the great
South American Merchant into whose hands I had resolved to commit
my destinies. The height and grandeur of the store enlarged my ideas
of the personage who was to be found within. My heart fluttered, and
I dare say I was paler than usual as I entered the street door and asked
of a young man, with a quill on his ear-top, for Mr. Bedrick. Before
replying he eyed me sharply, and then asked me, in a sort of
confidential
tone, if I was one of the young men whom he had engaged to go
out with him to South America. Upon my frankly replying in the
affirmative, he looked very grave, then smiled meaningly, then shook
his head with a sympathizing air. I confess I was not a little startled,
so was about to ask the meaning of these signs when he said:
`From the country, I dare say?'
`Yes,' I responded for the twentieth time since I had been in
Boston
,
astonished at the unfailing accuracy with which every body who
had never seen me before knew my rustic origination. If I had had
`From Kennebec,' written in chalk upon my back, the Boston folks
could not have known for a greater certainty that I was a young man
from `down East.'
`Better go back again,' he said in a half impatient way, half
advising
.
`You don't know every thing. Better go back again. You 'll
be sure to cry over the milk after it is spilled, but it will then be too
late-Take
my advice and quit the concern!'
It at once occurred to me that this young man, who from the fact
that he never saw me before that moment, could have no particular
interest
in my welfare, and that he was desirous of getting me out of the
way that he might jump into my shoes. I therefore smiled quietly and
merely answered that I never expected to know every thing so long as
Mr. Ignorance was in the world! He looked very angry at my reply,
and turning on his heel said very impressively, `Go to the devil!'
Not caring to take up his words I said nothing but walking past him
into the counting-room I saw three persons variously engaged at desks,
and a fourth seated at a table writing. I paused, and surveyed them,
and came to the conclusion that the elderly man at the table must be
Mr. Bedrick. With this idea I surveyed him for a moment with close
attention. He was about fifty one or two years of age, with a very
high bald forehead, arched wrinkled brows, and a prominent aquiline
nose, beaked like an eagle's. His eyes were black, deep set, and
restless
,
and one of them was kept nearly half shut, while over the other
the corner of the thick eye-brow was knitted sharply. His mouth was
large and heavily-lipped. His whole face had an aspect of shrewd
intelligence combined with low cunning.
I was not then much of a judge of physiognomy, else I had taken
the advise of my friend who had sent me so civily `to the devil,'
and gone back home without introducing myself to the man of my
destiny. I don't know how it was that I pitched, upon him as the
only man in the counting-room likely to be Mr. Bedrick, unless it
was that before him on the table lay a hat, and stick, and a pair of
gloves, as if he had just laid them down, as a temporary visiter would
be likely to do; and I knew that he only had that counting-room as
his head-quarters until he should set sail.
After I had surveyed his face and let my eyes wander over his
snuff-colored
coat and white snuff-stained waistcoat, and the ruffled bosom of
his shirt, I mustered courage and advanced towards him hat in hand.
`I have called to see Mr. Bedrick,' I said as firmly as I could manage
to articulate at such an important moment, my heart all the while going
like an engine worked by steam.
Without replying at the instant he raised his head and keenly
surveyed
me, first dropping his spectacles which had been thrust above
his forehead.
`I am that person,' he at length answered in a nasal tone, and with
an effort to appear amiably condescending; for doubtless he suspected
what my business was with him, and for reasons obvious enough now,
was desirous of making a good first impression upon me.
`I have called, sir, with a letter to you from Dr. Haley,' I
answered
,
handing him a note which stated my name, family, and
connexions
.
`Ah, very well, quite well, young man,' he said, after he had
completed
its perusal. `So you are one of the four young gentlemen
recommended to me. I am glad to see you here in such good time.
I like your appearance. You have never been in any businessalways
at school till now?'
`Yes, sir!'
`So much the better. You come to me unsophisticated, and without
any of the bad habits young men get in town. It was that I might
have highly respectable, moral, intelligent, upright young men with me
that I conceived the idea of applying as I did by letter to Dr. Haley.
The result shows the wisdom of my course. I have already seen this
morning young Fairfax and Radsworth who report themselves ready to
go at an hour's notice!'
`So am I, sir. I have been four or five days in town!'
`Ah, indeed. I like your readiness. I am fortunate in getting
such five young men, all of the best families in Maine, too, I learn. I
want precisely such; persons that I can trust, confide in, and who will
confer credit upon me and my business. Do you know the fourth one,
Hewitt?'
`Yes, sir,' I answered; my opinion of him gradually growing more
favorable.
`Do you know if he has arrived?'
`Not yet, sir, I believe, though it is possible. I have not seen the
other two yet,' I answered.
`Is he as active and intelligent as you three seem to be?'
`He is a very clever, sir, and I believe an excellent young man.
He bore a good reputation for scholarship and character at the
Institution
!'
`That is what Healey writes. I am very fortunate in thus getting
my young men. Where do you stop?'
`At the Commercial!'
`I shall want to see you and the rest together when Hewitt arrives,
also your father when he comes. We shall get off by the fifteenth. I
hope you will get all things necessary for the voyage, especially thin
clothing, which you will need in that climate. Now, good morning.
I will send to you when I am ready to see you again. I would prefer
you should not make this matter of going to South America an
occasion
of conversation, as I would rather it should pass quietly. In
mercantile
affairs secrecy is a great virtue, young man, as you will learn
before you have been a great while with me!'
With this counsel Mr. Bedrick slightly bowed and resumed his
occupation
of transferring an account from a slip of paper to a small
sheepskin-covered memorandum-book that lay before him. I bowed
very politely, as it became me to do, to a person of such consideration
as a foreign merchant, whose clerk I was destined to be, and backing
out of the counting-room I replaced my new hat upon my head, and
proceeded to leave the store. In the door-way stood my friend who
would enviously have usurped my place in the proposed foreign House,
but not deigning to bestow upon him even a look of recognition, I
walked forth and took my way back to the hotel. When I reached it
I was told by Mr. Merriam that my father had just arrived and was
gone up to a room. I hastened to him, and after the congratulations
of our meeting were over, I informed him that I had seen Mr. Bedrick
and that he had desired me to be ready by the fifteenth.
During the day Hewitt arrived in a Kennebec sloop, which accounted
for his delay, the vessel having been detained by contrary winds three
days beyond the usual time required for her passage across the bay.
In the evening, we four adventurers and aspirants for wealth in South
America, met together at my room, where we discussed our future
prospects. We all agreed that Mr. Bedrick was a shrewd-looking old
fellow, and on comparing notes generally we found that our opinions
nearly coincided respecting him; Hewitt, however, felt disposed to
regard him with more favor than either of us; but he was an easy,
quiet young man, who took every thing smoothly, and possessed the
most immovable
sang froid;
and no disappointment could have the
effect of disturbing his equanimity.
The next forenoon my father came in informing me that he had
seen Mr. Bedrick, and was very much pleased with him. He said that
he was every way worthy of his confidence, and that in surrendering
me to his charge he felt that he was paving the way for my ultimate
prosperity. He concluded a short chapter of advice to me touching
my deportment when I should be solely under his care, by saying that
Mr. Bedrick would call at one o'clock and dine with him, when he
would like not only to see me but the rest of the young gentlemen
together. By my father's direction I then went in seach of them and
invited them to my room to meet our future employer. At the hour
set they made their appearance, and shortly afterwards my father sent
for me and my friends to go down into his room. We found with him
Mr. Bedrick, who bowed and spoke civilly to each of us as we entered
and took our seats.
`Mr. Bedrick, Paul, wishes to explain to you and your friends more
clearly his intention respecting you,' said my father. `I have talked
with him and am satisfied that he will be to you both a father and a
friend!'
`Certainly, young gentlemen, that is my intention,' answered Mr.
Bedrick in his shrill nasal tone, one of his black, restless eyes shining
out from beneath his contracted eyebrow, while the other was closely
shut, like a man looking through a telescope.
`I hope I shall treat you in a manner as will almost lead you to
forget
you ever had another father! I have two sons who go out with
me. You shall have the same treatment precisely as they! I shall
know no difference between you. You are all my sons. I trust you
will be as sons to me, faithful and obedient!'
We all bowed our acquiescence in this sentiment, when he
proceeded
after taking a huge pinch of snuff from a tortoise-shell box that
was never out of his hand:
`My intention is to sail on the fifteenth instant from this port for
Buenos Ayres, in South America, in the brig `Joseph,' Captain Pright.
I am going out for the purpose of establishing two Houses, one at
Monte Video, the other at Buenos Ayres. I have my goods for the
purpose on board the brig. I am also part owner of her. It is my
intention to pay your passage out and to board and clothe you until you
are twenty-one, giving you at the same time the privilege of making
private speculations for your own benefit and profit. That is the
country to get rich in a short time. You will with me get a thorough
knowledge of the business and also of the language of the country.
At the age of twenty-one I will take you into the firm as partners, or
set you up in new Houses in some of the neighboring ports; for it is
my intention to establish agencies in numerous places so soon as I get
my business fairly under weigh. Now you fully understand what I am
to do and what prospects lie before you, young gentlemen. Hundreds
of young men in this city would be glad to go with me; but I want
moral young men; those who like you have never been hackneyed by
the ways of vice, and who can start fair in the world with your
unspotted
character in your hands. Your parents,' he continued, addressing
my three friends, `have corresponded with me, and I have replied to
their letters. They express themselves highly gratified with the
opportunity
that is now offered you. Nothing now remains to be done but
for you to sign this paper pledging yourselves each to give me your
services until you severally arrive at the age of twenty-one.'
Here he unfolded a long document which he read to us. It embraced
the sum of what he had already said, and we walked up to the table
and affixed to it our names. I remember that mine was given with
a final flourish of unusual dimensions and expressions; for in my
mind's eye I was already as rich as an Inca of Peru; Mr. Bedrick's
plausible and eloquent account of his `intentions' and our `
prospects
,'
having quite captivated my imagination and wholly removed
from my mind the prejudice which I had in the outset conceived
against him.
He also, affixed his name to the paper beneath ours, and my father
appended his on the left margin as `Witness.' Thus were the
formidable
preliminaries arranged, and we felt as if we were already at the
head of our great commercial Firm! Mr. Bedrick dined with my
father who seemed much taken with him.
At length the day on which we were to sail arrived. Information
was conveyed to us that we must be on board the brig by three o'clock
as the tide would serve at four, when the vessel would weigh anchor
and proceed to sea.
CHAPTER VI.
The Embarking.
At
the suggestion of Mr. Bedrick we had each of us purchased a
Spanish Grammar, he having informed us that his eldest son, who had
been in Cambridge, though whether he had graduated or not we never
knew, was a good Spanish scholar, and would teach us as much of the
language as we could learn in the two month's voyage before us. I
also laid in a few little articles that I thought might be of use to me,
not forgetting a suit of thin clothes. I represented to my father the
expediency of taking more summer clothing, but he remarked that as
Mr. Bedrick had pledged himself to clothe us he did not feel called
upon to go te such an expense, which ought in justice to fall upon the
merchant himself. My father, as I have said, had a large family, and
an expensive one, and his income was not as large from his business
but that he saw the true value of every dollar that went from it to make
purchases either for himself or his family.
I was, however, tolerably well provided with clothes, though all my
worldly possessions in this way lay packed in the hair trunk already
honorably mentioned. Yet my wardrobe was by no means ample, and
would not have sufficed for me to start with on so long a voyage but
for the faith both my father and myself had in the liberal promises of
Mr. Bedrick. I dined with my father on the day we were to embark;
and I confess that the thought of leaving home for so long an absence
saddened my spirits and quite deprived me of my appetite; not even
the glowing prospects of the future were able to cheer my gloomy
feelings
.
To the youth who leaves home and country for the first time, it
is a sad hour. The heart will linger over the scenes of past happiness,
and the soul shrinks at the severing of the natural bond of affection and
childhood's fond associations.
After dinner I followed my father to his room, where he gave me
some excellent advise, and then took a tender farewell of me, although
it was his intention to accompany me on board; but he was a man who
did not like to manifest feeling before folks, and so we parted then in
anticipation of the more formal one on ship-board.
At length the carriage came for me and my trunk, and my father
getting into it with me, we were soon at the end of Long wharf, where
we found Mr. Bedrick, his two sons, (as I afterwards learned they were)
and my three fellow adventurers already in the boat which was to take
us on board. My brothers were also there to see me embark and say
`good bye.' The first words Tom said to me were it I had mentioned
the affair of the watch-house to father. Upon my assuring him that I
had not, he looked very much pleased and shook me warmly by the
hand, saying that he hoped the next time he saw me I should be a rich
man.
The boat was lying at the foot of the pier-stairs and loaded down to
the water's edge with trunks, chests, demijohns, boxes and bags. There
was hardly room for myself, my trunk, and my father, but by dint of
stowing closer we were all taken on board and the next moment put off
from the stairs, rowed by two men.
I now felt myself fairly embarked in life, and that the link that
bound me to home and country was parted. The wind blew strongly
from the North-West, and our boat was considerably tossed by the
rough waves of the harbor; but after a pull of a quarter of a mile we
reached the brig, which was hove short with her topsails loosed and the
men aloft.
She was a staunch looking vessel of about two hundred and fifty
tons, painted black, with quaker ports. We got on board one after the
other, Mr. Bedrick remaining in the boat to see that his baggage was
safely got out; for I saw in the passage to the brig that he had quite a
nervous solicitude for its safety.
The deck presented no very inviting scene. It was cumbered with
loose rigging, crates, boxes, bales, sails, spars, hen-coops, and
innumerable
other articles cast about here and there in the utmost confusion
Nothing had been stowed or taken care of; but left just as it had been
taken in board. I made my way through the companion to a space at
the stern, where stood a short, broad-shouldered man with black
whiskers
and a low, beetling brow, beneath which twinkled a pair of sharp
grey eyes. He held a trumpet in his hand, and was swearing huge
oaths, but without its aid, at the men on the yard. He wore an old
black hat with the brim turned up behind through long contact with
his coat collar, and his outer man was cased in a blue shaggy pilot-coat.
I did not like his looks at the first, and my prepossessions were not
made more favorable by being sharply ordered `to stand out of the way
or go below!'
I went to the other side of the deck and took a position upon a
barrel
of apples, while my father mounted an oblong copper soda-fountain
that with the others lay near. The rest of the young gentlemen
disposed
of themselves in the best manner they were able, for the Captain,
such being the rank of the man in the pilot-coat, swore roundly at all
as they came aft that he'd have a clear quarter-deck while his ship was
getting underweigh. At length, Mr. Bedrick got on board with his
baggage, and coming aft, was asked by Captain Pright if `all was
aboard
?'
Upon being answered in the affirmative, he gave orders to
the mate to man the windlass and get up the anchor.
`I see, my son, I must now leave you,' said my father. `Good bye,
and do all you can to gain the good will of Mr. Bedrick, also while on
board the brig of Captain Pright, and your voyage will be much
pleasanter
.
He seems to be a cross man; but it is, perhaps, because he is
troubled about getting underweigh. I wish you a pleasant voyage.
Things look a little out of order now, but after you get to sea the dexks
will be cleared and you will, no doubt, find every thing agreeable.
You are fortunate in having three companions as fellow passengers
whom you know and who are your friends. When you speak a vessel
write by her; and as soon as you reach your destination send us home
letters, and do this by every opportunity. I shall always be happy to
hear of your prosperity; and I have no doubt that the way is now open
for you to become a rich man?'
`Do you go ashore, sir?' asked the Captain, addressing my father.
`Yes sir. This is my son, Captain. He goes out with Mr. Bedrick.
He is young and new to the world. Such kindness as he may receive
at your hands will be gratefully acknowledged by me!'
Captain Pright slightly nodded and said gruffly: `It is quite as much
as I can do, sir, to take care of my vessel. Mr. Bedrick is the man
for you to speak to!'
My father looked displeased, but made no reply. He shook me by
the hand. I followed him to the gangway with a full heart, for I was
already heartily sick of the brig and her Captain; for from the manner
of the latter I anticipated no very pleasant voyage under the auspices
of such a petty tyrant as he seemed to be. I had too much pride of
character, however, to betray my feelings to my father. He went over
the side into a shore boat which had just unladen a freight of
vegetables
and fresh meat; for the brig's boat was already hoisted astern. I
followed my father's receding form with tearful eyes, and when he could
no longer be seen I turned away and wept like a child.
The anchor was soon suspended at the bows, the topsails were
sheeted
home, the spencer hoisted and spread to the wind which filled the
upper sails, and the brig moved from her moorings each moment with
increasing speed. Sail after sail was unloosed till the masts were white
with canvass, and the spray dashed in dancing fountains from her
cleaving prow.
Sad in spirit, and already beginning to feel the sinking sensation of
the heart called `home-sickness,' I took my stand upon the taffrail
by the side of my three companions and silently gazed upon the fading
city. The wing of thought wandered from there to my native valley
and hovering over home presented it to my memory in all its fond
features
.
My mother, my ever kind and good mother, my sisters, my
school-matesall the scenes endeared to me with a thousand pleasing
associations filled my mind and nearly overpowered me. I felt that I
was leaving them all for yearsperhaps forever! Those who have
never left their native land in youth know nothing of this sickness of
the heart. Those who have felt it will understand it and sympathize
with me.
My three fellow-clerks doubtless had feelings kindred with my own,
for they gazed back upon the city with very sorrowful countenances,
and tears filled the eyes of at least two of them; for they too were
leaving friends, and home and country for a far distant land, their
destinies
unknown.
The beauty of the scenery around the harbor as we sailed down
gradually drew my attention from myself. I gazed upon the snow-white
castle with its hollow embrasures frowning with cannon, and upon the
green islands, and sloping hill sides of the main adorned with stately
edifices with that interest which beautiful scenery never has failed to
awaken in my bosom.
The brig fairly under sail, the Captain began to give orders `to clear
the decks!' One after the other the boxes, bales, ank barrels
disappeared
below; yet leaving all our baggage with Mr. Bedrick's `stores'
still in the gangway.
`Come, young men,' said Mr. Bedrick, who had been `fussing'
about his things to see if any thing had received damage by water or
were broken, `you must take hold and get your trunks below and then
come up and help me stow away mine and my stores. Where shall I
stow 'em, Captain?'
`In the steerage,' answered Captain Pright looking sullenly over the
scores of packages, boxes and trunks, that were piled like a
hecatomb
near the capstan. `Not an article goes into the cabin, sir! You
have got `dunder' enough there, Mr. Bedrick, to freight a line of battle
ship!'
`My affairs won't interfere with yours, Captain Pright,' retorted Mr.
Bedrick sharply.
The Captain made no answer, the pilot at that moment speaking to
him. My trunk being near the steerage stairs I had promptly taken
hold of it when Mr. Bedrick called upon us, for I was desirous of
securing
a good place for it, so that I could easily come at it when I
wished to open it. I descended into the dark region between decks,
and feeling round at length found a snug corner for it where I left it.
I then saw that there were four rough berths in the steerage, the which
I supposed, in my ignorance of nautical matters, were for the seamen;
and I wondered how they could be content to go to sea and sleep in
such a place! Fairfax followed me with his chest, and alter him came
Hewitt and Radsworth bearing with them all their worldly goods.
When they had each of them broken their shins against the stores
strewn about, and nearly fractured their skulls against the beams
overhead
,
they succeeded in stowing their things away to their satisfaction.
We then stood together beneath the hatch-way and called a sort of
council of war.
`I'd like plaguily to ascertain to a moral certainty whether we are
to board and lodge in this place,' said Hewitt in his dry manner.
`Lodge here!' repeated Fairfax, who had seen something more of
the sea than either of us, having been a voyage with a relation who was
a sea-captain. `Why I rather guess not. We are cabin passengers
and not steerage passengers!'
`Then why did the Captain refuse to let the trunks go into the
cabin?' asked Radsworth.
`Doubtless it was small, and he did not want to lumber it up,' I
remarked.
`That is the reason. Sleep here?' repeated Fairfax with
indignation
;
`I'd like to see Mr. Bedrick or the Captain putting us in here!'
`Come boys,' called out Mr. Bedrick from the deck. `Up here and
go to work and lug all this down below. We shall be out at sea in an
hour and then you'll be so sea-sick every soul of you, you won't know
whether you are on your heads or heels!'
We went to work as he directed, though we thought that the duty of
stowing his stores belonged rather to the hands of the ship than to
`young gentlemen passengers' as we were. It, however, kept us from
thinking of home, and we did the task so cheerfully and so well that in
an hour's time all the articles were not only conveyed into the steerage
but compactly stowed away around the sides.
Four soda-fountains, among other things, were brought down; but
as they were rather too heavy the seamen were called to give us a lift.
Before they went below the Captain and Mr. Bedrick had quite a sharp
skirmish of words, the former declaring very positively that they should
go into the hold with the freight, and the latter insisting on taking them
into the steerage. We did not then know the value of these oblong
copper vessels to Mr. Bedrick, or we should have ceased to be surprised
at his tender care of them. He gained the victory, however, the
Captain
finally yielding with a muttering oath. This little circumstance
showed us that our employer and the Captain had not much respect for
each other; and we could not but express to each other our wonder
that Mr. Bedrick `who owned a part of the brig and had freighted her
with his own merchandize,' should have engaged a Captain who had
so little regard for his wishes. We were, indeed, surprised at Mr.
Bedrick's patience under such autocratic treatment from a man who,
though Captain of the brig, was in truth, but an agent in his employ;
for Mr. Bedrick had told my father that he had purchased half the brig
and employed her expressly to take him and his goods and clerks to
Buenos Ayres. We, therefore, unanimously voted Captain Pright a very
disagreeable man, and my self-esteem which had been touched a
little by his first rude speech to me, was healed; for I reflected
that the clerk could not expect more consideration than the Foreign
Merchant.
Having stowed the baggage we now went on deck. The light house
was just astern, and the great blue plain of the open sea was spread out
before us. The motion of the brig began to be-exceedingly unpleasant,
and I had not been on deck ten minutes before I was taken with that
sickness which outstrips in excrutiating wretchedness to the subject of
it, all others. I told Mr. Bedrick, who was near to me tying up a
package
,
that I would like to go to my berth if he would be so kind as to
inform me which I was to take.
`Your birth is down there! Take your choice, or draw lots among
yourselves!' As he spoke he pointed to the steerage.
CHAPTER VII.
The Steerage.
So that I had somewhere to lay my swimming head it was
immaterial
to me, as I then felt, whether it was in the steerage or in the
vessel's
hold. I followed the direction in which Mr. Bedrick's hand
pointed, and the next moment was stretched in one of the births.
There in the darkness and chilly atmosphere of the place, with every
motion of the brig drawing at my very vitals, the sea dashing
menacingly
against the brig's sides, close to my head, and the noise of feet
and rattling cordage above me, I lay many miserable hours, with but
one sensationthat of miserable suffering. A thousand times I wished
myself on shore again, and bitterly did I lament my ambition for
foreign
travel which had brought me into such worldless woe. It was,
however, a sort of consolation to me that my fellow-passengers suffered
in like manner with myself. I had not been a quarter of an hour in
my bunk before Hewitt came creeping down the ladder with a face as
pale as a sheet, and holding on by whatever came in his way for
support
.
With a miserable groan he threw himself into the first berth
that offered its repose, and there lay at intervals expressing his
dissatisfaction
that the sea was not made to lie smooth and not boil up in the
fashion it did, merely for the sake of turning a poor landsman's
stomach
.
Sick as I was I could not but smile at some of his speeches,
which were addressed rather to the empty air than to me. In a little
while after he had got into his berth Radsworth came down with the
cautions step of one who had hitherto walked on the firm earth. He
looked the picture of woe. In trying to find his berth he was knocked
over by a lurch of the brig and came rolling down upon me. At length
he succeeded in getting into his berth, and there gave himself up to
his misery.
The wind seemed to increase and the waves to run higher each
moment
.
The brig would sometimes roll as if she would fairly turn over,
and more than once my heart was in my mouth lest she had actually
accomplished that feat; but hearing Captain Pright still swearing on
deck I was reassured. Sometimes she would seem for a moment to
be slowly ascending some mountainous wave; then she would pause
and hang perfectly still as if balancing herself! then, oh horrors! she
would shoot, dart, dive down with the velocity of an arrow! Who can
describe the sensation of that descending motion? It was to the
shrinking soul like going down into the central heart of the ocean!
The very strings of life were drawn down with it, while a terrible
faintness
involves the whole man.
`What do you think of this, any how?' called out Hewitt in a
dolorous
tone after one of these horrible plunges.
`I would I was ashore,' gasped Radsworth. `I would give all I
hope to be worth in all my life to come for a foot square of solid ground
to stand upon.'
I from my heart echoed his sentiments; but I was too sick to venture
to open my lips.
`Where is Fairfax, I wonder?' asked Hewitt, after a pause, during
which we had been all three busily reversing the action of eating our
dinners, one of the most unwilling acts man ever performs, and always
with an ill grace.
`I don't think he'll be sick,' answered Radsworth, `he has been on
the sea once and has the advantage of us.'
`Confound him,' said Hewitt in a murmuring tone, `it will be too
bad it he ain't sick too.'
`If he is, he won't come into the steerage,' answered Radsworth.
`When I came down he was talking to Mr. Bedrick and saying he did
not come aboard to be a steerage passenger, and he'd have the rights
of a cabin passenger.'
`What did Mr. Bedrick say to that?' I asked.
`He said he should do as he said, that he was his clerk and must
submit to his regulations. Fairfax turned to me and said that he would
have a birth in the cabin or make a row; and as a row was already
began to be kicked up in my stomach I retreated down here glad to
find any place to lay in.'
`Fairfax is quick and fiery, and will get into trouble,' said Hewitt.
`Let us wait till we all get over this confounded sea-sickness, and
then we can look after asserting our rights. Here comes Fairfax
now!'
While he was speaking our fourth man made his appearance among
us.
`Are you sick, Fairfax?' asked Hewitt with a faint hope that he
would answer in the affirmative.
`No,' answered the young man, `I am only mad. So you have all
turned in. Well, you may lay there if you will, but I mean to have a
berth in the cabin. It is an imposition to put us here. Bedrick,
himself
,
is to live in the cabin and also his two sons who are no better than
we are. Bedrick says we are to eat in the cabin; but that is not
enough. I don't like this beginning of things at all; and if I had
known that we were to occupy the steerage I would have seen him in
Guinea before I would have come with him. There is his eldest son,
too. He took the liberty to speak to me because I chose to address
his father in plain words. I don't like him nor the other one. Both of
them look upon us as beneath them; and I believe the old man regards
us no better than as if we were bounden apprentices.'
`I don't see but that we will have to put up with it, Fairfax,' said I,
`at least for the present. We can be more by ourselves here in the
steerage than we could be in the cabin under Mr. Bedrick's eye; and
I dare say we shall like this better than the cabin.'
`That is what I was thinking,' said Radsworth. `Here we shall
be independent and do as we like, and speak with each other without
fear.'
`Yes,' added Hewitt with emphasis, `and if any body dares to
intrude
upon our sanctum we will put 'em out by main force. If we are
to live here, it shall be our castle.'
`That it shall,' answered Fairfax; `so boys, we will say nothing
more at present, but hold on as we are. At night we'll have a lantern
swung from the beam, and we will try to make the best out of bed!'
`Did you insult Mr. Bedrick?' asked Radsworth.
`No, not a word. I merely told him in a firm tone what I believed
to be our rights. I spoke civilly, though his son with the light hair
and spectacles, he who is to teach us Spanish, and looks like a jackass,
said that I was impudent and told me to mind how I spoke to his father.
It is my private opinion, boys, that we shall have a `muss' before we
get to Buenos Ayres; for I don't think nature ever intend ed that those
Bedrick's and ourselves should ever pull together kindly.'
`It is wisest, however, to be patient and forbear,' I remarked. `You
know we have voluntarily placed ourselves under their father, and that
at all hazards we are completely in their hands.'
`Well, I am willing to be patient,' answered the impetuous Fairfax,
and I trust all will go smoothly, but blame me if I think so.'
`Is old Bedrick sea-sick yet?' dryly inquired Hewitt with a peculiar
shuffle of his nose which was habitual to him.
`He was looking white about the gills when I came down. His
oldest son Edwin is already feeding the whales with his last shore
dinner.'
Well, I am glad to hear it,' answered Hewitt; `I think I should
feel much better if I had certain intelligence that Captain Pright aud
his whole ship's crew were playing the game the whale played when he
cast forth Jonah!'
Night came rapidly on and darkness enveloped all in the steerage.
Fairfax was the only one of us who would go into the cabin to sepper.
As for ourselves the very knowledge that there was such a thing as
food was abhorent to us. We had but one idea, and that was a
solid rock.
Such a night as I passed has had no parallel since in my experience
either on sea or land. The wind had increased to a gale. The roar
of the tempest reached our ears with the sound of the wild warfare of
the tumbling surges. The masts and yards cracked! the blocks
shrieked piercingly! the billows would break against the brig's side
with the force of a cannon ball and the noise of thunder, causing the
vessel to shiver to her very keel. Every timber in her seemed to have
a voice to complain, and all the live-long night kept up a wailing that
was almost madness to listen to. Added to this was the constant and
never absent fear, which as landsmen was natural to us, that we should
every minute go to the bottom, I was also sick at heartsick in body
sick in souland wretchedly sick in spirit. There is no malady
that pierces and penetrates to the joints and marrow like sea-sickness!
It makes the very soul faint within itself.
At length morning dawned, but the light brought with it no relief.
Day after day passed until the fifth day out before I was able to get
upon deck or take a morsel of nourishment. Radsworth got on deck
the day before us, but Hewitt was a full week below. At length the
monster was conquered. We got over it after it had its course, as
children get over the whooping cough. Our pallid visages began to
resume their life hue, and our mouths to relax into smiles. We soon
got our appetites aboard, and after we had been ten days at sea each
man was able to eat his full allowance. Fair winds and pleasant
weather spread cheerfulness around; and as we four stood together one
fine moonlight night just forward of the gang-way watching the
sparkling
sea and gemmed skies, we remarked to one another that it was
not after all so bad an affair to go to sea!
We found Mr. Bedrick, who got well the last of all, disposed to be
pleasant; and as we had our meals in the cabin and lived pretty well,
we said nothing more about the steerage. In fact, we had become
quite reconciled to it, for with a lantern it was light enough, and we
had arranged it so that it had quite a neat appearance. Our berths
were good mattresses, and each of us had a blanket. So on the whole,
things were favorable, and we were disposed to put the best light upon
the matter. Captain Pright, now that the bustle of leaving port was
over, proved to be a pretty clever sort of a man, though very illiterate,
and wanting in many of the deceucies which are the salt of social
intercourse
.
He would swear profanely, he would blow his nose with
his fingers at table, pick his teeth with his fork and then stick it into
a piece of bread and hand it to you, he would drink out of the pitcher,
and after wiping his knife clean on his tongue would cut butter with it
and help you! But these were minor points; and people at sea,
especially
those who sleep in the steerage, should not be two particular.
Captain Pright was a fair specimen of a great many sea-captains who
command vessels of a smaller class. He had risen from a cabin boy
through all the stations to the command. He boasted that he had
been to school but three months, and that he went to sea in his twelfth
year, and had been attached to some vessel or other ever since. He
was a man about forty, rudely framed, rough visaged, with a snub
nose, little grey eyes, a dark complexion, and very low born looking.
He was imperious in command, and was fully sensible of the vast power
that the law allows a captain to hold in his his hands, a power
elsewhere
in the social sphere unparalleled. Every sea-captain once on
blue water is an autocrat in power, and many of them become the
most despicable tyrants over the handful of men whom circumstances
have placed under their control. Passengers, indeed, do not always
escape the exercise of their power, for `on board my ship I am king'
is more than once hinted into their ears. Yet, at the bottom, Captain
Pright possessed several good points of character which subsequently
manifested themselves in our favor.
The character of Mr. Bedrick I shall leave for future notice. I will
however, describe my fellow clerks. Henricus Hewitt, the eldest, was
the son of a highly respectable merchant in the town in which the
Institution
which we had left was situated. He was about nineteen, but
looked as if he was full twenty-one. He was tall and loosely put
together
,
and was at times ludicrously ungainly in his movements. At
heart he was one of the best fellows; he had good sense combined with
a simplicity that to those who did not know him seemed stupidity; yet
out of this apparent dullness sparkled from time to time the brightest
wit. He had a heavy, dark brow, and a large, quiet eye of a bright
brown color. His smile was pleasing and he was universally
good-natured
.
He would bear a joke, and was sometimes made the butt of
our superabundance of gay spirits. He had embarked on this
adventure
first, from a desire to see the world, and next, from the love of
money, for which he had already manifested quite a covetous affection.
As a scholar, he had been above mediocrity, though we soon found
that there was no affinity between his tongue and the tongue Spanish.
Radsworth was also of a highly respectable family, his father having
been a General in the army during the last war. Radsworth was
ambitious
,
spirited, adventurous; and being just about to enter upon some
pursuit when Mr. Bedrick's letter came, at once resolved to embrace
the opportunity of embarking upon the theatre of active business
presented
to him under the novel coloring of a foreign clerk-ship. His
imagination, as my own had been, was fired by the pictures of life
which rose up to his mind from the pages of travellers' books which he
had read, and without more reflection he gave himself to the
expedition
.
He was a little over eighteen, of a manly height, fair
complexion
,
full blue eyes, rather too wide open to be handsome, and square
cheeks and chin. He was light, active, and in vigorous health, as
indeed
we all were, In character he was without reproach, being truly
upright and moral. In spirits he was cheerful, and inclined to take
the world as he found it. In heart he was kind and brave, and faithful
to those who confided in him.
CHAPTER VIII.
Calm on the Equator.
In
the preceding chapter I described two of my companions of the
voyage and also the Captain of the brig. I will now give my readers
a portrait of the remaining one, George Fairfax. He was a young man
about nineteen, bold, daring, quick of temper, and quicker of speech.
He was nearly related to a Senator in Congress, and the Governor of
his native State. He was a good scholar in mathematics, and knew
something of navigation. He had been once to the West Indies as a
sort of supercargo in one of his uncle's vessels, and therefere had a
knowledge of the sea which none of us could boast of. In person he
was stout built, about the middle height, with a clear gray eye full of
decision and fire. There was in him something of the dare devil,
although
he was by no means vicious. He had a high sense of his
own rights, and was very firmly resolved never to relinquish them to
any man.
The eldest son of Mr. Bedrick, Ned, or Edwin, had been in Harvard,
and left to accompany his father. He was about two and twenty, with
light flaxen hair, a very light, sandy complexion, full fleshy cheeks,
and small blue eyes, which were most of the time peering inquisitively
at you through a pair of gold mounted glasses. He was stoutly made,
with a slight roundness of the shoulders, dressed in black, and wore a
plain gold ring on his little finger. He knew Greek, he knew Latin,
he knew Spanish, he knew all languages. He was a great talker, very
vain, very conceited, very arrogant, very self-assuming, very much
wanting in natural common sense. He would have lorded it over each
of us if he could have done so. He tried it, but found that it would
not do. But I will not anticipate events.
His brother William was in his twentieth year, and his opposite in
tooks and character. He was a dark complexioned young man, with
the blackest, sharpest eye ever set in a man's head. His hair was
black as a ravin's. He looked like a handsome young Turk. He had
a finely moulded figure, supple and athletic. His face expressed
resolution
and wild daring. He looked like one who would engage heart
and hand in any reckless adventure. He was one whom it would
have been dangerous to have had for an enemy; yet who would prove
a fast friend.
Such then were the companions among whom my destiny had placed
me. The first fifteen days out every thing went on smoothly,
excepting
the little cross-grained occurrences of the first day, already
mentioned
.
We had by this time got to know something of one another,
and fallen into a certain round of habits and employment for passing
the time. I studied navigation and kept a journal. Fairfax played
the flute, helped the sailors in the duty and made perpetual motion
machines out of shingles. Hewitt did nothing all day but pore over
his Spanish, forgetting the next day all he had learned the day before,
yet persevering against hope. Radsworth read and studied Spanish
and talked literature with the elder son of Mr. Bedrick. We all had
onr Spanish to look after, and the elder son was our teacher, and
daily we made more or less proficiency. I took kindly to the
language
,
and when I had mastered its chief difficulties I pursued it with
delight.
`Old Bedrick,' as we had got to denominate `the Foreign
Merchant
,'
passed his time mostly in the cabin writing and looking over
old accounts. He did not hesitate to call upon us to overhaul his
trunks and boxes and bring and carry for him precisely as if we were
his servants; but we had plenty of time on our hands and did not
refuse
to obey him, though he might have asked his sons, who never did
any thing. If, by chance, he called on either of them to bring him
what he wanted, they would invariably pass the errand over to one of
us. We bore all this quietly before them, but in the retirement of our
steerage we did not fail to express our disapprobation and displeasure.
We had found ourselves treated rather as menials than the sons of
gentlemen
,
and our spirits rose against it. We consoled ourselves,
however
,
with the hope that after we reached Buenos Ayres things would
change and we should be treated as became our positions as Clerks in
the House of a Foreign Merchant! for, be it observed, we attached no
little credit to this distinction, regarding ourselves as quite a notch and
a little more above domestic clerks.
At length one day old Bedrick, whom we liked less and less the
more his character displayed itself before us and to us, called Hewitt
into the cabin and told him that he wished him to make his berth up
every morning and take care of hir state-room. As Hewitt was of a
quiet turn of temper and had a good deal of simplicity of character, the
old man doubtless thought that he would comply without a demurrer.
But he had no sooner proposed this menial service to him, than with
flashing eyes Hewitt responded to him so as to be heard distinctly by
me in the steerage, where I was engaged in sewing up a hole I had
torn in the knee of my trousers trying to get aloft one of the
futtockshrouds
.
`Sir, I am no serving-man. I am astonished and amazed that you
should presume to make such a proposition to me, sir. Mr. Bedrick I
am on board this brig as a cabin passenger, and you put me into the
steerage. I yielded without a word. You have since called upon me
and my friends to do many things which your sons refused to do. I
look upon myself quite as good as they, and have quite as delicate
tingers. Sir, I consider myself your clerk. No clerk of yours shall
through me be so degraded as to become a bed maker. I have too
high a regard for you, sir, to suffer it. I hold your reputation in too
high consideration to have it said that Mr. Bedrick's clerks were
nothing
more than servants. This, sir, is my objectionmy sole objection
to complying with your request!'
When Hewitt had ended this speech which he had commenced in
anger but ended with a smile under his tongue, he went on deck
leaving
the old man quite thunderstruck.
`What a set of graceless rascallions I have got into my hands, or
rather that they have got me into theirs,' he muttered. `I am half a
mind to horse-whip them all round!'
This speech we did not hear, but it was reported to us the same night
by the colored steward, who was our friend, we having clubbed
together
and paid him a quarter of a dollar spiece one sunny morning as
a bonus of more to follow if he behaved himself.
Hewitt had no sooner got on deck than Ned, our Spanish master,
met him and looking very pale with rage demanded to know why he
had dared to insult his father.
`Your father has insulted me,' answered Henricus firmly.
`You are all a set of
`Of
what
?' I demanded poking my head up from the steerage hatch,
for I had sprang up to go to the deck when I heard Hewitt leave the
cabin. As I put the interrogative demand I caught his eye and his
tongue faltered.
`No matter what,' he added. `If I was father I would make you'
`
What?
' repeated Fairfax sternly.
He made no answer, but turning on his heel descended into the
cabin. Bill soon followed him, and there they remained a long while,
doubtless discussing us. This little event originated a feeling of
mutual
suspicion and ill will between us; and placed us in the position
of two antagonistic parties. For several days the old man scarcely
spoke a word to either of us and then only with angry brevity, while
his eldest born maintained a dignified silence. He even refused to
hear our Spanish lessons; but as we had mastered our pronunciation
we got along very well with our grammars without his aid.
For nearly a week this state of things continued, when there came
on a terrific storm. The brig labored heavily for many hours, and at
length carried away her main-topgallant mast with the yard and sail.
The sea broke over us with a clear arch, and on sounding the well
we found we had ten inches of water in the hold. This alarming state
of things called all our energies forth. The water was increasing, and
we knew that if the storm lasted twelve hours longer we should go to the
bottom. All the hands were employed about the decks or loft, and we
were called upon to man the brakes of the pumps. I took the handle
with old Mr. Bedrick and Hewitt. Fairfax worked a brake with
Spanish Bedrick, as we called the eldest son, and this contiguity of
labor with the mutual danger did wonders towards removing the
ill-feeling
which had sprung up between us. The fear of death destroyed
all enmity, and kind words took the place of contention. The leak
was finally discovered and stopped, and the storm abaiting with the
rising sun, we were relieved from the apprehension of going to the
bottom of the ocean with the life-blood flowing warmly in our veins
and our hearts beating strong with health.
The storm was a true pacificator, and for some days all went on
smoothly. We were on good terms with one another; our Spanish
lessons were pursued with industry; we played at draughts with the
old gentleman, and backgammon with Spanish Ned.
As we approached the Southern latitudes the weather became
delightful
.
There was a purity in the atmosphere wholly unknown to me
before. The air was soft, and it was a pleasure to inhale it. We had
run from Boston nearly a due Easterly course until we came near the
Western Islands, when we struck the trade winds and carried them
with us down to within three degrees of the equator. Here they died
away, or came only at fitful intervals, accompanied by squalls and
torrents
of rain. Here, for the first time, we understood what a calm
was. When within about a degree of the line, we were deserted by
every wind. For several days not a zephr ruffled the glassy mirror of
the deep. It rolled its long polished billows with a ceaseless swell
upon which we were gently rocked as a gem upon a maiden's bosom
is moved undulatingly upward and downward. The sun was intensely
burning, feeling like a furnace close above our heads. The decks were
so heated that it burned the feet through the sole of the shoe. All
around us was the shining, flashing plain of the slumbering ocean; for
though there may be no wind the sea forever heaves its great heart, as
the heart of a man asleep, nor ceases to rise nor fall. Our sails hung
idly from the yards, and the sailors slept in the shade or indolently
busied their fingers about some light work. At night the sun would
go down in a sea of liquid crystal and rise in the morning from the
same unruffled deep. I was fully able to realize the truth of the
description
of Coleridge's cal ned ship in his `Ancient Mariner;' for
we lay day after day,
`Like a painted ship upon a painted ocean.'
The only relief we had was in occasional showers, which came
upon
us without wind. The rain fell literally in sheets Such descending
floods as we experienced must be seen to be appreciated. The clouds
poured out their treasures with the abundance and force of a cascade.
The sound upon the decks was an incessant roar. The rain drops, in
many instances, were so large and close that they combined in their
fall. and came down in the visible form of flakes of water like
transparent
sheets of glass many inches broad. These showers would last
usually from half an hour to two hours, and then pass away as suddenly
as they came, leaving us to the full power of the fiery equatorial sun.
We varied our monotonous life as well as we could, though before we
had been five days becalmed we had nearly exhausted all our resources,
except quarrelling, which at sea on such occasions, is a never failing
resource for the listless and self-wearied, But Mr. Bedrick seemed
disposed to keep the peace, and conciliate us, and his sons, finding we
were not to be bullied or intimidated, treated us with that degree of
consideration to which we thought ourselves entitled, clerks though
we were to their father. We sometimes went into the sea barbing,
stationing one aloft to keep good look-out for sharks, whose dorsal fin
can be seen a great distance, cleaning the surface ere they approach.
This sea-bathing along side the brig, hundreds of miles from land,
was a novelty, and we enjoyed it greatly. We also amused ourselves
in hanging on the end of the fore studdensail boom and darting the
harpoon into the golden dolphins as they glided slowly past beneath
us. Sometimes a family of porpoises would play across our bows, one
of which was speared and taken on board. I is flesh was served up as
a `rarity,' and was very much like that of a wild hog. Sometimes, at
night, flying fish flew aboard. Hewitt's chief amusement was in
fishing
after mother Cary's chickens with a bit of bread concealing the
point of a pin-hook; but success was not commensurate with his
praiseworthy perseverence.
CHAPTER IX.
Crossing the Line.
As
it is not my purpose to write a history of my voyage, other
matters
of more interest calling for my pen, I shall only here and there
touch upon incidents connected with the passage out. The main
interest
of my story will be found to commence as we enter the La Plata
River.
How we got across the `Line' I have no idea, for from the time we
reached the third degree north latitude till we got two hundred miles
south of it we had scarcely a breath of air; yet Captain Pright kept
her nose sticking south and south she made her way. We were,
however
,
nine days accomplishing the five degrees, where calms and storms
forever seem to reign.
I remember that before we came to the equator, about a degree and
a half above it, the north star set in the north. It had been daily, as it
progressed southwesterly, getting lower and lower till it trembled in
the horizon; but when at length night came and I looked from the
deck for `this great light-house of the world,' I felt a sadness and
loneliness come upon my heart as I saw that it had disappeared behind
the round globe. I now, for the first time, realized my distance from
my native land. I felt that I was indeed beneath other skies; and
other skies were really over me and around me. As the northern arch
of the heavens receded from the eye the south lifted its glorious
universe
of constellations to our admiring gaze. The southern cross for
the first time glittered upon our sight with a thousand brighter stars
all unfamiliar to our vision. The Magellan clouds began to rise above
the southwestern horizon and fill our minds with wonder. We
seemed to have passed from one globe to snother, whenever we gazed
upon new heavens, all was so new, so strange, so wonderously
beautiful
.
The usual custom of paying a tax to `Neptune' upon crossing the
line, was by no means omitted in the present instance. The idea that
something might be done to kill the dullness of the calmness revived
us all. The tribute to the king with the sea-green beard, is paid only
by the `green-ones,' that is, those luckless wights who have never
before `crossed the line.' As the hour approached that the quadrant
told us we should be upon it. all was preparation among us. There
were none in the cabin or steerage, who had ever been across the line,
save the Captain and the mate, and as we were not disposed to tax
ourselves, we combined to select for a victim a `green one' among the
erew, a poor unfortunate loafer who had by some ill-luck shipped in
our brig, though he had never seen salt water before. The sailors all
participated in the sport with that readiness which always characterizes
them when `a lark' is on foot.
One of their number, a good-natured, mischief loving old tar, vol
unteered to presonate `Old Nep!' We got him down into the
steerage
and dressed him for the `part.' In the first place, we covered his
head with a magnificent red turban ingeniously made by means of a
red shirt folded with much taste. In the front of it was stuck a feather
fan, which Hewitt had in his trunk, and which he said had been given
him by `the prettiest girl he had ever seen!' He surrendered it with
manifest reluctance; but the majority prevailed, and he was forced to
yield it for the occasion.
About his cheeks and chin a huge beard woven of oakum was
suspended
.
It reached to his hips and had a formidable appearance. A
pair of enormous spectacles were out out of a piece of sole leather
and were mounted upon the bridge of his nose. They were without
glasses, but doubtless this was an improvement, as it would be in most
cases where spectacles are set astride the nose, to supply, we fear too
often, the lack oi windows in the brain; for spectacles are the insignia
of windows we believe.
We then manufactured a non-descript garment of old bags for our
Neptune, in style something like an extremely long shirt, around the
bottom was a such fringe a foot deep of oakum. In his right hand we
placed a harpoon, and in his left a tin cup. We had nearly finished
his toilet, when Fairfax came below with his arms filled with sea-weed,
a floating vegetable production with long hairy fibres laden with
straw-colored
berries which often covers the sea about the equator for miles,
looking at a distance like an island of yellow sand. This was what we
wanted to complete our character. We trimmed him with it from
head to foot, so that he looked like the genus of the sea clad in his-own
proper regalia.
At length Captain Pright with a smile announced to us that the brig
was about on the equator, at least within a mile or so of it. This
announcement
was made forward, and the `green hand' was called up to
see
the line. He took his station on the cat-head and strained his eyes
now ahead, now to penetrate the depth of water, one of them having
suggested that it might have sunk a little under the surface. I had
gone forward to see the joke; and I have never been more amused
with simplicity combined with honest credulity than in this young
Vermonter's
case. Faith in the existence of a visible `line,' was plainly
distinguishable in his visage. Thinking it a pity that such hearty
faith should go unrewarded I went aft, and after borrowing the
Captain's
spy glass, fastened a black thread across the glass and then called
him to the gangway to take a look through the spy glass and see if he
could not make out `the line!'
`It is very small, just as you see it on the maps,' said I gravely as I
handed him the glass.
He had no sooner fairly got it to his eye than he brought his foot
down upon the deck with a stout thump and opened his countenance
with a broad grin of satisfaction.
`I see it, by jiggers!' was his ever memorable exclamation of
unmingled
delight. `It looks for all the world just like it does on the
school-map. Well, I never expected to see the Equator!'
`I hope you are satisfied with the sight!' asked Hewitt drawing up
his nose with a snuffle.
`Yes, I would n't have lost the sight for a quarter of a dollar'
`There is something more for you to see,' I said, quietly drawing his
attention away from the forecastle, out of which I saw `Neptune'
coming
to the deck, having gone forward from the steerage between decks.
Between him and `the victim' stood several of the men to screen him
from view till he should get over the bows. He succeeded in getting
over the head-board unseen, and when I saw the top of `Hewitt's fan'
disappear below the bulwark, I asked my man if he had ever heard of
Neptune.
`Oh, yes, I've heard of him afore I come aboard here; and then
I've heard the men talk about him; but don't think I am to be taken
in with that story. I don't believe there's such a chap a-livin'. I know
there's a `line' coz I've seed it through the spyin' glass with my own
eyes, but I ain't quite so green as to believe there's a human half-horse
half-fish kritter as is king o' the sea and lives on the line!'
`You ought not to doubt it,' said Hewitt. `Neptune is a
confoundedly
jealous fellow. He might, if he heard you, come and call you to
account.'
`You know,' said Fairfax, `that the line is his toll-gate. If he did
n't choose to let ships go by they wouldn't be able to pass it.'
`What's that little black line! It don't look bigger than a hair!' he
said with incredulous contempt.
`That is nothing. It goes round the world and is stronger than a
chain-cable,' said Radsworth. `He used once to stop every vessel that
went by and made them pay toll!'
`So I heard the men say, but I thought they was gullin' me!' he
answered
beginning to believe.
`No they were not. But he don't take toll now of any vessels
except
they have people on board that never have crossed his dominions.
Then he comes aboard of them and demands toll,' said Fairfax; while
Mr. Bedrick, the Captain and mate, and the tars were seated or
standing
near by, loitering and enjoying the joke.
`What kind o' toll does he take? inquired the victim with earnest
interest.
`Grog always,' answered Bill Bedrick. `If there is n't any grog he
then shaves and takes off the beard instead. He has a great fondness
for beards, as you will allow should you ever be on board a vessel that
he should visit.'
`I don't care to be. But I know you are all laughing at me,' he
said half in doubt, half believing.
`Let Neptune himself say whether we are joking,' I called out
suddenly
in a loud tone; for I had been made chief manager of the `play.'
As I spoke `the watery god' made his appearance coming over the
bows. To complete his character, the old tar had fairly dipped himself
into the sea, and now came in sight dripping with brine. The
representation
was perfect, and startled even Mr. Bedrick and the Captain,
who had never before seen him. The `god' came slowly aft; all eyes
fixed upon the `green hand' alternately. Behind him came two
attendants
,
covered with sea weed from head to foot. To describe the
look of consternation, surprise, horror and amazement that appeared
upon his face would be impossible. He started back, became as pale
as a sheet and trembled in every limb. He looked round to us for
aidfor sympathy! He saw in all our faces well-feigned looks of fear
and awe.
Neptune came slowly on with heavy tread, and striking his tridant
(harpoon) upon the deck at every step. He came within six feet of us,
acd then looking round, sternly demanded the name of the brig that
had entered his domains. Captain Pright replied promptly.
`Have you any seamen on board who have never before crossed my
territories?'
`I have one only,' answered the Captain.
`You need not point him out. I know the faces of all that I once
have seen. Here stands the man. So, sir mortal what is your name?'
`Seth Bliss,' answered the victim, with a whine of the most pitable
apprehension.
`How old are you?'
`Twenty-three last hayin' time!'
`Have you ever been this far from home before?'
`No, I ain't, and I hope I never 'll be agen. If you 'll let me go
this time, good Mr. Neptune, I'll never come this way again.'
`I must have my toll. Do you see this silver cup?'
`It is a tin one, ain't it, sir?'
`I say do you see this
gold
cap?' repeated Neptune sternly.
`Yes, I see it. 'T is gold!'
`I want it filled to the brim with grog. This is the toll I demand
of all who cross my domains. Fill it, and then I will let the brig go on
her way.'
`I hain't any grog, Mr. Neptune. The Capt'n keeps all the grog,
and ony lets us have a gill a day.'
`Then if you have no grog to bestow upon me, I must have your
bread. Seize him, and bind him, and bring me a razor, lather and
hot water! Dare any mortal presume to cross my domains without
preparing himself with the toll that all the world has paid to me from
time immemorial? Seize the presumptuous man, and let me take off
his thin-faced beard for him!'
Two of the sailors, who had attired themselves in sea weed to act as
his attendants, now seized him and placed him in a tub half filled with
sea water. One of them got a piece of an iron hoop and presented it
to Father Neptune: while the other brought a bucket of tar in which
was a swob made of oakum. A volunteer brought, also, a pan of slush.
The victim looked as if he was about to have his throat cut. He called
loudly on us for aid, and then implored `Mr. Neptune' to have mercy.
He loudly entreated the Captain to let him have the grog and take the
value out of his wages! But all his cries were addressed to insensible
ears, sorry am I to say it. His mouth was stopped with the slush with
which his face was well besmeared by a zealous sailor: then followed
a coat of tar with the swob. When he was well lathered `Neptune'
began to shave him with great dignity.
`Don't hurt me, father Neptune,' cried the poor fellow.
`I'll be as gentle as a lady!' and here the iron hoop came down
across his face with an energy that made the victim groan audibly.
The operation of `shaving' lasted about ten minutes, for the `old man
of the sea' was desirous, as he said, of leaving the face perfectly clean.
At length the operation being ended, the victim was allowed to get up.
Neptune then gave him a few words of good advice, and, followed by
his two minions, who looked like moving monsters of sea weed,
disappeared
over the bows as he had come. We now hurried Seth below
to the steerage, both to help the poor fellow relieve himself of his tar,
for Neptune had not proved himself after all a neat barber, and also to
give the sailor who had personated the character an opportunity to
come in-board and descend unseen by him to the forecastle.
We comforted Seth with a stiff glass of grog and with our
sympathies
.
Nothing was ever said to lead him to doubt the reality of
Neptune's
existence, and to this day, these is little question but that he as
firmly believes that there is a Neptune, as he does that there is an
equatorial line!
CHAPTER X.
Land ho!
After
we had got about two hundred miles south of the equator,
we fell in with the south-easterly Trades, and once more moved
steadily
and swiftly on our course. We were not many hundred miles
from the coast of Africa for many days sail; it being the custom of
ships in going to South America to keep well to the Eastward, to avail
themselves of the Trades, which blow from the coast of Europe
northeasterly
,
and from the coast of Africa south-easterly. The two winds
do not approach each other by seven or eight degrees, which space is
in the region of the Equator, and wherein reign calms and rains, squalls
and fiery heat.
Having well passed this fitful region, and once more feeling the
influence
of a steady wind which blows for weeks from one quarter, we
rapidly run down our latitude. Nothing of importance occurred until
we were in thirty south, when one morning we saw a water-spout about
a league to leeward. Its shape was that like a huge speaking trumpet
hanging from the clouds. Its smaller end nearly touched the sea
which was in the wildest confusion beneath it. At length, it suddenly
shot upward a slender column of water and joined it, thus binding the
clouds and the sea in a strange union. The conjoined column we
soon saw was in rapid motion, and in the direction of our vessel, its
progress being dead to windward. We watched its approach with no
little apprehension until it came within half a mile when it wheeled
and moved several points away from us, but advancing like a race horse,
its roar distinctly reaching our ears. Its path was marked with foam.
Above it was a jet black cloud, from the bosom of which it hung and
which supplied it with its volume of water. Suddenly a flash of
lightning
darted from the cloud followed by a sharp clap of thunder.
Instantly
the tall crystal link that bound heaven and earth together parted
in mid air, half ascended rapidly and lost its form in the cloud, while
the other section descended into the sea with the noise of billows
dashing
against rocks.
The same afternoon we for the first time saw a whale. It was ahead
of us when first discovered, laying motionless upon the surface,
occasionally
sending a jet of water into the air. As we advanced on our
course and came near the hebemoth, he disappeared, slowly sinking
beneath the surface, lashing the sea with his tail as he went down.
In a little while we heard him blowing astern of us, and looking round
saw his huge bulk half exposed and rolling upon the waves like some
island adrift. He took his way to the westward, and was soon
hulldown
in the blue distance.
The following day I was so fortunate as to spear a dolphin. It had
been swimming along side for some time, and I had entertained myself
with watching his graceful movements, keeping up with the vessel
seemingly without any effort. In the water when the sun strikes upon
his sides as he turns to it, his colors are very beautiful; but it is when
he is lying on deck and dying that he presents that splendid appearance
which has made him so celebrated. Watching my opportunity with
the `grains' in my hand, I succeeded in throwing it with such
accuracy
as to spear him. He struggled with a surprising outlay of strength,
but with the aid of some of my fellow-passengers he was hauled
inboard
.
I never saw any thing so beautiful as the hue his scales
presented
as he was expiring. They were like those in the lining of some
rich Indian pearl, varied by the most dazzling prismatic changes.
We found that his flesh or meat, (has the language no word?) his
fish
was very delicately flavored, though something dry. It was similar
in appearance and taste to the pickerel.
The next day we fell in with an English ship loaded with emigrants,
bound to Buenos Ayres. She came so close to us that we could see
the groups of poor emigrants crowding her decks in scores. The
Captain, as the wind was light, came on board of us, gave us some
English newspapers, took some of our American papers in exchange,
had a glass of wine in the cabin with the Captain and Mr. Bedrick,
and then returned to his own clumsy, slow sailing ship, the sails of
which were old and brown, and looking anything but tidy. I have
always observed the inferior appearance of English merchant vessels
compared with ours. They are wanting in that cleanliness and
comfort
that characterizes the American. The Captains, too, generally
are a rude, coarse set of men, without refinement and indifferent to it.
This English brig and its Captain, suffered by comparison with our
brig, and our Captain, though we had not much to boast of in this
way.
At length, we had run down our latitude, and the Captain gave
orders
to square away the yards for the mouth of the river La Plata.
The idea of soon seeing the coast of South America, and putting an
end to our long voyage, which had now been fifty-six tedious days in
length, filled us with hope and joy. We moved speedily on our new
course for five days, when one morning after breakfast, the Captain
electrified us all by giving the order for a man to go aloft and keep
sharp look out for land.
The man went not up alone. We all followed, some ascending to
the main, some to the foreroyalmast head. We could, however,
discover
nothing around us but the wide circle of the blue ocean, and far
in the south-western horizon a faint white spec which we knew to be
a sail, and reported on deck accordingly. The Captain took his glass
and swept the horizon, but he could not see it on deck on account of
the curvature of the earth, or rather the ocean. To a landsman the
difference that a few feet elevation at sea makes in viewing a distant
object, is always surprising when experienced for the first time. He
does not easily conceive that the are of the circumference of the earth
can be manifest within the scope of a human eye. Yet experience
proves that it is apparent across a few leagues' surface. We could,
from aloft, see an object on the horizon that from the deck was
invisible
even with a telescope. The telescope would have had to see
over the verge of the earth's peripheny to take it within its range. A
few feet up the rattlings will make a perceptible difference. I have
seen from deck all the sails of a ship sailing along the horizon, but the
ship herself was under the verge. By going twenty feet up the mast I
rose above the arching swell of the globe sufficiently to bring in sight
her hull. I have often amused myself with watching through the glass
vessels far distant whose topsails only were visible.
The sail that was now discovered, in two hours afterwards came so
near as to be made out a whaler from Nantucket. She spoke us, asked
the news, and passed on, saying she was to touch at Rio Janeiro. By
her we despatched letters home, with the faint hope that they would
ever get to the hands of our friends. But they were all received about
three months after we had spoken the ship.
Our look-out kept aloft, occasionally relieved until noon, when, just
as the Captain was taking the sun, he called out that cheering cry
which has made thousand of hearts leap with joy,
`Land ho!'
`Land ho!' was echoed by every voice on board; and for a moment
all was joyous confusion aft; though the seamen I noticed betrayed no
emotion. To them it is the same whether making or leaving port.
The sea is their home, and they are alike indifferent what shores they
make or over what nameless oceans they wander. They know not the
landsman's joy at the sight of land!
We now went aloft, and from the main royal yard I was able to
make out a faint brown line in the west, but so dim, so remote, so high
up in the air (as it seemed) that I knew not whether to call it land or
cloud. But gradually it developed itself from the line of sky and sea,
between which it was suspended, and after an hour's watching I
thought I was able to detect wavy outlines that might be eminences or
might be imagination.
The Trades had left us two days before, and we wee now
dependant
on such winds as pleased to blow us along. These were fickle,
as winds usually are, the kind `Trades' always excepted; and we had
not sailed an hour and a half after the land was made before the breeze
died away, leaving our sails flapping, and our hopes of getting into the
river before night, fast evaporating.
Captain Pright looked the very picture of ill-humor and discontent.
At one moment he would swear at the wind, at another at the brig,
and then give the seamen a regular dg all round by way of
variety
.
Mr. Bedrick was cross, and we were one and all very much
vexed with the wind for dying away, instead of being thankful and
happy that we had got in sight of land. But such is human nature.
We forget our blessings the moment fortune frowns upon us. The
sunshine is no more remembered when darkness and storms follow.
Men are grumblersgood for nothing ungrateful grumblers! With
enough to fill our hearts with gratitude, for bringing us in sight of the
coast to which we were bound, we made ourselves wretched because
the wind had left us in sight of it. I dare say we should have been
less angry had we been becalmed an hour before the land was
discovered
.
The calm lasted the whole day. The sun set in a glassy sea of fire.
The moon rose, but with it rose not the expected wind. All night we
lay upon the bosom of the deep wooing the winds. None of us could
sleep for asking every half hour if `the wind had sprung up?' The
Captain walked the deck all night whistling, and set the sailors to
whistling for a wind. Morning dawned; the sun rose, but with it did
not come the breeze the Captain prophecied. The land, too, had
disappeared. A man was sent aloft, but could see nothing of it. The
current setting out of the river combined with the ebb of the tide had
effected us where we were and drifted us to sea again!
Upon the discovery of this fact the disappointment and ill-humor
increased. No one spoke civilly to his neighbor. The tempers of all
had been soured by a long voyage of nearly sixty days, and also by
certain events that will be narrated in the next chapter.
At length the wind came gently from the South, and by noon we
once more made the land, which proved to be Cape St. Mary's. The
brig held on slowly until we were able to distinguish objects upon it.
The sight of this place, the day before, had filled us with deep
emotions
of joy. `Land! dear land!' It was happiness to gaze upon it.
It now proved to be a barren and bleak spot, destitute of trees, and of
a pale green hue, yet to our eyes so long weaned from earth it seemed
a paradise. Our imaginations invested it with every beauty of scenery,
and we felt that if we could place our feet upon it our earthly bliss
would receive its consummation. The very smell of the land which
came off to us many leagues was more grateful than the aroma borne
on the gales of Arabia. We did nothing now but hang over the
vessel's
side and gaze upon it. The water now assumed a grayish dingy
appearance, and the lead was hove into the sea to ascertain the depth.
Nearer and nearer we came to the Cape, and at length were able to
distinguish the tower of a low light house, and near it something that
we guessed was a human habitation. About an hour before sunset we
entered the river passing within a mile and a half of the low Cape upon
which with the glass we made out a man half-naked, mounted on
horseback
,
and watching us.
The southern cape of the river being many leagues from the
northern
,
was visible to us; the river being at its mouth like a bay in
breadth. The moon rose above the dark land on our right for the
first time in sixty days that we had not seen it emerge from the water.
As we ascended the river we could hear the welcome sound of dogs
barking upon the shore; and here and there in the interior shone fires
which had been lighted for some purpose unknown to us four `clerks,'
but which we had no little curiosity to learn; for whatever we saw or
heard now, were subjects of no indifferent interest to us, thus for the
first time entering the waters and skirting the shores of a foreign
land.
CHAPTER XI.
The Deception.
Having
now arrived near the termination of our voyage, we were
moved by various emotions with the prospect of soon landing at the
city of Buenos Ayres, which was about two hundred miles up the river
we had just entered. To enable the reader fully to enter into our
peculiar feelings, I will now go back to a period about ten days
previous
to our making Cape St. Mary's, the northernmost cape of the
La Plata.
After the storm and the imminent peril in which our lives were
placed and which led to kinder feelings, we got on very well for about
twenty-six or seven days, the general harmony only interrupted by
those short squalls of ill-humor that will take place in the best regulated
cabins where passengers get tired of the voyage, themselves, and
especially
of their fellow-passengers. We had, however, discovered our
Mr. Bedrick to be a man of violent temper, and supremely selfish, and
disposed to be arrogant in the exercise of his authority over us four
young men. His eldest son, too, we had found vain, conceited,
assuming
,
and with great pretentions to universal knowledge, withal
extremely
ignorant. The brother Bill we found to be fiery, reckless,
indifferent whom he offended, and perfectly independent of his father
and of every body else, doing just what his wild and wayward will
dictated.
Yet we got along pretty well with all three without coming to an
open rupture, though we had to forbear a good deal with each of them.
At length, as I have said, about ten days before we entered the river,
a violent quarrel took place in the cabin between Captain Pright and
Mr. Bedrick. What the cause of it was we never exactly understood,
but from a few words we overheard, we supposed that it related to the
payment of our passage out.
In a little while the Captain came on deck looking as black as a
thunder cloud. He had a cigar in his mouth which instead of lighting
he walked the deck chewing at the end with the utmost zeal. Every
little while he would burst out with an oath, and then pace the deck
again. The Bedrick in spectacles had run down into the cabin as
soon as the Captain came on deck; but Bill, who was stretched upon
the larboard hen-coop reading a novel, paid no attention to what was
passing. It seemed to be altogether indifferent with him whether his
father knocked the Captain down, or the Captain his father; for he
had had regular quarrels with both within the last twenty-four hours.
As for ourselves, we did not love `the merchant' so well as to be sorry
to see him in a difficulty; and besides, a flare-up like this greatly
relieved
the tedium of the voyage.
For some days past Captain Pright had treated us four with more
than ordinary consideration. We had discovered that, as he grew cold
towards Mr. Bedrick and his sons, he warmed kindly towards
ourselves
.
We were, therefore, likely to be gainers by the present
tremendous
outbreak. So we remained quietly awaiting the issue. I
was engaged by the capstan, which I used as a table, in making a
pencil
drawing of the brig; Radsworth seated upon a coil of rigging, in
studying navigation; Hewitt bothering his brain over his Spanish
grammar, and Fairfax lying at his length smoking under the lee of the
weather bulwarks with his head in the bight of the foretopsail braces
for a pillow. The Captain paced the deck untll he had munched up
half the length of his cigar, and then throwing it away took another
and called the cook to bring him a coal of fire. He now began to walk
and smoke. The difference between chewing a cigar and smoking it
was very soon apparent in the change that took place in his
countenance
.
The cloud gradually passed off as if it had been ejected
through his lips in the shape of tobacco smoke, and he began to look
composed. At length, he paused in his walk, and looked at us with
an expression as if he had something to say to us. But he turned
away without speaking, glancing at the younger Bedrick as if he did
not care he should hear what he had to communicate. By and by
Edwin Bedrick came on deck, his face as pale as ashes with anger.
He looked at the Captain as if he would like to annihilate him.
Captain
Pright smiled with malicious pleasure. Bedrick acted as if he
wished to give vent to his displeasure upon him, but was prevented by
that discretion which is known by the name of `fear.'
`So, you don't like it that I have called your father an old rascal,'
said the Captain quietly; for I suppose he has made his complaints to
his petted son.'
`You are no gentleman to abuse an old man like my father! A man
of the highest respectability, sir,' cried Bedrick.
`
Very
respectable,' answered the Captain contemptuously.
`You shall apologise to him for calling him an old rascal! Brother
Bill, do you care nothing att seeing your honored father insulted!
Captain Pright has had the audacity to call him an old rascal!'
`Well, I dare say Captain Pright knows him quite as well as we do!'
answered Bill dryly.
At this reply, we all laughed so heartily that Edwin Bedrick in great
rage, began to rate us roundly, calling us ungrateful and without
good manners, and that when we got to Buenos Ayres we should pay
for it!
We made no reply, but laughed at his threats, and made up our
minds within ourselves that we would not `pay for it' when we got to
Buenos Ayres. At length Captain Pright interposed his authority,
and told Bedrick if he did not be quiet he would `put him in
irons!'
This threat silenced him, and he went grumbling below to talk over
the affair with his father.
`Let me once get the boys there,' we overheard the old man say
among other words, `and I will let 'em know who's master.'
`Yes,' answered his son; `here Captain Pright snstains them. By
the Lord! when we once get them out of the vessel, we'll make '
em
smart for it, father.'
`Here that, my lads?' said the Captain, looking at us and winking.
He then came towards us and said in an under tone:
`I want you all to be on deck to-night in my watch. Bedrick and
the boys will be turned in. You must come up one by one without
disturbing any of them, for I have got something to tell you, that you
ought to hear.'
We promised to obey him; and then went forward and began to
discuss the matter and try to guess the subject upon which he was to
speak with us. At length the sun set, the night advanced towards
twelve o'clock, when the Captain would come on deck, for he took
the middle watch. We had all turned in by ten o'clock, but as soon
as we heard eight bells, we began to turn out and steal on deck. The
night was clear, with a bright moon that made the brig look as if
covered
with a cloud of snow. After the larboard watch had gone below
and the starboard had taken the deck, the helmsman relieved, and
every thing quiet, we went aft to where the Captain was standing
smoking
his cigar, which was never out of his lips.
`Well, my lads,' he said, addressing us in a cordial tone, `I am
glad to see you on deck. The old one is sound asleep, and his sons,
too, I suppose; but to prevent surprises, I will just close the
companion-way
,
so that if they take a fancy to come on deck they may be
heard! Now take seats about me on the hen-coop, and I will tell you
what I have wished to tell you ever since I learned from some of your
conversation I overheard a few days ago, that you were all four
completely
taken in!'
`Taken in?' we exclaimed.
Don't speak so infernal loud,' he said angrily. `I wouldn't have
Bedrick know that I tell you this for all the world! He might make
something of it to get me into trouble. But when I find respectable
young men like yourselves, the victims of deceit and downright fraud,
my danger will get up. The old man is a confounded rascal, and he
has crowned his rascality by deceiving you!'
`How has he deceived us?' we asked, filled with dismay.
`I overhearo you talking together one day about your prospects.
From your words I learned that you had been engaged by Mr. Bedrick
to go out to Buenos Ayres to be clerks in a Mercantile House that he
was to establish there and at Monte Video.'
`Yes,' we answered, `that is what we are engaged for!'
`Well, you see, you will find yourselves confoundedly mistaken, my
lads! When I found from what I heard that you were laboring under
a deception practiced upon you by Bedrick, I came very near
blowing
the whole affair at once and letting you know just what you were
going out to South America for! I saw that you were respectable
young men, from genteel families, and were destined certainly for
something more than was in prospect before you. When I first found
who and what you were, after the first week at sea, I confess I was
surprised that young men of your education and appearance should
have taken up with Mr. Bedrick, and consent to go with him on his
expedition!'
`What expedition then is it? How are we deceived? What does
he want of us?' we demanded, filled with alarm and indignation.
`I will tell you. You expect to become clerks in a respectable
mercantile
establishment. But you are destined for no such thing. Mr.
Bedrick has nothing higher in view on his arrival at Buenos Ayres
than to open a soda-shop!'
`A soda-shop?' we repeated, confounded.
`Don't raise your voices so high, my friends!' said the Captain
warmly. `Yes, you are are destined for nothing more uor less than
to tend soda shops in Buenos Ayres and Monte Video!'
Our amazement was almost without bonds. It was only surpassed
by our indignant anger at the duplicity of which we had been the
victims
.
The announcement, however, was so unexpected and so strange,
that after a moment's reflection, recollecting the Captain's quarrel with
Mr. Bedrick, it occurred to me that he might only desire to injure him.
I, therefore, remarked to the Captain when our excitement had a little
subsided, that I thought he must be laboring under a mistake, for the
cargo in the brig was certainly Mr. Bedrick's.
`Not a dollar of it,' he answered. `Did he tell you so?'
`Yes. He said that he had freighted the brig with his goods for
South America,' was our reply.
You have been thoroughly duped. All the freight he has on board
are four copper soda fountains which you have seen. These are what
he means by his goods for his Commercial House. I tell you truly he
has no interest in the brig or her cargo. He has only these soda
fountains and some jars of lemon syrup, which are all his `stock in
trade!' I had taken him and you out by a previous contract, made
not with him, but with the owners, who are related to him, and who
are glad to get rid of him at any rate whatever. The fact is, he has
been a merchant somewhere in the North, and failed in business some
years ago. Since then he has been fiddling round and doing little or
nothing, and rather a burden upon some rich relatives, one of whom
owns this brig. A few weeks before we sailed, Bedrick heard that
there were no soda-shops in Buenos Ayres, but that one had been set
up by an English adventurer in Rio Janeiro, which took amazingly
with the Brazilians, who paid twenty-five cents a glass for their soda,
and that the adventurer was making a fortune. So, starting on this
idea, Mr. Bedrick proposed to the owner of the brig, who was his
relation, that if he would purchase him four soda fountains, secure
him a passage out to Buenos Ayres, with his sons and three or four
`clerks,' (yourselves, young gentlemen!) he would sail for that country
and no longer burden him. To this project the gentleman at length
acceded. The soda-fountains were bought, and I was to take oat the
whole expedition and land it safely in Buenos Ayres. Where or how
Mr. Bedrick got his `clerks' I never knew until subsequent to your
coming on board. What motive he had in deceiving you I can't
imagine
,
unless it was that he believed (what is true) that it would be
impossible for him to obtain four respectable, trustworthy young men
to embark ten thousand miles to a foreign country to `tend soda-shops.'
He, therefore, disguised the truth that he might get young men he
could confide his `commercial affairs to,' knowing you could not help
yourself after he had got you there!'
`But we will show him that we can help ourselves,' was our resolute
reply. `But how is it,' asked Hewitt `that the merchants in Boston
to whom he referred, sustained him in this deceit?'
`His relative was desirous of getting the old man off his hands and
out of the country, and so gave his name to recommend him; but I
question if he was aware that you were kept ignorant of the precise
nature of the business in which you were to engage when you got to
South America. He would not have been a party to such a deception
as that, much as he might wish to get the old man off. I have thought
it my duty to let you know the whole truth, young gentlemen,'
continued
the Captain; `and all the recompense I ask is that you will not
say a word to any one of the matter while in the brig, whatever you
do after you get ashore. Let not the old man or his sons suspect that
you know the truth, but try and let every thing go quietly on, until we
reach port.'
This we promised to do; and after thanking the Captain warmly
for making known the wicked deception which had been practiced
upon us, we went below, and, seated upon our trunks, began to talk
over together this new aspect of affairs.
CHAPTER XII.
The Spanish Fisherman.
The
astounding intelligence we had received, made a deep
impression
upon us. We got little sleep that night. We talked over the
past the present, and the future. We were not diffident in expressing
our opinion of Mr. Bedrick, who had thus inveigled us into a scheme
which had fraud for its basis. We one and all felt very positive that
`we had souls above soda-shops!' We were convinced thar nature
never intended us to sell foaming glasses sweetened with lemon syrup
to Spaniards or any body else, either at fourpence or twenty-five cents
a glass. In a word, we were justly indignant at the deception which
had been practiced upon us. We regretted our precipitancy in
engaging
with a stranger, but every thing had seemed outwardly fair and
honorable. How to extricate ourselves from the trap in which our
ambition to see foreign countries we had suffered ourselves to be
taken, was now the great theme of consultation. Every night, when
we were alone, we would talk over the whole matter, and devise ways
and means for getting over the difficulty. In the presence of Mr.
Bedrick we were respectful, more so than we had ever been, for we
wished to prevent any suspicion of our knowledge of the true
character
of his mercantile establishment.
We at length resolved, after many secret conclaves, that we would
keep quiet until we reached Buenos Ayres, and then wait upon him in
a body, represent to him our wrongs, and make a public declaration of
our independence of him, his sons, and his abominable soda-shops. I
had in my trunk a letter of introduction from my father to Colonel
Forbes, the American
charge d' affaires
at Buenos Ayres, and on the
strength of this we made up our minds to wait upon Mr. Forbes and
day before him our grievances in full, declare our abjuration of Mr.
Bedrick's authority, and place ourselves at his disposal and advice as
to our future movements.
When we had settled upon this plan, our minds became easier, and
we let the day pass silently, cherishing in our hearts our resolve.
Having this power of redress, we were enabled to appear quite
cheerful
,
and indeed we all were in high spirits. Whenever we came across
one of the soda-fountains in the steerage, we never failed to give it an
emphatic kick expressive of our supreme contempt.
In this way the days went by, the old man unsuspicious of our
knowledge of the truth, and believing that he was leading us like
lambs to the slaughter. But with anticipated redress in our hands, we
laughed at him. We felt a profound satisfaction in punishing him by
depriving him of the `clerks' he had taken such pains to lure away
from their native country. We anticipated with delight his dismay,
his fury, his grief!
There was a question of conscience started by Hewitt whether it
would be right and just for us to take our passage out from him now
that we had decided not to remain with him. But after discussion, it
was decided in the affirmative. Our argument was, that he had
conveyed
us to South America under a fraudulent engagement, and that
he should be the loser by our passage; that if we ever returned to the
United States, it must be at an expense to us equal to our passage out;
and that, therefore, we were under no obligations to make any
remuneration
to Mr. Bedriek for his expenses.
The Captain continued to warn us, from time to time, to keep our
secret, and continued a good friend to us.
We at length, as I have already mentioned, entered the river La
Plata, and began to ascend it. The morning after we passed by Cape
St. Mary's, I awoke early, anxious to behold by daylight, the land of a
foreign shore. It was just sun-rise when I reached the deck. To the
south stretched a wide waste of water like the ocean, for the opposite
shore was invisible on account of the river's vast breadth, although
we were fifty miles up it. On our right lay the northern bank of the
La Plata, about two and a half miles distant. It presented to the eye
a low range of prairie or level
pampa
, broken here and there into
ridges and bare hillocks. As far as the view extended this was the
feature of the scenery of the shore, save that occasionally was visible
a clump of stunted trees, which the Captain told us were peach trees.
Not a living object was to be discovered; not a sign of habitation.
Nevertheless I gazed on the land with longing eyes, wishing that the
wind would die away so that we might take the boat and pull to the
shore. To place our feet once more upon the firm ground we all felt
would be a luxury.
As we slowly ascended the brown-colored river, the shores began to
present a less arid aspect; and about ten o'clock we discovered a
human
habitation, and near it a drove of cattle. One or two human
beings were also seen riding among the cattle. Towards noon we
passed several wretched houses with flat roofs and surrounded by picket
enclosures which contained cattle; but no signs of a farm or of
cultivation
were apparent.
`Those people.' said the Captain, are half Indians, half Portuguese,
who live by hunting cattle, and selling hides at Maldonado. We shall
come to this place in two or three hours. It is a small town, defended
by an old fortress, and belongs to the Republic of Buenos Ayres, as
does all this country you see, which is called the Banda Oriental, and
is the southern extremity of Brazil. The Emperor has it in his hands
now as well as Monte Video, sixty miles above Maldonado. There is
likely to be some difficulty about it, though, and I shouldn't be
surprised
if the two governments should come to blows. When I was
last here they were menacing each other!'
`What is the cause of the hostility?' asked Hewitt; for we were
all profoundly ignorant of South American politics.
`Why, you see, when Buenos Ayres, a few years ago, declared
herself
independent of Old Spain, and went to war with her, she
possessed
both sides of the river,Banda Oriental on the north, and
Paraguay on the south side, in which the city of Buenos Ayres is
situated
.
But not being able to defend the Banda Oriental against
Spain, she entered into a treaty with Don Pedro, the Emperor of
Brazil, with whom the Republic was on friendly terms, to keep the
district and city of Monte Video against Spain until the war was
ended. What the Republic was to pay the Emperor for this service,
I never learned. At alll events, he consented to oblige them; and as
the first step, sent round from Rio Janeiro a fleet of twenty vessels of
war, conveying twelve thousand troops to Monte Video, the capital of
the Banda Oriental. If you will look at the map, you will see that
Monte Video forms a natural southern out-post to Brazil, and a very
convenient port for the empire. Don Pedro had doubtless learned
this lesson in geography before the Republic proposed to him to keep
the city from falling into the hands of Old Spain. Well, the Buenos
Ayrean patriots secured the independence of their country after a long
contest, at which Don Pedro quietly looked on. After the Buenos
Ayreans had made peace with Spain, they called upon Don Pedro and
very civilly thanking him for the good care he had taken of Monte
Video, desired him to send back his troops to Rio, and surrender to
them the charge of the city. Upon this the wily Portuguese thrust
his tongue into his cheek, and very cavalierly told them `to come and
take it!'
`Is it possible such treachery can exist!' exclaimed Hewitt, his
cheeks flushed with resentment. `Don Pedro is no better than a
blackguard!'
`Doubtless the Republic thought so when they got his answer, and
saw how thoroughly they had been taken in!'
`Quite as grossly as we have been,' repeated Hewitt with
earnestness
.
`Not a word of that, young gentlemen,' said the Captain. `Wait
till you get ashore, and then you may say and do what you like! But
it
was
pretty much like your case. The Buenos Ayreans having just
closed a protracted war, were in no condition to commence another,
and so they quietly bore this injustice, but at the same time began to
make warlike preparations. This was the state of things when I last
was out here!' continued the Captain; `and I dare say by this time
they are pretty nearly ready to blaze away at each other. I have no
doubt but before you are six months in the country, you'll see some
fighting!'
The idea of witnessing a battle was quite exciting to us, who had
hitherto only read of such a thing. The reflections that when we
reached Buenos Ayres we should find the country at war gave us all
fine spirits; for there is nothing that has such a charm to a young and
ardent mind as war! We thanked the Captain for initiating us into
the politics of the country, and then began to talk about entering into
the patriot service if we found the country in arms. This billigerent
notion did not very readily take with Hewitt, who was of a pacific turn
of mind, but the rest of us entered into the discussion of the affair
with great animation.
The shores now presented a most interesting appearance, being
varied with clumps of trees, enclosures, and a few cottages with low,
flat roofs. At length we came in sight of the port and houses of
Maldonado
,
and about five in the afternoon came abreast of the place. It
was a small hamlet, without much beauty of situation, but still it was
novel to us, as the first Spanish town we had ever seen. A few fishing
boats were anchored off the old fort, and one of them rigged with a
small lateen sail, run along side of us, and offered to sell us fish. We
all ran to the gangway to gaze upon the man and his boat. He was
tall and slender, with a face as dark as an Indian's, black glittering
eyes, and teeth like ivory. Upon his head he wore a sugar-loaf shaped
woollen cap of a scarlet color, and a striped shirt was bound about his
waist by a leathern belt, at the same time kept up a pair of cotton
trowsers
fringed at the bottom. He addressed us in Spanish.
`Here now, young gentlemen,' said Captain Pright laughing, `here
now is a good chance for you to try your Spanish on him.' We were,
however, something diffident of our powers; but Hewitt ventured a
Spanish phrase, which he read to him off his grammer with a
pronunciation
that was never approached. The phrase was, I believe, `What
o'clock is it?' which, put to a man who probably had never seen a
watch, was laughable enough.
`No entiendo,' answered the man, smiling and showing his teeth.
`He must be a Portugee Indian,' said Hewitt, in defence of his
prouunciation; it is plain he don't understand the pure Castillian.'
`Let Mr. Bedrick try him,' said Fairfax. `He is a Spanish
scholar?'
At this, Edwin, of the spectacles, looked a little red, and after some
hesitation asked the man how he sold his fish.
The man did not understand him, and Bedrick declared that the
fellow did not know a word of Spanish, as he had asked him in good
grammatical Spanish. We, however, questioned whether he himself
did not know less; for our progress in the language had showed us that
he had but a mere smattering of the tongue he professed to understand,
as he said, like his mother-dialect. As it did not require any Spanish
or English to take fish and pay money for them, we made a purchase
of a few, and also bought some vegetables from a boat that came off
to us. Emboldened by the failure of Bedrick, our teacher, we all
four went desperately the Spanish at the latter boatman, whom we
succeeded in making comprehend our horrible `Castillian,' by means
of a few English words judiciously thrown in, and some aid from
expressive
signs. It is true, we did not understand more than a word in
six of his replies, but as he seemed to understand all that we said, and
a great deal more, we were perfectly satisfied. We made abominable
work in the attempt to ask him intelligibly what the news was, and
whether Don Pedro and the Patriots were likely to go to war. But
the poor man, although he guessed we must mean something, and tried
very hard to comprehend what it was, did not convey to our minds any
clear idea that he understood what we wanted to learn of him. So we
parted from him as wise as we met him, and proceeded on our way.
At sundown we were within fifty miles of Monte Video, which the
Captain said we should reach by morning if the wind held. With this
prospect, therefore, of soon seeing a large walled city, full of troops,
and the harbor with vessels of war, we retired for the night,
determined
to be up early to enjoy the sight; for it was not our intention
to stop there; but the Captain had promised to sail by elose to it that
we might have a good view of it.
CHAPTER XII.
The Letter of Marque.
The
ensuing morning when I went on deck the first object that met
my eyes was the mount of Monte Video towering grandly from the
horizon about nine miles distant, crowned with its angular fortress.
The hill, as we approached it, presented a beautiful appearance. It is
shaped like a cone, and is three hundred feet in height, and the rest of
the land around it being low, it is visible at a great distance.
As we advanced, the towers and turrets and dome of the cathedral
of the city of Monte Video lifted themselves over the surface of the
intervening country, while near them was visible a forest of masts, the
hulls of the numerous vessels being still concealed by the intervening
land. It was a beautiful morning; one of those soft, balmy
atmospheres
peculiar to this climate. The sun, reflected from the distant
towers, flags, and battlements of the fortress, gave brilliancy to the
scene. Up the river higher, were two or three vessels of war, which
carried the Brazilian flag. One of them was a brig at anchor, the
other two schooners, moving along under easy sail, as if merely sailing
for pleasure off the harbor. The harbor of Monte Video opens boldly
from the main shore of the river with a entrance, entrance, flanked on
the west side by the mount and its fortress, and on the east or right
hand by a strongly built battery. The shape of the harbor is not
unlike
that of a pear, made a deep, spacious basin a mile wide, and more
than that distance in length inland. The city lays within the eastern
curve, upon gradually rising ground, and as we came in sight of it
presented a fine appearance, its roofs rising one above the other, and
the whole crowned by the cathedral with its dome and numerous
towers.
As we approached the mouth of the harbor, about a mile distant
from it, I went aloft to get a more open view. From this elevation I
was enabled to command a wide and beautiful prospect, of city, harbor,
shipping, forts, the mount, the suburbs dotted with white flat-rooted
villas, gardens and clumps of bright green trees. I enjoyed the scene
with a zest that can only be appreciated by those who have heen
sixty-two
days on the ocean without seeing land. It seemed like a new
world opened to my inspection; for the general features of what I
beheld were all foreign and new to my eyes.
We at length came nearly opposite the harbor, so that we could look
in and see a huge ship-of-the-line dismantled and anchored directly in
its mouth, pointing her triple battery towards us. The Captain told
us this was called `The Guard Ship,' and was a mode much in use
with the Spaniards and Portuguese for protecting harbors. We thought
the town pretty well protected with the fort on the mount, the battery
on the opposite point, and the guard ship lying between them with
scarce room for two vessels to pass abreast, between her and the shores.
Beyond the guard-ship we saw a fleet of at least two hundred vessels
thickly crowding the basin, so that, as I have before said, their masts
presented the appearance of a forest in autumn.
`I don't like the looks o' that at all,' said the Captain, twisting his
mouth up as he gazed into the crowded harbor through his spy-glass.
`Don't like the looks of what?' I asked, for I was standing near him
in in the main top, to which he had ascended with his spy-glass.
`Of so many vessels anchored in the harbor. It looks as if things
were not altogether right!'
`Why, what do you apprehend?' I inquired.
`There are at least twenty-five Yankee flags flying at the
mast-heads
in the harbor, and half as many English. I don't see what the
deuce they are doing there; and, besides, the harbor is full of
Brazilian
men-of-warfrigates, sloops, gun-brigs and schooners! There
comes an English armed brig out and standing down for us! If she
comes nigh enough, I will speak her, for things look squally. Keep
away a little there, on deck, and meet that English brig! She is
luffing for us.'
`Aye, aye, sir,' answered the mate, and we came to a point and a
half.
The Captain then descended to the deck, while I remained in the
top watching the approach of a large armed brig with English colors
displayed at her peak, that had just come out of the harbor, and was
standing down the river towards us as if bound to sea. As she
approached
it was plain that she intended to speak us, for she luffed up
for us. The Captain called for his trumpet and sprang into the main
rigging, where he took his stand, awaiting her; for he was anxious
to learn the news; for he had began to suspect the true state of
things.
The English brig came down towards us beautifully, and as she
approached
,
clewed up her topsails to deaden her head-way. I could look
down upon her clean decks and see the double battery of dark guns
and groups of men upon her forecastle; while upon the quarter-deck
stood two or three officers in uniform. Our Captain, as soon as he
had called for his trumpet, had ordered the colors to be set in answer
to those flying on board the English vessel.
`Ho the brig, ahoy!' shouted a stern voice from the quarter-deck
of the Englishman, as the two vessels neared each other on opposite
tacks.
`What brig is that?'
`The Josephus, of Portsmouth, bound to Buenos Ayres. What brig
is that?'
`The English Letter of Marque `Queen Bess,' bound to London.
I have borne down to you,' continued the obliging Captain. `
supposing
you were bound up the river, to say, that war has been declared
between the Republic of Buenos Ayres and Brazil, and that the
blockade
of the river above Monte Video was enforced five days ago. You
will have to put into Monte Video, as five leagues above this the
blockading fleet is stationed, and to reach Buenos Ayres will be out of
the question.'
`Thank you, thank you,' answered Captain Pright, waving his
speaking trumpet towards him, and touching his hat in
acknowledgment
for his courtesy.
`Not at all, not at all,' responded the Captain of the Letter of
Marque
,
as he sheeted home his topsails again, while we filled away. for
we had backed our main-topsail as he came near us.
`Now this is what I call slipping between the cup and the lip,'
exclaiming
Captain Pright with looks of angry disappointment. `After
sixty-two days' sail to reach a place, and get within twenty-four hour's
run of it, to be told we must go home again or put into some other
port!'
`Why what is the matter?' cried old Mr. Bedrick, coming hurriedly
up on deck, for he had been shaving below all the while; `what is it
the English Captain says?'
`He says that Buenos Ayres is blockaded by a Brazilian squadron!'
answered the Captain in a tone of ill-humor.
`Well, what is to be done?' asked the old man, pale with the news.
`To be done! We must either run the gauntlet or I must find some
other port for the cargo of flour and Yankee notions. But I am not
to be turned back unless I am compelled. If Buenos Ayres is
blockaded
I can get good prices for every thing on board if I can get up
there. So I will just keep quietly on and see if I can't give them
Portuguese
the slip!'
`But if they catch us trying to run the blockade,' said Bedrick,
`they will capture the brig and take her into Monte Video as a prize,
and condemn her, and make us prisoners.'
`I will put it to the vote of the passengers, and the majority shall
govern my conduct,' answered the Captain. `Come, gentlemen, shall
we stand on, or put into the harbor that is already filled with American
vessels?'
We four voted in favor of keeping on, and also the younger Bedrick;
but the old man and his elder born, proposed that we should stop at
Monte Video!'
`I shall keep on,' answered the Captain. `Flour will be a drug in
Monte Video, for I dare say, every Yankee vessel there has it on
board. If I can reach Buenos Ayres, I shall make my fortune, and
enrich the owners. So I shall stand on and trust to the keel of my
brig; for I dare swear she is faster than any of the Portuguese craft in
these waters!'
`You will stand on at your peril, Captain Pright,' cried the old man.
`You know if we are chased and overtaken, we shall be fired into, and
you will be answerable for life and limb! And then if you are taken,
the vessel is detained as a fair prize, and we will no doubt be thrown
into a Portuguese prison!'
`I will, at all event, run the risk. The wind is fair and '
He was here interrupted at this crisis by the report of a gun. We
looked up and saw a cloud of blue smoke curling above the bows of a
Brazilian gun brig that had just poked her nose out of the harbor and
was bearing for us under all sail. She was about half a league
distant
.
`There, sir! Do you hear that?' cried Mr. Bedrick as white as a
sheet.
`Yes, sir, do you see that?' repeated his elder born, looking whiter
than his parent, if possible. `I command you, Captain Pright, to stop
your vessel before we are all killed!'
`Gentlemen, I command this brig. If you interfere with my duties,
I shall be compelled to order you below!'
As he spoke, a second report was heard from the Brazilian.
Instantly
we all dodged our heads; but the shot fell short of us, for we
could see where it struck quarter of a mile to the leeward, dashing the
spray high into the air.
Captain Pright looked perplexed and dissatisfied. He smoked away
at his cigar with unusual ferocity, while he glanced from his brig's
sails to the brigantine, and then back again to his own vessel, which
was sailing past the harbor at a speed of about five knots. The Captain
saw that he was running a great risk in standing on, for if he was
brought to his vessel might be seized for infringing the blockade; as
he knew the Brazilians would advance any pretext for the purpose of
getting possession of his vessel and cargo. He saw, also, that the
Brazilian brig was a fast sailer, and that if he even should out-sail her,
he would find it difficult to elude the blockading squadron stationed
fifteen miles higher up the river. The firing of the brig had also set
in active motion the two armed schooners to windward, and they were
rapidly standing for us. Affairs began, indeed, to look a little serious.
Captain Pright seemed to think so himself; for after taking a deliberate
inspection of the three vessels, one after another, and carefully
calculating
his chances of being taken, he gave two or three fierce puffs at
his cigar, and issued an order in tones of thunder to square away the
yards! As the wind was from the south, and blew directly into the
harbor, this manoeuvre plainly made known to the three vessels that
we had concluded to behave ourselves and submit to the laws of war.
The two schooners at once hauled their wind and went off about their
own business, while the brig of war kept standing on for us, but
without
firing any more guns, greatly to our gratification. She was a
black, ugly looking craft, with dark brown canvass, and a very smoky
appearance altogether, like almost all the Brazilian vessels of war.
Her mainmast raked very much, while her foremast stooped a little
She carried very square topsails, and an enormously large jib and
trisail
.
She showed six guns to a side, and was filled with dark-looking
men in red caps and red shirts.
In about ten minutes after we had squared away, she came under our
stern, and hailed in good English:
`What brig is that?'
`The Josephus, of Boston, bound to Buenos Ayres,' answered
Captain
Pright in a very cross tone.
`Did you know that a blockade was enforced? What do you mean
by standing on?' demanded the officer in a stern voice.
`How should I know? And if I did, it is my duty to do the best I
can to make the port I am bound to!'
`You will back your topsails, and receive a boat, with an officer to
take charge of you.'
`There, what did I tell you, sir!' cried Mr. Bedrick. `The brig is
lost, and we are all prisoners.'
`There will be little you will be likely to lose besides your liberty,'
answered Captain Pright, looking at us slyly. `But the vessel is not
to be taken. He only pays us the compliment to escort us safely in.
We have not run the blockade yet, though I would have done it if I
could!'
We had now backed our maintoptsail and the brigantine had done
the same. She then sent a boat to board us. It contained a lieutenant
and a middy, and was pulled by four dark looking Portuguese sailors
in red caps with black locks and piercing eyes beneath. The boat
came along side; the gang-way ladder was let down to him; the
Captain
stood about half way between the companion-way and the
gangway
port to receive him. He came on deck, slightly bowed round to
us, and advanced towards the Captain. He was a slender, handsome
looking fellow, with a dark cheek, and a large fine eye. He was richly
dressed in the gold embroidered and gorgeous uniform of the Brazilian
naval service, and wore at his side a magnificent sword.
`You are the Capitan?' he asked of Captain Pright in broken
English
:
for he was not the officer who had hailed us, and who must
have been an Englishman in the Emperor's service, which was filled
with them.
`Yes, I am the Captain?'
`You were trying to run de blockade?'
`I was trying to make my port. I hove to as soon as I saw you
were firing shotted guns.'
`Well, you will let me see your papers, and resign to me
command
of the vessel to take him into port! If you had stood on five
minutes longer, you would have forfeited your vessel! Fill away
again!'
Captain Pright then invited him into the cabin to show him the
brig's papers, gave him a glass of wine, and treated him with
remarkable
civility, since, we all knew that it would afford him the greatest
pleasure to pitch him overboard. We now filled away and stood into
port, while the brigantine steered down the river after another vessel
that was just coming into view.
CHAPTER XIV.
The Soda Fountains.
It
will be readily believed that this sudden change in our destination
was by no means agreeable to all on board. Mr. Bedrick raved and
seemed beside himself as we proceeded towards the harbor. We,
however, after a little reflection, took the matter kindly. We saw that
Don Pedro had very conclusively terminated our contract with Mr.
Bedrick without the necessity of any open quarrel with him; for if we
could not get to Buenos Ayres, we could not of course be `clerks' in
Buenos Ayres; the affair, therefore, dropped to the ground of itself.
We would very much have liked reaching that city, because our
thoughts and views had naturally been directed towards it; though
Monte Video appeared to be a city that presented to the eye of a youth
every thing to please. But we thought if we could only have reached
Buenos Ayres, we would join the patriots.
`It matters little,' said Fairfax after the Brazilian officer had
taken us in charge, `it matters little to us where we go. We have
declared ourselves independent of Bedrick, and the world is all before
us where to choose! I move that we put the best face on the matter
and take the chances that are before us for by and by making our
fortunes
.'
`Yes,' I replied, `and by going into Monte Video we shall have an
opportunity of seeing the city and be among the excitement of
warfare
.
For my part, I am not sorry that we are going into this port.
We shall find a great deal to interest and amuse us, I dare say; and
as there must be an American Consul here, we shall have his
protection
and advise.'
Therefore, on the whole, this change in our destination did not
materially affect our spirits. We had nothing to lose and all to gain
by it. Our hopes with reference to Buenos Ayres had been wrecked
already by the discovery of Mr. Bedrick's treachery towards us, and
all the objections that we really had to the change was, that we did
not like to patronize a city that was fighting against patriots. Young
and enthusiastic, and brim full of liberty, like all Yankee lads, we
could not relish the idea of being detained in a city that was at war
with a people that had just been fighting for liberty, and were now
fighting for their rights. We thought that if we could get to Buenos
Ayres, we would willingly take part with them in the contest; while
with the Brazilians we should remain passive, but indignant
lookerson
.
While we entered the harbor, I stood near the taffrail gazing upon
the scene around us. The morning was bright and exhilarating, and
every object appeared to the best advantage through the transparent
air. Upon our left towered the sugar-loaf mountains, frowning with
its lofty fortress, above which floated the emblazoned banner of the
Brazilian empire. The walls were formidable with cannon, and the
battlements were lined with troops, which were at drill upon the broad
promenade the walls presented. Upon the sides of the hill cattle were
feeding, and near the water-side were two or three fisherman's huts,
and soldiers washing their clothes in the river. We next passed the
guard-ship, from which we were hailed in Portuguese, and our
Brazilian
officer replied in the same tongue, and we were suffered to pass
on into the bosom of the harbor. We soon found ourselves in the
midst of a fleet composed of nearly all nations, Yankee, English,
French, Russian, Swede, Spanish and Portuguese, the national colors
designated them flying at their mast-heads. We sailed in among them,
now hailed on one side from a Boston brig, now on the other from a
New York or Baltimore ship, asking the news. At length we came
to anchor within a quarter of a mile of the Mole, and farthest in the
harbor of all the American vessels, save the Boston barque Conway,
Captain Blakely, which was moored out ahead of us. Before we come
to anchor, however, we had been boarded by a custom-house boat and
our manifesto examined.
After we had come to anchor, I passed some time in gazing off upon
the town and upon the various objects surrounding us. All around us
were vessels at anchor, among them a score of Brazilian men-of-war,
like hawks lighted amid a flock of pigeons. Directly before me lay
the mole, a sort of wharf, and the only landing place in front of the
city. It was thronged with a mixed multitude like a market place,
soldiers, monks and negroes, and crowded with boats from the vessels
in the harbor. An opening at the further extremity of the mole
exposed
a narrow street in which laden asses and odd-looking carriages,
drawn by mules, were disputing the way with the foot passengers.
The appearance of the town struck me from its novelty. It was
enclosed
by a massive wall save at the mole, where it had been battered
down by the British fleet in 1815. The houses were flat roofed, built
of brick, stuccoed and painted white or lemon color, with large vanes
ornamenting the battlements. Upon them I beheld the inhabitants
walking and gazing off upon the harbor. There were several
heavy-looking
towers rising here and there in the city, and the vast bulk of a
Roman Catholic cathedral in the centre gave an imposing finish to the
outline.
At length we were called to dinner in the cabin, our last dinner on
board the brig. At the table we discussed the city and the
circumstances
which had brought us, and with such cheerfulness that Mr.
Bedrick even smiled and remarked, in an under tone to the Captain,
that perhaps he might open an establishment there, as the city was full
of soldiers and foreigners, and that it might do as well if not better than
Buenos Ayres!'
`I thought, sir,' observed Hewitt, dryly, `that you believed nothing
could be done here, as so much freight was in the place. I should
think that you would find a good many competitors in business and in
disposing of your merchandize now on board.'
`Why, no, Hewitt. In my particular business I shall not be so
much interfered with.'
`As the cargo that you have have on board is very large and
valuable
,
I should think it would be difficult to command prices,' continued
Hewitt; `but Monte Video may, as you say, afford a good `fountain'
to begin business.'
We could scarcely keep our countenances at this sally of Hewitt's,
and looked at the old man to see if he took; but the word did not
convey to him the impressive idea that it did to us: for the very sound
and form of the word had become identified in our minds with a `
soda-fountain
!'
`I think I shall go on shore,' said the old man, look about me, and
see how affairs are. Come, Edwin, you will go with me; but you
young men, will stay aboard till I come back.'
We made no reply, and after the old gentleman had left the brig
with his sons, Edwin and Bill, we held a meeting in the cabin, Captain
Pright presiding.
`Now, my friends, we have got to the end of our voyage out,' said
the Captain; `and you will have to land here instead of at Buenos
Ayres; for I have given up the idea of getting there with the brig, as
the blockade may be kept on for months. I shall, therefore, try and
learn what chance I have for disposing of the cargo, and if I can't
sell it to advantage, I shall sail for Bahia or Rio, and do my best. As
I shall probably lay here four or five days, you are at liberty to make
it your home on board till you can look for something to do. You
are young and enterprising, and now that you are here in this country
a fair field is open for you to make your way. If I was going direct
to the United States I would let you have a passage back, and look to
your friends for the payment; but after I sell my cargo, I sail for St.
Petersburg to take in a cargo of furs. The old man has gone ashore
to see if he can find a place to open a soda-shop.'
`Are you sure of this?' we asked.
`Yes; he toid me as he left the vessel that he should hire a shop if
he could, and at once remove to it, and set up his fountain. He said
should try and get a place with rooms over it for an eating room and
sleeping rooms for himself and you! Now, if you will take my advise,
since you are all strangers here, and have not much money either of
you with you to spend, you will stick by the old man until you can
look out for yourself something better. He is bound to take care of
you and give you lodging and food, and so I would let him do it, and
keep your own money. Don't think of going to a hotel and live like
gentlemen with your little means, (for he knew we had not between
us four but about one hundred and thirty-five dollars,) but keep by
the old man. Let him find a house and shop, and set up his fountains:
join in with him in all, cheerfully, and make the best of it. You can
then look about you, and by and by something will transpire of which
you can avail yourselves.'
We thanked the Captain for his advice, and after some warm
discussion
of the matter, we took into consideratisn the poverty of our
pockets, and decided upon the expediency of following the Captain's
shrewd advice.
`Yes, fellows,' said Hewitt, `I agree with Captain Pright. The old
man is bound to look out for us. Let us stick in him like leeches till
we can fasten upon something else. To be sure, it is not a very
elevated
mode of beginning the world, especially for young gentlemen
who aspired to clerkships in a Foreign Mercantile House, to keep
soda-shops; but we will not mind that. We will stick to old Bedrick
and sell soda for him, but we'll not stay one day longer than we please.
But he must not know any thing of our dissatisfaction. Let us fall
into the traces kindly, knowing we can kick them off whenever we are
so disposed.'
This speech was unanimously applauded; and although we did not
much like to make our debut in a foreign city as soda-shop boys, yet
we were four in all, and in some sort sustained each other; and,
moreover
,
in consenting to this we felt that we were avenging ourselves in
some measure, upon the man whose duplicity had brought us into such
a position.
`Now,' said Radsworth, `let us go on shore. The boat has come
back, and I am impatient to press the solid land once more.'
`If we are to carry out our plan we must comply with the old man's
orders,' said Fairfax. `If we go ashore and meet him there, there
will be a blow up! He will be back soon, and let us wait and hear
his report, and then it will be time enough to go.'
We agreed to this delay, and in about two hours the old man
came off alone. As soon as he reached the deck, we saw he was in
fine spirits.
`I have got a capital house, in the most public street,' he said to
the Captain. `I have seen soveral English officers and others, who,
as soon as I told them my intention, said I could make my fortune.
They are all impatient to have me open at once, and I shall have the
fountains brought ashore at once. I have two rooms on the street,
and five above, and all for two hundred dollars' rent. Come, Captain,
I will soon relieve you of your passengers. Will you have the
fountains
and jars brought on deck! Come, young men, spring to our aid.
You have had two months' idleness and play, and now you ought to
take hold and work with a good will.'
`What are you to do with the fountains, sir?' I asked quietly.
`Why you see, young gentlemen,' said the old man, a little confused,
`I brought these four fountains out for the purpose of having a luxury
for myself and you, and our friends; for I was told that they had no
soda-fountains in Buenos Ayres, and the climate was warm. But as
we can't get up to that city, and as fortune has cast us here, it has
occurred to me that I will just take the fountains ashore and open a
soda-saloon for the officers and citizens, just to pay expenses till I can
reach Buenos Ayres and establish my Mercantile House. I am told
I can sell the soda for a quarter of a dollar a glass. We must all yield
to circumstances. The fate of war has cast our lot here; and as I
shall remain here till the port of Buenos Ayres is open, I think it will
be wise to do something to pay expenses. So if you have no objection
we shall
amuse ourselves awhile with selling soda to the Monte
Videans!'
After a little conversation aside between ourselves for form's sake,
we told him that, under the circumstances, we would be willing to aid
him in establishing his soda saloon, and perhaps act as `clerks,' but
that we had no disposition to follow it as a profession!'
We then went to work and helped convey the fountains into the
boat, and all four of us accompanied them to the pier. Here he obtained
the aid of negroes and had them borne through the streets to the stone
building he had hired. We followed two and two, gazing upon the
strange and novel sights constantly offering themselves to the inspection
of our curiosity.
CHAPTER XV.
The Old Spanish Casa.
After
a very interesting traverse of the streets of the town, we at
length came in sight of the domicil which Mr. Bedrick had hired. It
was a massive-looking, prison-like structure, two stories in height, with
a stone battlement surmounted at the angles by huge urns of a brown
color. The windows were very tall and deep set, and protected by iron
bars like those of a prison. The lower ones had no glass, but inside
shutters instead. The house was of brick stuccoed, and once
painted
a bright lemon color, but it had become dark with age, and in every
crevice grew little ridges of black moss. The outside had altogether
a very venerable and antiquated appearance, and to our eyes seemed as
if it had borne the storms and suns of at least five centuries; but the
true age of the building was less than a hundred; the climate here
producing
in a short time the effects which in a more northern latitude are
more slowly brought about.
The house, or castle before which we now paused, was situated half
way between the corners of the square, and opposite a very handsome
edifice which was occupied as a boarding-house, or hotel for naval
officers
,
and other strangers. Our next door neighbor on the right, was
a little Portuguese cobbler in iron spectacles, who came to his door to
take a look at our
cortege;
and the neighbor on the right was an old
Brazilian beldame who made cigars. Between these two our domicil
stood. Its front exhibited a huge door of solid Paraguay oak twelve
feet high, and made with a small gate or wicket in it for one person to
pass through at the time. On either side of the door, was a tall,
narrow-grated
window, half-curtained with cobwebs. Above was a row
of four long and narrow windows that opened upon an iron balcony.
These windows opened to the floor of the balcony, and had two-leaved
glass doors. Over these was a heavy cornice, surmounted by the
battlements
and urns, as I have before described.
Having reached the front of this mansion, we paused to take a
survey
of it and of the neighborhood, while the old man fumbled for the
key to unlock the prison-like door to let us in. Our arrival attracted
some attention. Negroes, driving by mules laden with brick, stopped
to gaze; soldiers halted to inspect us; and from the blinds or
jalousies
of the dwellings across the street, we caught glimpses of sparkling eyes,
that we guessed belonged to fair Montevideans. It took the old
gentleman
some minutes to turn the massive lock; for the house having
long been vacant the wards had got rusty, as well as the whole exterior
of the edifice. There we stood, gazing and gazed upon, each of us
with a bundle in our hands, and behind us, six stout, nearly naked
Africans, carrying the soda-fountains. We formed quite a respectable
and odd-looking procession.
At length, Hewitt having put his hand to the key and given the old
man his aid, the bolt yielded, and the door turned shriekingly upon its
hinges. It opened into a dark, cheerless apartment, paved with large
square brick, which were here and there sunken, and with bare
plastered
walls stained with mould. The ceiling was full sixteen feet in
height, and the naked rafters were visible in all their architectural
mystery. The room was about twenty feet square, contained a window
twelve feet tall, and grated, looking upon the street, and a door on the
back side. Not an article of furniture, not a shelf, not a board was in
it. Walls and floor were alike naked and desolate. The air, too, was
chilly and damp, and I felt a chill come over both my heart and body
as I entered and looked around me. It was for all the world like taking
possession of a prison. We looked at each other and exchanged
glances of blank dismay.
`Never mind,' said Fairfax in a whisper, `we have our fortunes in
our own hands, and can quit the old man when we choose; so let us
hang on and see him through. We shall have amusement, if nothing
more.'
`Come my lads,' said the old man, rubbing his hands together, partly
from chilliness and partly from excitement, `stir round and open the
window-shutters, and let's try and make things look cheerful!'
Things had need to look cheerful, for gloom and desolation dwelt
there without rivalry. We opened the broken shutters and let in a
broad glare of light from the sun, which only served to show more
vividly
the wretchedness of the place.
`Things will look different by and by. I have already spoken for a
carpenter to come,' said Mr. Bedrick bustling about. `We shall have
a counter and shelves and fixings up here in no time!'
`Is this to be the shop?' I asked him.
`Yes. There isn't a better stand in the city. It is right on the main
street that leads from the public square to the quay, and within five
minutes'
walk of both. The barracks are on the next street round the
corner, and the French, English and American Consuls live just above
us half a square. The street that runs west next to us leads directly
to the chief gate of the city; and taking all in all, I consider that we
shall make money yet out of our detention here. It's an ill wind that
blows no body good!'
Here the old hypocrite, who thought he had thrown dust into our
eyes so as effectually to blind us to the truth, rubbed his palms
together
and chuckled, and began to stir about, ordering the negroes where
to set down the priceless soda-fountains, cautioning them to beware of
denting them against the bricks, though the ebony fellows could not
understand a word of English save `Dam!' which they emphatically
used in reply to every word he said.
`Here you darkies,' said the old man, `place this one under the
window!'
`Dam, dam!' answered the negroes.
`Set it down carefully!'
`Dam, dam, dam!' was the reply in a loud tone; and so we had it
for a few minutes a strange chorus, for each of the half dozen seemed
to try to show his superior knowledge of the English language over his
fellows, by using the word oftener and louder than the rest. The old
man got fairly roused and irritated, and returned their `English' with
a round of oaths that would greatly have edified them had they been
able fully to appreciate their meaning.
They were at length paid and sent off, when Radsworth and I left
the `shop' to take a cruise round the premises. We passed through
the rear door into a room smaller, but similar to the front one, with
dark, stuccoed walls, a brick floor, and naked rafters blacked and
festooned
with cobwebs. It contained a large grated window and door
looking into a small court. We went into the court or
patio
, which
was about thirty feet long and eighteen wide, with a broken pavement
up-grown with long grass. In the centre was a circular cistern, upon
the verge of wihich we saw two green and black lizards basking in the
sun. At our approach they darted down inside and concealed
themselves
in the crevices. Around the court were several large old
earthern
jars, not unlike those described in the Forty Thieves. These
stood against the stuccoed walls of adjacent houses, which formed the
boundaries of the court. In the walls on one side were two windows
high up from the ground and grated; they had also glass doors through
which the festoon of a rich crimson curtain was visible. Another side
of the court, a door was let into the wall which showed that the court
could be entered from that house. On the third side was a high brick
wall defended by iron spikes. On climbing up a lime tree which grew
by the cistern, we overlooked it, and saw in the court beyond an old
woman seated upon a door-step clad in a red petticoat with a yellow
handkerchief tied about her grey locks smoking a cigar. Her skin
was wrinkled only as an old Portuguese woman's can be, and was as
swarthy as an Indian's. She saw us, and flashing her dark glittering
eye at us, she shook her five fingers at us, and poured forth a volley of
unintelligible jargon, which doubtless contained more curses than
blessings
.
Having thus taken a survey of the lower ground premises, we
discovered
and mounted a flight of stairs which ascended to a balcony on
the outside of the rear of the house. This balcony was a sort of
platform
boarded and protected by a strong iron rail. It was six feet broad,
and made a fine promenade. From it opened four windows into the
body of the house. The glass doors were shut, but only latched, and,
opening one of the halves, we entered an apartment that extended the
whole breadth of the rear of the house. It was very different from the
one below. Its floor was of smooth boards, its walls white, and around
it run a very elaborate ornamental cornice in stucco. The
window-frames
were ornamented with carved work, and altogether, the room
had an imposing air. It did not contain, however, an article of
furniture
,
save the half of a cigar box. We passed through the saloon, for
such it might be called, from its height and dimensions, and entered
the front room over that which had been selected for the `shop.' It
was half the size of the `saloon,' having but two windows fronting the
street. It was a fine chamber with fine ornaments about the windows
and doors; but like the rest it was chilly and desolate. To the right
of it a door led into another room the same size, which also had two
windows upon the street, the two rooms taking up the whole front of
the house as the `saloon' did the rear. The four windows were
protected
by double glass doors and barricaded; but on opening the doors
I found that the iron frame-work or grating revolved on hinges also.
It had a padlock by which it could be locked on the inside; and
doubtless
had often been used by some jealous Spanish husband to keep his
cara esposa
safe from the wiles of wandering cavaliers.
The window led us upon a balcony similar to that in the rear, but
with a more elegant railing around it. I stood upon it gazing up and
down the narrow street, which looked like one of those I had seen in
old pictures of Spanish or Italian towns. It was straight and narrow,
with sidewalks only before the best houses; and all along as far as the
eye could reach were the ranges of balconies and lines of urns
surmounting
the battlements. From some of the windows of the
balconies
projected long window shades of green, yellow or scarlet striped
chintz, forming a sort of roof between the windows and the sun to
protect
from its rays the ladies who sat within it. These presented, from
their number and variety of colors, a very gay and novel appearance.
Indeed, all was novelty to our eyes. Every thing around us was different
from any thing in our own New England. The faces, the costumes,
the carriages, the houses, the trees, the sound of voices, the very
atmosphere
were different. It seemed as if we had been but yesterday in
Boston
and to-day wafted by some magic power into the bosom of these
strange scenes. The voyage seemed as a night's sleepa vacuuma
long monotonous dream! We seemed to have laid down to sleep in
Boston
harbor, to awake from a dream of water and winds in the
Portuguese
city of Monte Video! There was no gradual transition. It was
sudden and as novel as it was abrupt. Our minds were filled with
wonder
and curiosity; and as we looked around us we seemed to be gazing
upon some old picture which had suddenly become animate and moving
with life. It must be remembered, too, that we were scarcely eighteen,
an age when the heart and soul drink in novelties as the young plants the
dews.
The streets were thronged with people. Negroes with naked limbs,
and shining shoulders, and soldiers, in flashy uniforms and ferocious
mustaches predominated; and not a few of the latter were Africans;
for it was the system of Don Pedro to enlist blacks in his armies, who
made excellent troops. They are at first domestic slaves, whom he
makes free on condition that they join the army for life. The poor
negroes
readily embrace this new bondage, believing that they are free,
when it is only a new and more rigorous form of slavery. We saw
passing
the balcony a knot of British naval officers who had just come ashore,
and also moving up and down the street were many captains of merchant
vessels, and not a few tars in blue jackets and duck trowsers. Now and
then we could see a rich citizen go by wrapped in his velvet cloak and
displaying
his jewelled fingers. There were no females save negresses, in
red or yellow turbans, brass bracelets on their naked arms and ancles, and
dressed in short white petticoats and some gay-colored spencer. The
only vehicles were a sorry-looking cart, the body of poles fastened
together
with withes, and drawn by mules, some with red ribbon tied to
the tips of their ears. The mules and negroes did most of the carrying.
Seeing upon the roofs of the houses several persons who seemed to
be enjoying the air under awnings stretched over them, we thought we
would try and see if we could find a way to our roof. By going round
the balcony to the other side we came to a flight of steps in the wall
which led us to the roofs. It was perfectly flat and covered with a
cement of fine gravel. It was spacious and enclosed by battlements
three feet high, which were the continuation upward of the four external
walls of the house. At the four corners were four large earthern urns,
five feet in height. The area of the roof was intersected by low walls,
which were the extension of the dividing walls between the rooms
below
,
so that the roof was divided into compartments answering to those
in the story underneath. In these cross walks were openings to pass
freely from one to the other over the roof. The roofs adjacent to our
own were also flat and only separated from ours by the low battlements;
and so all along the street, both up and down, we had a prospect of flat
roofs, battlements and urns, a singular and picturesque scene, and one
which we gazed upon with emotions novel and pleasing.
CHAPTER XVI.
The Cafe.
Having
taken a survey of the ranges of the roofs, some of which
were shaded by awnings ornamented with scarlet fringes, and on others
of which were both men and women walking, or gazing down into the
street, we began to take a look at the city in general. Our house was
in an elevated position, and commanded a wide prospect. To the east
of us, over acres of urn-crowned roofs towered two massive,
grey-looking
towers, and close by them a huge dome. These we were told
afterwards
were the dome and towers of the cathedral which fronted on
the main square, or Plaga Grande. In other parts of the city we could
see turrets rising from the mass of buildings, but there was visible only
one dome. Some of the houses had small towers or belvideres rising
above the roofs on which were flag staffs. The consulates all had
them; and we could discover flying from them the flags of several
nations
,
and among them the beloved `stars and stripes;' beyond the
square on which the cathedral stood we caught a glimpse over the
walls of the county. On the West, we saw the harbor with its fleets
of vessels of war, and merchantmen of all nations riding at anchor,
and in the offing two or three Brazilian cruisers under sail watching to
bring into port any vessel that might be steering past for Buenos Ayres.
Beyond the harbor rose, like a sugar-loaf, the green mount, which gives
its name to the city. It frowned with battlements from which waved
in the wind the gorgeous heraldic ensign of Brazil. The broad bosom
of the sea-like river flowed beyond, dotted here and there with a
gun-boat
or transport going to or returning from the blockading squadron
five leagues above.
But what most interested us was a sight of the beleaguering camp
of the patriot General Llavelliga on the sloping side of the hill about
four miles to the north-west from the city. It presented a long line
of white tents that looked like huge drifts of snow. We did not know
then what camp it was, but afterwards learned it to be that of the
Buenos Ayrean General.
The reader is already somewhat familiar with the military politics
of the country at this period; and need not be reminded that Buenos
Ayres was now at war with Brazil for the purpose of recovering the
city of Monte Video and the territory of Bonda Oriental, of which the
Emperor had unjustly deprived her. The Buenos Ayreans had just
commenced the war, with, however, but few resources. She had but
a small fleet of schooners and gun-boats, and but one corvette of
twenty
guns to compete with the hundred keels which Brazil promptly
anchored
in the river. This little squadron was blockaded in port, but
daily gathering strength and increase of force. In the mean while,
General Llavelliga, a man of talents, courage, and military experience,
was appointed to command an army destined to march by land against
Monte Video to lay siege to it.
Llavelliga crossed the river above Colorina with a force of two
thousand
men, and on reaching the Bonda Oriental side called to his
standard
the native Quachos of the country, with whom he was very
popular
.
The Quachos are the country people of Bonda Oriental, who
subsist partly by farming, but mostly by hunting wild cattle. They
are a mixture of Indian and Spanish blood, are brave, lovers of their
country, free of spirit as the Arab of the desert, are admirable
horsemen
,
and make the best cavalry in the world. Six thousand of these
half-wild, independent fellows flocked to the standard of the Buenos
Ayrean General. Every man was mounted upon his own horse, armed
with carbine, pistols and knife, and clad in a poncha, a red blanket
with a hole in the centre to admit the head and let it fall down all over
the body. Their horses were caparisoned with gay hangings and little
bells or tinkling chains of silver. They were small, graceful, fleet and
hardy animals, and seemed even to share the spirit of the rider. The
Quacho wore upon his long black locks either a turban of bright
colors
,
or a sombero with a broad brim. They were fine-looking
brigand-looking
men, and hated the Brazilians most cordially.
With this force, in all eight thousand mounted men, Llavelliga
advanced
down the coast of the river La Plata, and after two days arrived
in the sight of Monte Video, and pitched his tent upon the hill-side,
where we saw him, and about two weeks before our arrival. There he
had quietly remained, waiting for artillery, which had been slowly
following
his march over the level pompas. In the mean while, he had
been reconnoitering the town, his mounted Quachos sometimes riding
boldly up within pistol shot of the gates, firing at the sentinels, and
then galloping off with the velocity of the wind shouting their derision.
The town, I have already said, was strongly walled around, save at
the quay, where the opening was protected by a battery of cannon.
All around the walls was a deep moat half-filled with water let into it
from the harbor, so that, with the harbor, water entirely surrounded it.
The country immediately about the walls was open without tree or
building that could cover any hostile party approaching them. The
walls were twenty feet thick, in some places solid, in others hollow, and
used for cells to confine malefactors. The top was a level promenade
defended by battlements with cannon mounted in embrasures.
Sentinels
were stationed upon the walls at short distances apart all round the
city day and night, and every fifteen minutes called out in Portuguese,
in a loud, sonorous tone, `All's well!' At first their noise annoyed us,
but by and by we got used to it as we did to every thing else here.
The city contained twenty thousand troops, one half of which were
blacks, officered by youthful springs of Portuguese nobility. Yet the
commander or governor-general, as he was denominated, had not taken
any steps towards giving the Patriot General battle before his artillery
should arrive. His time was taken up in reviewing the troops in the
great square, and in offering up splendid masses in the cathedral for
the success of the Imperial arms, and the total discomfiture of the
Patriots.
Thus up to the day that we arrived in the besieged city nothing had
been done to open the country; for Llavelliga had cut off all supplies
from the interior. Provisions were growing scarce in the place, and
vegetables were hardly to be obtained. The troops would soon have to
depend upon the cargoes in the American vessels for subsistence or
make a sortie to raise the siege. Such was the state of affairs at the
time of our entrance into the beleaguered city.
Having in some measure gratified our curiosity by the views from
the balcony and roof, we descended again to the lower floor. Here
we found the old man with his coat off helping drag boards into `the
shop,' while a Yankee carpenter from Wathersfield in Connecticut,
who had `sot up' there, was unloading a negro of plane, saw, and
other tools, for the purpose of building a counter, and putting the shop
in a shop-shape appearance. Hewitt and Radsworth were good
naturedly
assisting the old man, and so we stripped off our coats and all
went cheerfully to work. For the next five hours, there was a busy
scene of sawing, planing, nailing, and by night we had the counter up,
shelves placed around it, and a bench on one side of the room. Young
Bedrick placed at the window a red and yellow curtain (
second-handed
)
he had bought at a stall on the quay, and Bill occupied himself in
drawing nails and hanging some pictures the old man had brought for
the purpose of ornamenting his soda-shops. A negro woman
previously
whitened the walls with white-wash, and the pictures with the
curtain set off the place and gave it quite a lively and respectable air.
After the shavings were cleared up and the floor nicely sanded we could
not help joining in with the old man in his transports of
self-gratulation
at the improved aspect of things.
`Now, my lads, when I get my bottles with the handsome labels on
them ranged on the shelves, and get my counter painted imitation
mahogany
,
and my tumblers out, and my silver tubes for the fountain, and
my decanters for the syrup. I think we shall make a tempting display!'
We had eaten our dinner at the cafe a few doors below us, and thither
we went for our supper. Our days' work had given us good appetites;
and we four as we sat at one of the tables in the long hall, did full
justice to the coffee and toast and sweet-meats set before us. Such
coffee we had never before tasted! The remembrance of it at this
moment makes my mouth water. It was poured into cups that held
a pint, and into which had been previously put two table spoonsfull of
snowy sugar. The waiter came armed with a coffee-pot in one hand,
and a milk-pot precisely like it in the other. The milk was as boiling
hot as the coffee! He began by pouring from both into the cup
holding
them about a foot above the cup. The two liquids mingled
foaming
with the sugar. He continued to pour from both equally, till the
delicious nectar ran over the brim, and filled half the saucer. In this
manner he filled all four of our cups. The bread was snowy white
and delicious either as toast or fresh. The sweet-meats were new to
us and perfectly delectable. As we eat we felt in good humor with
the old gentleman, and naturally resolved that we would stick by him,
and do all the service in our power till we saw him fairly set ou his legs
and under full tide of success.
`But where are we to lodge to-night?' asked Hewelt, who never
forgot
creature comforts. `I have wandered all over the old castle, roof
and all, and I don't see any thing like accommodations
`The old man says he has mattresses and bedding coming ashore
tomorrow
,
and the carpenter, Saul Freelove, has offered us beds for
tonight
in his house,' answered Radsworth.
After we had each paid a real, (twelve and a half cents) for our
supper we rose and passed out through the crowd of noisy, smoking,
talking officers and citizens that filled the place. The jargon which
they uttered was wholly unintelligible to us. Our acquisitions had
been in Spanish for the Buenos Ayrean market and not in Portuguese.
So our study, so far as we could now avail ourselves of its results, was
quite thrown away. On our gaining the street it was just growing
dark. We hastened to the `shop,' not feeling perfectly safe to be
abroad after dark in such a city: for we had already heard from the
carpenter an account of it that by no means led us to take a fancy to
thread its streets when the sun was gone. He told us, to amuse us no
doubt, that three persons had been assassinated in the last ten days.
So we were not long in reaching our shop, where we found the old man
supping on bread and herring with a glass of brandy and water to
wash it down. His hopeful son Edwin was munching a cracker
dipped
in ginger preserves, and doing justice to a bottle of claret at
sixpence
the bottle. Bill was not to be found. He had doubtless gone
foraging for better quarters than either the carpenter or the shop would
offer him; and, indeed, we had seen but little of him during the day;
save when occasionally he would drop in upon us with a cigar in his
mouth, look round very coolly, and ask `how we came on?' He
played
the gentleman to perfection, and no doubt thought we were poor
taken-in-devils, who dared not say our soul was our own! We,
however
,
kept our own counsel, knowing very well what we were about.
In a little while the carpenter came in and we accompanied him home.
The house was on a retired street near the harbor. On our way we
passed the guard-house. A sentinel pacing before it, called out what
sounded to us like `ken low!' but stood for `
quien va la!
' `who goes
there?'
`Camordas,' answered the carpenter.
`Pasen!' answered the soldier, and we passed him by turning into
the middle of the street, as he would not let us walk by near where he
stood. It was not so dark but that I could see he was a mulatto of
huge proportions, and a ferocious aspect. We caught a glimpse of
the interior of the guard-house, and saw by a lamp in it that some
score of soldiers were there drinking, smoking, sleeping, and playing
at cards or dominoes. Through a large arched way we got a sight of
the barracks and crowds of soldiers moving about, while a deep hum
of voices reached our ears.
`Them be the barracks,' said Freelove in a broad nasal tone, that
sounded delightfully like home-land; `there ain't less than three
thousan'
soldiers quartered in that yard. It kivers an acre inside o' that
gate, and they stow 'em like sheep in pens!'
`Suppose we had been passing this place alone, and had been
challenged
?'
asked Hewitt.
`Why if you hadn't answered, they would have called three times,
then pulled trigger and blowed you to blazes!'
`But supposed we had answered `a friend?'
`They would n't understand it. When any on 'em challenges you
next time al'ays sing out as loud as they do, `Camaranda.' That
means comrade or friend. You must speak pesky quick, for they don't
let much time pass between the challenges. I like to ba' been shot by
one o' the rascals when I first came here. I was walkin' along
thinkin'
and didn't hear the first challengenor the second; for one gets
so used to hearin' 'em by and by they don't heed 'em. Well, the first
thing I knew was `bang!' and a bullet whistled right close to my cheek.
I tell ye I sung out Camaranda then loud enough for 'em to have
heard me clean out to the Patriot camp. But here's my house and
shop all in one! Let us go in, and you are welcome to the best I've
got; though 'taint so good as it might be!'
CHAPTER XVII.
The Yankee Abroad.
The habitation of the Connecticut man was, in outward
appearance
not dissimilar from our own, though of less height and
dimensions
.
It had the same dingy-yellow stuccoed front, large,
gatelike
door, and long, narrow, grated windows. It had a flat roof,
battlements and urns upon the angles. The street upon which it
stood was narrow, closely built, and inhabited chiefly by artizans;
the shop being on the ground floor and the dwelling-house over it.
The street was quite dark when we reached Mr. Freelove's door,
and not a lamp illumined its obscurity through its whole length.
Here and there, from some curtained upper window, a ray of light
streamed across the street. Saul opened the door by pulling a
string that was attached through a hole to the latch inside. It
opened into a dark passage, wide enough for a coach to enter.
On one side of this passage was a door that led into a room where
he worked at his trade, and the other side was a similar
ground-floor
apartment where he kept his lumber, provisions, and wood for
cooking. Passing through the paved arch we entered a small court
entirely enclosed either by high brick walls or the rears of adjacent
buildtngs. Several doors on two sides of the court led into small
rooms, or more properly called cells, that had served the former
proprietor for bed rooms for his servants: but one of them was now
occupied by an old negress, who, hearing us, came hobbling out
with a bit of wax candle in her hand.
`Ah, dat you, senor massa!' she said, looking at him and then
at us. `Who am estos jovenes?'
`Yes, it's me, Juana; estos caballetos are mis amigos,' he answered
in Spanish and English. `You must have supper right off, old
woman, and then shake up the two extra beds for four!'
Saul spoke this partly in English and party in Spanish, and then
kindly translating it to us, added,
`I and Jenny here get along, between us, first rate. She-speaks
a little English, I a little Spanish, and between us make out to
understand each other.'
`I thought Portuguese was spoken here instead of Spanish,' I
remarked
.
`So it is, since the Brazilians have been in possession; but
before
they came, Spanish was the language. Old Jenny was slave
to a Spanish family that escaped, and she speaks only Spanish;
and I learned all I know here afore the Portuguese took possession.
You can't get Jenny to speak a syllable of Portugee; she'd have
her head taken off first. But come, now, let's go up stairs.'
With these words he led the way with a light the negress had
given him, up a flight of stone steps on the outside of the building
to a piazza projecting from the second story. We entered a large
room, furnished with chairs, a table, book-case, and clothes-press,
all of his own make, be informed us. The walls were hung with
three or four pictures in mahogany frames, one the head of
Washington
,
another the representation of the battle of Bunker's Hill, a
third the victory of Perry on Lake Erie. The floor was covered with
straw matting, and the whole apartment had as great an air of
comfort
as could be well obtained in one of those old castellated Spanish
houses.
`Now, my friends,' said the worthy carpenter, as he placed the
light upon the table, `you see where I live and jist make yerselves
to hum. Things ain't here so nice as they be in the States. for the
Spanish don't know now to live But one soon gets used to their
ways, though he'll never forget his own. I see one of you look at
them pictures! They used to hang up in my bed-room to hum, when
I was a little boy, and I brought them out here to keep the old
place in memory. I'm as glad to see you as if you were my own kith
or kin. It does my soul good to see any body, if it be the meanest
feller on airth that sails from Yankee land. There is a chap that
used to be a reg'lar loafer in Weathersfield and nobody'd ever speak to
the critter, he was so low in character and habits. Well, he was
finally driven to sea, and his vessel put in here. I was going up to the
cathedral square one day when I met him and knew him. The sight
of the mean feller made my heart boil right over with affection for
him; for somehow I saw all Weathersfield in him. I shook his
hand as if he had been my father, invited him home to dinner, talked
with him all about everybody, and when he went away I gave him a
new sea-chest and ten dollars, it did me so much good to see and talk
gab with him about the old place and people. Now, arter supper,
we'll have a talk about New England; and though none on you don't
come from 'Necticut, you're jist as welcome. Railly it is a sight jist
to look on your fresh, young faces that look jist like them to hum,
'specially arter lookin at none but dark people so long. I've been here
in this country seven years, and I feel a yearnin once more to eat some
pumpkin pie and spiced dough-nuts. I think sometimes if I had a
drink of new cider I'd be willing to give fifty dollars for it. Then
there's the onions and the turnips, and fresh pork, and apples and mince
pies, and Thanksgiving days, the huskings, the sleigh rides, the
skating, the courting, the singing-schoolsdarnation! I shall go
right off the handle if I think on 'em any more! But to tell you
the truth, the very thoughts on the times at hum eenamost makes
me crazy. Come along here with supper, Jenny!'
`You mean to go back sometime?' I asked.
`I guess I do. If I died here afore I went back to New
England
,
my bones wouldn't lay still!they'd be stealing aboard some
home-bound ship and hiding in the hold till she reached Yankee
land! I don't mean to die here, and that's the reason I am alive
and hearty now, coz when I've been taken down I've swore hard
that I warn't goin to and would'nt give up the ghost here! So no
sickness could get a good hold on me!'
`Can't you make pumpkin pies and spiced dough-cakes here!'
all at once asked Hewitt, who had been soberly ruminating upon
this subject ever since Saul had mentioned it.
`You might just as well try to make Old Hundred out of
Yankee Doodle. I tried it once, but I couldn't find a bit of lard to
fry 'em in, nor no frying pan; and as to pumkin pies, I haint seen a
pumpkin since I've been here. I tried to make a pie out of plantains
out it warn't genuwine pumpkin and that makes all the difference.'
`So it does! So it must!' gravely responded Hewitt. `What
do
the people eat here?'
`Well, they eat fixins. Garlic goes into everything they cook.
They never saw a roast trukey or boiled chicken, nor a round o' beef.
Every thing is hashed and fricasseed and garliced to death. They
never seed a pie and I don't believe know what baked beans is! How
my mouth waters when I think o' baked beans and Indian pudding,
what used to be our Sunday dinner to hum! Sunday! Bless you!
there ain't no sich a thing as Sunday here, and how should they know
anything about baked beans! I hain't been to meetin since I've been
here! They have mass, but I don't believe in sich idolatrous doings!
Sundays they review the troops and have sham-fights, bulf-fights,
theatre
shows and parties; and all the niggers dance fandango on open
ground by the walls. I read my bible through reg'lar once a year,
sing Old Hundred and Mears every Sunday night, read a sermon, and
sometimes make a long prayer. So I am meetin' minister, and
congregation
all to myself! Did you ever see one of the priests here?
But here comes that lazy critter, Jenny, with the waiter.'
As he spoke the black woman, who wore a faded yellow turban on
her head, gold rings in her ears, a brass circlet on her left arm, a blue
woollen petticoat, with a pair of huge, black, splay feet projecting half
knee high from beneath, made her appearance. In her hands she bore
a large, wooden tray, dark and polished with grease, upon which was
a coffee-pot, a milk-pot of boiling milk, cups and saucers, sugar-bowl,
and a huge plate of toasted bread, another of butter, and a dish of
cranberries. The whole looked very inviting. She spread a
snow-white
napkin upon a table which Saul and I placed in the middle of
the apartment, and arranged the plates with great neatness. She then
poured out the coffee and milk together, as we had seen it done in the
restauraut.
`Come, my friends, let us take seats to the table,' said Saul.
We drew our chairs around it, and Saul paused and looked around
upon us.
`Don't you think,' said he, with an emotion in his frank
countenance
that moved us to respect, `don't you think that when I look
round and see so many home-land faces, that I feel for all the world as
if I ought to ask a blesssing. My father always did: and this
occasion
makes me feel like old times.'
`We should like to have you,' said Hewitt, respectfully and
reverently
bending his head.
`Then I will; for the sight of you all and the thoughts of home
make me feel more than common religious.'
The carpenter then folded his hands together and closed his eyes,
and asked a blessing with a solemnity that commanded even the silent
attention of the old negress.
We all did justice to the supper; at intervals of eating listening to
our host's account of the people of the place, the state of things, and
some advice as to our proceedings in a town which was not only filled
with troops but beseiged from without.
`You must be quiet and mind your own business,' said he. `If you
are challenged by a sentinel, as you will be at every corner and
sometimes
every ten rods, answer quick and say `amigo' or `carmorado.'
If a soldier won't make way for you to pass quietly, walk around him,
as any Yankee independence might give you a bayonet through your
bodyfor thev'd as lief kill a man as a dog, darn their skins!or a
lock up for a month in the calaboose; and if you once see the inside
o' that Calcutta-hole, you may say the Lord's prayer and hang yourself.
It's full o' robbers, murderers and cut-throats, thieves, prisoners of
war, niggers and devils, and all in one large stone room, as long and
high as our Weathersfield meetin has! If you see the
Governor-General
and his suit riding along, touch your hat to 'em, and keep out of
the way of their horses heels, for they'll not pull rein to keep from
running over any body. Don't quarrel with any body that wears a
sword or uniform, or you'll get the worst of it. Keep your own tougues
in your heads and don't talk politics; lor, being Yankees, you will, of
course, take the side of the Patriots outside, and if you are overheard
you will be arrested.'
`But can they know what we say, as we don't speak their language?'
asked Hewitt.
`There are plenty of spies about that understand both languages.
Don't trust to anything here; that's my advice. If you see the Host
going by and don't want to kneel to it, why just step in some shop door
or take off your hat. If you keep it on you'll be bayoneted as sure as
deth. I liked to have been once!'
`How was that?' we asked with interest.
`I had just made a small table for the Consul, and was carrying it to
his house, when the Host came full upon me down a cross street.
Everybody dropped right down upon their knees in the mud or on the
pavement, and began to eross themselves. The Host came on through
the middle of the street with its gilded banners, its canopy sapported
by four priests, and a whole procession of monks. A platoo of soldiers
marched afore them with fixed bayonets to clear the way. I stood
my table down and kind of leaned over it, for I'd never kneel to
the beast of Babylon. Wall, I forgot to take off my hat and was put
in mind of by seeing a bayonet darting over my head and
catching
the hat on its point. I made a grab at it and got it, when
another bayonet was launched at my breast. I should ha' been run
through if I hadn't caught up the table and caught the point. The
bayonet went into it an inch and broke off short. The Consul has
the table now, saying, he'd rather it as it is than have a new one
made!'
`What an escape!' responded Hewitt. `Why, it's as much as a man's
life is worth to live in such a place!'
`Yes it is; but only just be on the look-out and you'll get along
pretty well.'
`I wonder you are living now,' said Radsworth. You must make
money to stay here, Mr. Freelove!'
`Yes. I have laid up pretty well. I've cleared the matter' of
twelve hundred dollars a-year. I calk'late I shall take home with
me ten thousand dollars next spring, I then mean to court some
handsome Weathersfield gal that can make first-rate pumpkin-pies and
nut-cakes, and buy a farm and live there till I die.'
We then beguiled the evening talking, and gaining no little
information
from our host, when at length we were startled by the
heavy report of a cannon, followed instantaneously by a swell of
instrumental music.
`That's the eight o'clock gun in the square. Nobody goes out after
this hour without a pass from the captain-general. That music is
the governor's band. It plays every night an hour before the palace,
and I'll do them justice to say, that they have good music here
and no mistake. There's upwards of seventy instruments in the
band! Jist hear 'em! They are a third of a mile off from us,
and yet it sounds as if it was in the air right over our heads!
Some evening we will get a pass and go up to the Grand Square
and hear 'em!'
We opened the windows and listened with delight to the rich music
of the band, more than a dozen fine airs in the most masterly
style-Such
music neither of us had ever before heard. At nine o'clock it
ceased; the city became still, save the challenges and calls of the
sentries, which were heard almost every ten minutes, and had a singular
effect to our unaccustomed ears.
`Now, my friends, I'll show you to your beds,' said Saul taking
up the light and passing into the next room.
CHAPTER XVIII.
The Night's Lodging.
The
apartments into which our kind entertainer conducted us were
in an ell on the same floor with the room we had taken supper in.
To go to the rooms we had to walk along a balcony from which doors
opened into them. From this balcony steps led down into the yard.
`You see, these bed-rooms are small and don't look very inviting,
but Spanish houses al'ays look like prisons, and you can't make 'em
look any other way,' said Saul as he placed the light upon a niche in
the wall where, he said, that he had found a little image when he came,
left by former occupants. There was no window in either of the
rooms, which communicated by a door. A chair, table and wooden
bedstead covered with a mattrass comprised all the furniture.
`Things ain't so nice as you've been accustomed to to hnm, I guess;
but as you've been sleepin' so many weeks in a ship, I guess you'll
think any lodging a shure fit for the President, as I did! Well, good
night. You won't want many bed-clothes coz the nights is 'mazin'
hot, and I rayther guess you'll be glad to keep your doors open. You
can blow out the candle or keep it burning, and talk as long as you
want to. You see it's a wax one. They don't burn nothin' else here.
I can't find a taller candle in the whole city. Every nigger burns wax,
and when you go into the Cathedral you'll see some as big round as
my leg and tall as a fourth o' July flag staff!'
The good fellow then bade us again good night, and left us together
all in one room. We seated ourselves upon the bedside a few
moments
and then began to talk over the events of the day. We,
however
,
soon grew sleepy and paired off to bed, Hewitt and Radsworth
taking the one in the next room and Fairfax and I the one in the room
in which we were. I opened the door after taking off my coat and
vest and stepped out upon the balcony; for the night was close and
oppressive
.
It was a clear star-light atmosphere I gazed upon the
heavens and tried to recognize stars that I had seen at home. But I
was beneath new constellations. The North Star, the Great Bear were
far northward below the Equator. The Sword of Orion was just visible
close to the northern horizon. The Southern Cross, the Harp, and
the Magellan clouds were above me. I gazed on the latter with
curiosity
.
I had been told that they revolved with the earth, never setting.
They are three in number, forming the three angles of our equilateral
triangle. Two are of a whity, cloud-like appearance, and the third is
black to the eye, being so much darker than the blue depths of the sky
as to be strongly relieved against it. They are called the Magellan
clouds from being vertical to the Straits of Magellan. At Montevideo,
which is nearly in latitude 35 South, they were almost in the zenith.
I had not then heard of Synime's Theory, which indeed was not then
published. He accounts for these clouds in the following manner; and
as it is the only satisfactory one I have ever seen, I give it as I heard
it from his own lips so me years subsequently.
The earth being open at the poles has a verge which intersects
Magellan
on one side and Van Dieman's land on the other side of it. A
person at the Straits of Magellan looking across this verge or shadowy
chasm of five thousand miles diameter must of necessity see land on
the other side. He will not, however, see it on a level with his eye,
but it will be thrown by refraction so as to appear at the zenith! In
a word, he sees it distinctly overhead; and it revolves with the earth
always seen overhead, as well at sunset as just before dawn. It is
plainly to his eye a part of the globe.
Now the map will show you that the two southwest points of New
Holland and Van Dieman's land if seen across a school globe
depressed
or sunken in as above, will form a triangular aspect to the eye, Van
Dieman's land being within the verge, and beyond the sun's rays is in
shadow and looks dark, while the two great capes of New Holland
being
in the sun-light appear white.
This is Synime's theory; and is recorded here by me for what it is
worth. It certainly is the only plausible explanation ever offered for
the simultaneous revolution of this phenomenon with that of the earth.
The stillness of the hour, as I stood upon the balcony, was invaded
not only by the hoarse cries of the sentinels, stationed in all parts of
the city, but by a confused howling and barking of countless dogs.
Such a yelping never before assailed my ears. It seemed to me that
there must have been at Montevideo one dog to every biped, and
subsequent
observation led me to believe that there were seven to every
human being. At length I bade the night `good night,' and entered
my little room to go to sleep. I threw myself upon the bed along side
of Fairfax, who was sound asleep. From the adjacent room I could,
however, hear mutterings not loud but deep, from Hewitt, and an
occasional
exclamation of impatience and anger from Radsworth. I was
not long left in ignorance of the cause. I had not been five minutes
in bed when I found myself covered with animals I had but little
knowledge of before. An army of fleas had taken possession of me.
In a moment I was bitten from forehead to feet. I lay awhile and
scratched desperately, but at length anable longer to endure the
intolerable
itching inflammation produced in every pore of my skin by their
bites, I leaped from the bed and seizing the light, examined the
mattrass
.
They literally swarmed hopping over it, and one fairly hopped
into my eye. I was appalled. I rushed out upon the balcony in my
shirt and shook myself, while every nail of my ten fingers was
coursing
over my body with ceaseless industry. My cuticle was all on fire.
I was nearly wild with the fever and inflammation. I ran down stairs
into the yard where I had seen a cistern, and without more ado I sprang
for it to bury myself up to my neck. It contained no water. I
stumbled
over a bucket in one corner of the court. It seemed filled with
water. I took it up and poured it over my naked body. Such a stench
as rose from it I never encountered. What it was I know not to this
hour. It was horrible. It made my skin burn like coals of fire
Exposure
to the air brought on the itching worse than ever. I fairly
howled in concert with the dogs in the street. I was goaded to
madness
.
The pavement of the court I soon found swarmed with fleas,
and they bit my feet and ancles. I danced and for relief rolled in a
heap of shavings. While I was indulging in this amusement, down
came Hewitt.
`I can't stand this, no how!' he cried. `What the deuce is that in
the shavings?'
`It's I!' I answered savagely. `Have they driven you out?'
`I am devoured! My skin is covered with nettles! I had as lief
sleep on a bed of cowitch! For gracious sake tell me where there is
water,' he cried as he found none in the cistern. I could not tell him.
he raced round the court in his shirt like a madman. Finally he found
a brick-bat and began to rub himself down with it. Its rough surface
gave him momentary alleviation from his sufferings. Radsworth soon
came out on the balcony, and seeing us in the court, for the stars gave
considerable light he hurried down and called for water in the name of
mercy.
But I will not attempt to portray the horrors of this our first night
in Montevideo. I shall never forget it to my dying day. We wished
for day which seemed as if it would never come to our relief. At length
the dawn broke and we dressed ourselves, our skins fairly streaked
with blood. As the sun rose the itching subsided; for the bites of
fleas cease to annoy after day-break; and fortunate it was for us it is
so. Fairfax had slept the night out without being awakened, but the
spot where he lay was dappled with blood that had been drawn from
him. We tried to find the fleas by daylight, but not a villian of them
all was visible. Where they had hid themselves we ceuld not divine.
At length our host made his appearance. He found us all assembled,
pale and haggard upon the roof of his domicil.
`You are up early! How did you sleep my friends?' he asked
very kindly.
`Sleep, sir,' said Hewitt answering for the rest. `Not a wink have
we had the past night. We don't wish to say anything against your
lodgings, Mr. Freelove, but we were too many in a bed! The fleas
fairly drove us out!'
`Fleas! Them is the nat'ral production of the country. So you
didn't get any sleep for 'em,' he said laughing. `Wall, I know how
to feel for ye; but you'll soon get used to 'em! I dare say they did
put into ye some last night, coz they don't often get sich sweet pumpkin
flesh as yourn. You do looked streaked a bit!'
`We were bitten to death,' I answered. `We might as well have
slept in a beehive!'
`Wall, I'm plaguey sorry; but it's the country and I can't help it.
I thought when I first come here I'd have to get me a whole skin of
India-rubber half an inch thick. But I got used to it after a while.
Fleas 'll never bite a man twice in the same spot, never. But when
you've got bit all over once nice you needn't fear 'em. They don't
trouble the natives a bit coz there's no fresh places on 'em to bite; but
strangers do suffer some till they get fairly 'noculated. They don't
bite me now coz they've put their proboscises into every tarnal pore of
my skin!'
`I don't think then I shall be bitten again,' said I, `for I don't think
there is a fiesh place left on me!'
`We are certainly comforted by what Mr. Freelove says,' said
Hewitt
gravely, with his habitual twitching of the nose. `Are they as bad
in other houses?'
`I don't calculate there's any difference to speak on. Fleas is as
natural to a house here in Montevideo as thistles on the road-side.
But you've got through the worst of it. Come let's go down and see
what Jenny's got for breakfast.'
I lingered a moment to take a sun-rise view of the surrounding
country
.
Not far from me rose the gloomy walls of the calaboose, and
behind
it stretched a long range of the battlemented walls on which
sentries
were walking. Beyond I could discern the naked country,
destitute
of tree or house for a mile outside the walls; but farther off I
saw pleasant villas in the midst of groves and gardens, and farther still
a white church with a hamlet at its feet, and still farther the white
tents of the Buenos Ayrean army. Here and there along the open
ways I could detect parties of horsemen galloping at full speed, their
sabres flashing in the sun. The sound of the morning gun had already
ceased echoing from the castle on the Mount on the opposite side of
the harbor, and the bells of the cathedral were ringing still their loud
call to matins. The clamor of dogs had given place to military music,
and life and activity had taken the place of the dreadful night we had
passed. A slight breeze fanned my temples and invigorated me, and
following the rest below I soon gave evidence that my want of sleep
had not destroyed my appetite. We had an excellent breakfast,
delicious
coffee, hot rolls, beef-steak and roasted yams.
After breakfast we sallied forth to seek out our `Merchant,' and
learn how he and his hopeful sons had passed the night. We did not
leave Mr. Freelove's hospitable roof, however, without returning him
our thanks for his kindness; and as we knew he would feel offended if
we offered him pay, each of us, in the course of the day, made him a
present of a book, which we saw pleased him more than a doubloon
would have.
The streets presented a lively appearance, At every step we saw
something to attract our curiosity. We met a regiment of black troops
in scarlet coats and white trousers marching to a distant quarter of the
city. We saw a large number of officers grouped about the doors of
the cafes, or opposite the quarters of their generals. These officers
were mostly young men, many of them strikingly handsome and
wearing
mustaches. Their uniforms were very splendid. Some of their
frock coats were covered with silk and gold embroidery. I noticed a
very beautiful boy of fifteen, who wore a uniform perfectly gorgeous,
and at the same time graceful. I afterwards learned he was a Colonel.
His father was a duke. Indeed most of the officers were nobles.
Now and then we beheld a war-worn warrior, his face scarred, or an
arm or leg lacking, and features hid in enormous mustaches. For hair
on the face the negro soldiers took the palm. Some that we saw
showed
only their glittering eyes through a mass of hair. They looked like
bears doing military duty.
At every corner we were challenged by a sentry. We responded
`Comarada,' and passed on unmolested. Hewitt, however, came near
being beyoneted just before we reached our shop. He took upon
himself
to be spokesman, as he wanted to speak at least one word of a
foreign language. He was challenged just as he went ahead of us.
His answer was `Caramba!' This is a word that is constantly in
every
Spaniard's or Portuguese mouth, and is an exclamation of surprise
equivalent to `The devil!' or `Indeed!' `Is it so?' &c. &c. Hewitt
mistook it for Comarada, `comrade,' and thundered it out. The
soldier
looked at him with angry surprise, brought his bayonet to the
charge and challenged again. Hewitt found he was wrong and yelled
out `St. Jago,' for `Amigo,'
friend
, the word he wanted. The soldier
rushed upon him with his levelled bayonet, and Hewitt turned and run.
I could not help laughing, serious as the affair was, for the soldiers had
orders to shoot down every person that did not respond properly to the
challenge.
`Amigo,' I cried, springing forward and laying my hand on the
soldier's
musket. `El joven es Americana of no entiende Portugues,' I
said in my best Spanish. He understood me, and with an oath
returned
to his post.
From this moment I was dubbed interpreter of our party; for I had
spoken Spanish and so well that I was understood by a Portuguese. It
is true I had paid very close attention to the language on the voyage
and had committed to memory several hundred phrases. One of these
I now found useful, and gaining confidence from this success I
resolved
to speak Spanish at every opportunity, even to Portuguese; the two
languages being so analagous that the citizens of the two countries
find little difficulty in understanding one another. At length we
reached
our `shop.'
CHAPTER XIX.
The Arrest.
When
we entered the `shop' we found the old gentleman busy at
work preparing to charge his soda-fountains. He looked as bright as
a lark and seemed to be in fine spirits.
`Ah, good morning, boys,' he said. `I am glad you've come. You
should keep better hours for business. Now off jackets and go to
work. We have enough to keep us all busy. A dozen gentlemen
have already called in to get a glass of soda. I am losing ten dollars
clear every hour the soda is delayed!'
`Hope you slept well last night, sir?' said Hewitt dryly, though he
had five minutes before privately expressed to us the wish that the fleas
had flayed him.
`Haven't had such a night's rest since I left Boston!'
`Confound his tough old hide,' said Hewitt aside to us. `He has
the cuticle of a rhinoceros. But here comes Ned. He looks pale
enough. How did you sleep, sir?' asked Hewitt gravely.
`Sleep! I liked to have been eaten up. I never knew the like.
The fleas in this country have bills like forceps. I walked the roof all
night,' and he twisted up his face till it seemed as if the rim of his
spectacles twisted too. Did you have any fleas where you slept?'
`We had mattrasses-stuffed with them,' answered Radsworth.
`Come boys, don't talk but work. We must have every thing ready
by noon. I mean to charge two of the fountains and set 'em up ready
to sell from by twelve o'clock.'
By twelve o'clock, for we went cheerfully to work to help him, we
had the fountains ready, the pipes screwed, the syrups and tumblers all
set out upon the counter, and everything put in apple-pie order. Ned
had cut out of blue and yellow paper a scolloped border for each shelf
which he had nailed on, and had suspended paper festoons around the
window and over the pictures that hung upon the walls. The whole
interior had quite a respectable and inviting look. As I had some skill
in lettering it fell to me to paint in red letters on a blue ground upon
small boards the signs of the establishment. I had them both ready
by two o'clock and stuck out on either side of the door. As
signs
in
Montevideo are hardly known, they attracted not a little attention.
One of them was done in Spanish, the other in English. They read
as follows:
`
Agna de Soda
.' `
Soda-water
.'
The charge of one of the fountains was given to Hewitt, and the
other I took; for the affair had got to be for us by this time quite
amusing, and a joke that we took no little pleasure in carrying through.
Doubtless the old gentleman thought all this while that he had four
very precious docile fools to deal with. But our time came by and by.
We let him have his now.
In a few minutes the room was filled with customers. English and
American naval officers, sea-captains of all nations, and Brazilian
officers
of both services. We could hardly draw fast enough for the thirsty
crowd. The quarters of dollars poured in upon us as fast as the old
man could gather them up. It was a new thing. Many of them,
particularly
the natives had never seen soda before. Its sparkling
coolness
was refreshing. It was a new sensation to them. The syrups
were delicious. I drew four tumblers for one fierce Brazilian naval
captain, in succession, for which he threw down a Spanish dollar.
Old Bedrick was in raptures at this wonderful success. The sweat
poured down his cheeks with excitement. All day the demand
contioned
with but little abatement. The old man charged his fountains
four times. Hewitt and I were relieved by Fairtax and Radsworth,
and sometimes Edwin would condescend to draw a glass for a
customer
.
It was a hard day's work. We were glad when it became night;
for then all places of business closed, save three or four cafes kept
open by special license from the Governor. We closed our shop and
went up stairs to supper, where also we had dined. Bedrick having
commissioned William, his son, to cater, and look after these matters.
To do Bill justice he-did his duty by us. He got the beds up, `the
parlor' (I mean the large saloon) furnished with furniture brought out
in the ship, and the crockery placed in a cupboard. He proved
himself
a good house-keeper, and when we went up stairs at the close of
the day's work, (which had brought the old man in two hundred and
thirty-seven dollars,) we found a nice supper set out for us, and every
thing in the bed-room looking quite comfortable,' The walls to be
sure were bare, and the floors brick, and every thing had a prison-like
look from the peculiar structure of the mansion; but things were so
much better than we looked for that we were quite pleased. The old
gentleman had grown so rich in one day that he had no appetite to eat.
He had put all his money in a shot bag, and it lay by his plate. He
looked more like eating its contents than those of his plate and cup.
A wax candle stood in the centre of the table, and we seven sat around
it, and made, I must say, a very merry supper. We were all in the
best of humors. The old man praised us, and we almost loved him as
a father, but resolved to run away from him, nevertheless, the first good
opportunity.
That night we slept better; for I had taken the precaution to elevate
my mattrass upon the table, while the rest slept upon the roof or upon
boards laid from the window to a bench. The old man, between joy,
and dollars and fleas, did not get a wink's sleep. I heard him up half
the night, and always heard at the same time the clink of silver. I
dare say he passed the night counting his gains and killing fleas. I do
not say the fleas did not trouble me. They were few, however,
compared
with those that made my acquaintance the night preceding. I
do not think I was bitten by more than a hundred and fifty on this
second
trial of sleep
vs.
fleas.
Affairs went on swimmingly for several days. The soda was a great
card
in the town, and took well. The receipts, however, were never
afterwards so large as on the first day; for many then came in to taste
it who never came a second time. Our custom, therefore, settled
down into a certain number that imbibed it as a luxury. The old
gentleman
was shrewd. When he found the soda palled, he added Port
wine to their glasses, and so introduced the soda-sangaree to the
Brazilian
palate. At other times he added coniac. The latter took
admirably
,
and in a few days the simple soda was rarely called for. We
however did well, and as the old gentleman had two other fountains,
he resolved to hire a shop at the other extremity of the city near the
gate, and place in charge of it, Fairfax and Radsworth, with his son
Edwin to oversee. He therefore, made a selection, hired a room at the
corner of two frequented streets within sight of the principal gate, and
not more than a hundred rods from it. To this place he removed the
two soda fountains, and having employed our friend Freelove, soon had
things looking quite shop-like. Fairfax and Radsworth made no
objections
to taking charge; for it was our policy to live on the old
gentleman
as long as we found it for our interest, looking round us in the
meanwhile for some opportunity of bettering our condition. We were
not a little mortified at times on finding ourselves treated coolly as
inferiors
,
by young officers, both English and American, who came into
our shops, when, forgetting that we were `bar-tenders' we presumed
upon our birth and education and respectability at home, to converse
freely with them. We, however, pocketed the slight, knowing that
we were only
playing
at soda-shop for the time being.
After we had been a fortnight in Montevideo, both shops were in full
blast with their four fountains. The old man now passed his time in
making the soda and trotting between his two shops, which were about
half a mile apart. He took upon an average one hundred and fifty
dollars a day in both places together. We lived in the rooms over the
first shop on the Quay street. The old man having then got matters in
full tide of success began to play the petty tyrant. He compelled us
to rise at daybreak, and follow him to market with baskets like
servants
.
This we had to do, or else break out into open rebellion before
the time was ripe. He wanted to make us wash for `the family,' two
at a time each week, and also to act as cook by turn. We positively
refused to do any other washing than our own, but consented after
some parleying to cook. He would have compelled us to make the
beds and keep the house clean, but we told him we would not, and that
he must hire a black woman. Finally, he consented to do so, but as
she could not speak English nor he Portuguese, they quarrelled a
dozen
times the first day in their own dialect, and at night the old man
kicked her out of the house.
Half an hour afterwards we were at supper, when four black soldiers
headed by a sergeant, entered the room, and surrounded the table in
silence. The old black woman hobbled in in their rear.
`That is the old man,' she said in Portuguese, pointing fiercely at
our `merchant,' who became very pale, while we looked on dismayed.
`You owe this woman two dollars for her day's work,' said the sergeant
sternly in Portuguese; `pay her or come with me to prison!'
`What is that he says?' asked the old man looking at his son for an
interpretation. Ned interpreted as much as he understood and I what
I comprehended, and so made it clear.
`I don't owe her a cent! She lies! She undid every thing I told
her to do, I won't pay her!'
`Que dice el caballero?' asked the sergeant turning to me and
addressing
me in Spanish.
`He says,' I answered after a moment's reflection upon what Spanish
I had learned, `he says that he don't owe her anything!'
`Then he must go to prison!'
`What does he say?' inquired the old man.
`That you must go to the calaboose!'
`You had best pay her father,' said Ned as white as a sheet.
`It's robbery, downright robbery,' cried the avaricious old man
taking
two dollars from his waistcoat pocket, and throwing them at the
woman's head. She grinned and picked them up and was going off,
when the sergeant called her and compelled her to relinqnish to him
one of the dollars, which she did with very ill grace. The whole party
then left us to ourselves. The old man are no more supper. He did
not like this summary way of administering justice at all. He abused
the city, the soldiers, the government, and every negro woman in
general
,
and this one in particular. Our friend, the carpenter, soon came
in and turned the tide. He said he had obtained a pass for us to be
out till ten o'clock, and that if we chose to go with him as a guide, he
would take us to the great square to hear the Governor's band before
the palace, and visit some of the saloons and cafes, and show us
something
of the city. The old man would have prevented our going, but
without paying him any attention we sallied out, each armed with a
stout cudgel, and some of us with daggers.
Although we had been a fortnight in the city we had seen very little
of it, so closely had we been kept in our shops; once in a while, only,
could we get half an hour to ramble through the streets. Evenings
we dared not venture forth on account of the strict military police.
The most we saw of the city was mornings going to and from market.
At such times we were entertained with a variety of novel and
interesting
objects. The streets, at that hour, were filled with negroes, the
men nearly naked, and the women in gay petticoats and flashy turbans.
The dogs, too, that we encountered were innumerable. Their name
was `Legion.' And such dogs. They looked and acted like gaunt
wolves or starved hyenas. They would sometimes assemble in scores
in the middle of the street, or by the side of an old wall growling,
snarling, and fighting savagely over carrion. They turned aside for
no one. Not even horses galloping past could move them. They
would show their sharp, white fangs, and snap at the horse's legs.
These animals always sheered from them with fear. We were told by
Freelove that when very hungry they will attack negroes carrying
marketing
and if he defends it, it is at the risk of being torn in pieces.
He said, also, that he saw a wounded man who had been stabbed and
was running from his murderers pursued by a pack of these dogs, who
getting the scent of blood, took up the hue and cry, overtook him,
leaped upon him, bore him to the ground and literally tore him in
pieces and devoured him.
We saw these dogs in hundreds about the market, the bolder ones
prowling among the meat stalls, the more cautions sitting in groups of
twenty or thirty at a little distance waiting to pounce upon the offals
after the marketing was over. I am puzzled to tell which we dreaded
most, the dogs or the soldiers. The latter were lawless, wanton and
cruel. They knew that any act of aggression against the citizens
would be overlooked by their superiors, and they were always ready
to insult. That so few outrages were committed by them is
surprising
,
when they were at liberty to run any body through the body they
chose.
The market stalls were occupied wholly by black women. Among
them and the numerous individuals of the race I encountered in the
city, which is as full of negroes as it is of dogs or of soldiers, I saw
for the first time the pure Afric slave speaking his own jargon with his
fellow. They were nearly naked, of a shining black, their breasts and
faces tatooed, and the feature excessively ugly and brutal. It is
worthy
of remark how soon the native African falls into the habits of the
slave. I saw one day at work upon the mole about thirty blacks,
strong, athletic fellows with only a piece of white cotton about their
loins, which, I was told, had only been landed seven weeks from
Africa
.
They were unloading a Brazilian brig, and seemed as docile and
laborious as those who were born slaves. You can tell the newly
imported
slave by his nakedness, and also more truly by a certain
Indian-like
wildness in his eye and movements. Most of the slaves wore
amulets about their necks, beads, bones, sharks' teeth, brass or copper
rings, which also encircle their wrists and depend from their ears.
Those who are Catholic christians add crosses. I have seen several
with iron collars rivetted (for life) on their necks by their masters. I
have seen them with their backs striped like the hide of the zebra
with the welts of the lash. They are seemingly, withal, a mirthful
race, especially the females, who are ever chattering and laughing.
CHAPTER XX.
The Cathedral Square.
When we got into the street we took our way, under the guidance
of Saul, in the direction of the grand square. The night was not
dark, a new moon giving us its light. The shops and stores were all
closed, save here and there a `pulperio' or grocery on the corner, the
proprietor of which had license to keep open until the gun fired. The
outside of the houses as we passed along were, therefore, on the ground
story, silent and dark, wearing that gloomy aspect peculiar to all
Spanish towns. Every door seemed rather the inlet to a prison than
a house or shop. The shops indeed were large desolate-looking places,
unenlivened by the showy windows and display of goods that render
them, in Northern cities, so attractive to the eye. The Spanish
dry-goods
dealer does not hang his goods about his door, and as he has no
sign, it is difficult to distinguish the stores from dwellings until you
are in the door.
The second stories of the houses, however, atone for the gloomy
austerity of the first floor. The windows always open upon balconies,
and are shaded by gay-colored awnings, some of them very beautifully
fringed. The ladies sit at them to gaze down upon the street and form
attractive objects for the eye of the passer-by.
As we now passed along, lights streamed across the streets from
nearly all the second story windows, which were open and through
which we could hear talking, laughing, and the sound of the piano,
and often the notes of the guitar, accompanied by rich female voices,
mingled with manly tones. The crimson, orange, or blue drapery of
the long windows, lighted up by the candles from the parlors within,
gave the whole street a brilliant appearance. We often stopped to
listen to the mirthful laughter of the young girls and the melody of the
guitar.
At one house, beneath the balcony, we saw an officer wrapped in a
cloak, who was thrumming a guitar, while from the balcony two ladies
bent over listening. He played finely. It was a real Spanish
serenade
,
and did more to make us realize that we were in a foreign
country
than anything else. We could not see the faces of the ladies, but
presume they were young and handsome Saul told us that a rich
Brazilian merchant lived there, who had three handsome daughters,
and that somebody or other was always playing the guitar to them.
We all felt a great desire to see and become acquainted with these
Brazilian beauties; but our aspirations somewhat fell when we
recollected
that we were no longer `young gentlemen' upon a par with
good society, but merely soda-shop boysbar-tenders! This
reflection
made me, at least, resolve that I would soon change my position
and prospects in society.
At the pulperias,' on the street corners, we passed groups of
soldiers
,
mostly black, lounging about the steps, or else inside, playing
dominoesa favorite game with all classescards, drinking or
smoking
They did not molest us, though they did not move aside to let
us pass, and so we quietly took the middle of the street.
On our way we passed the residence of the English Consul. It was
brilliantly lighted up, end the sounds of music and dancing met our
ears, while figures moving in the graceful waltz flitted past the
window.
`This is the English Consulate,' said Saul. `He gives a party
to all the English, French, and American officers and citizens.'
`I should like to have had an invitation,' said Fairfax. `I see
there dancing two or three American midshipmen much younger
than I am.'
`You won't be likely to get invited to such parties, I calculate,'
answered Saul, dryly. `It's only the distinguished folks and
respectable
citizens. When you get invitations to the great parties here, I
guess they'll invite me too! Folks are mighty nice here who they
invite
.
I guess if any of them English or 'Merican officers should see
you in there and remember you sold them soda-water, they would
give the cold shoulder and perhaps ask you what you was a doin'
there among gentlemen?'
This rejoinder of Paul's stung me as well as my companions to the
quick. It revealed to us out true position. We saw that we were
sacrificing our `respectability,' as the world calls it, by remaining with
Mr. Bedrick. We saw that we were looked upon, not with reference
to our true position as members of families of respectability at home,
but merely as shop-boys, bar-tenders in Monte Video, just as we should
regard others whom we saw in our situation. Our pride was touched.
We said nothing then; but each one mentally resolved, as we found,
on comparing sensations afterwards, on immediately quitting the old
man and trust to fortune for something else to do.
To remain as shop-boys, we felt would he a bar (without a pun) to
our obtaining situations in respectable mercantile houses. Our minds
were at once made up, as with gloomy and bitter feelings we left the
gay scene behind, from which we were excluded, wholly from our
connexion
with a man who was engaged in an occupation that was in the
lowest class of pursuits
We soon reached the Grande Plaza or Square, and as the Band
entered it from the barracks at the same moment we did, our attention
was drawn off from ourselves to the scene around us. The square
was a large area, having on one side the Cathedral, on another the
Governor's palace, and the public offices, halls of justice, &c., on the
remaining sides.
The buildings thus surrounding it were of grand proportions, and
being built in the massive style of Morisco-Spanish architecture were
imposing to the eye. The palace was directly in front of us; and
being lighted up by numerous torches, held in the hands of soldiers
stationed before it, presented a striking appearance. Its masses of
light and shadow had a fine effect. The band escorted by a
detachment
of the imperial guard, after marching along, by tap of drum two
sides of the square, drew up before the palace. In a moment
afterwards
the Cathedral clock tolled eight, and an eighteen pounder,
opposite
to the palace, was discharged, the explosion shaking the very
ground upon which we stood. At the same instant the Band struck
up a brilliant national air, and for a time the whole universe seemed
to my senses filled, swelling, crashing with music.
We listened for an hour to a great variety of pieces, marches,
waltzes and even dirges. At nine they ceased playing, another gun
was fired, the Band wheeled into column, and escorted by the Guard,
marched across the square at a lively air played upon the drum and
pipe, and soon disappeared in the street leading to their barracks.
The torches were extinguished, and in ten minutes silence reigned
over the square. A few of the windows of the place were lighted, and
from the interior of the Cathedral a faint glimmer like twilight was
perceptible.
`Have you been in the Cathedral?' asked Saul.
We replied in the negative. He then proposed that we should enter
and see it by night, for `it had,' said he, `such a strange, mysterious
look about it, made a man feel as if his soul was in a nut-shell.'
We crossed the square in a body, arm in arm, Saul going in advance
a step or two.
When we came to the entrance of the dark, towering mass, we were
challenged by a sentinel, who was concealed in the shadow of a
butress. His `Quien va la?' was the only intimation of his
presence
.
`Amigos,' answered Saul in Spanish; for he had such an extreme
dislike of the Portuguese invaders that he would not speak their
language.
`Let me see your pass, senor?' demanded the soldier, in harsh
Portuguese.
Saul held it out to him. The man opened a small dark lantern
which was hung at his belt and examining it, said, `Bon!' and stood
aside to let us pass on where we chose.
We entered the church through a vast entrance wrapped in
darkness
,
our way guided only by the distant glimmer of seven wax
candles
which burned at the extremity. Our sensations as we advanced
deeper into the vast pilevast to our ideas who were conversant only
with New England meeting-houseswere solemn and tinged with awe.
The light of the candles only lighted up the altar, with its gold and
silver vessels, its gorgeous apparatus of a gorgeous worship. The
nave and extremities of the Cathedral were buried in profound
darkness
,
in which the twilight that prevailed near the altar was lost. We
could behold neither the roof nor the sides. It seemed like looking
off and upward into infinite darkness.
Saul and the rest passed slowly on, with their hats carried reverently
in their hands, and their steps noiseless; yet so deep was the stillness,
that the rustling of their motion awoke the unillumined silence of the
distant corridors in faint, rustling echoes, as if spirits were
passing
by.
I let the others walk on, to gaze more nearly upon the magnificence
of the altar. I remained alone, to indulge in the new and heart
profound
emotions which the place awakenened. It seemed to fathom
my soul and stir up its depths, flinging to its surface thoughts and
sensations I had never experiencedthat I knew not were in my
being. A feeling of awe took hold upon me, and I remember that the
idea of God and Eternity pressed upon me with irresistible power.
A shadowy form, a foot-fall in the dim corridor drew my attention,
and presently it approached me across the paved floor, for the
vast floor was paved with marble and unobstructed by pews, and as it
came nearer I saw it was a priest. He passed close by my side,
lingered and regarded me in the indistinct light, and then saying
kindly `Benedicite!' proceeded on his way acrooss the church. I
followed his retreating figure till it blended with the darkness; then
I heard a distant door open and close again with a loud echoing
sound. I followed him in my heart with feelings of interest, for he
had blessed me, knowing me notbut looking upon me only as a
brother of God's great family. I had always had a prejudice against
the Roman Catholics, but the religious awe inspired by the place I
was now in and the gentle `Bless thee!' of the muffled monk opened
my heart and dissipated my prejudices. Since then I have travelled
more and seen more of mankind; and every year's experience has
taught me to be charitable to all men,' and regard every man as a
brother for whom Christ died. I have learned to look over the
barriers
of sect and see the man beyond and recognize in him God's
image, and an heir of Christ's kingdom. We are charitable towards
men of no religions, we are charitable towards the heathen-man: but
when we encounter those who differ from us in modes of worship or
in articles of christian faith we
hate them!
A christian sectarian who
will scrcely eat bread with one of another denomination, will find no
cause for quarrel with a Chinese or Hindoo. He will not hate him!
But he does hate and revile his brother who, knowing and believing
the true God and Jesus Christ whom he has sent, worships him not
as
he
worships. I have seen good men of all faiths. All creeds are
good that lead men back to God. The various and diverse
denominations
of christians constitute, like the beautiful rainbow which is
composed
of seven colors, one beautiful whole that shall span earth and
heaven. But I am not cheating my readers into a sermon.
Alone I slowly walked around the interior of the Cathedral. Niches,
in which stood richly attired Madonnas, St. Johns, St. Peters, and
St. Pauls, alternated with large paintings of scenes from the New
Testament
,
relieved the walls; but owing to the obscurity, were but faintly
visible. The floor in front of the altar was literally paved with
sepulchral
slabs covering the crypt where slept the distinguished dead.
Some of these bore armorial bearings, and the inscriptions of all being
in Latin, were easily made out by us.
The altar was a grand pile of splendor. It is impossible to describe
its magnificence. It presented to the eye a confused mass of gold,
silver, and precious stones; of gilded columns, silver arches and
silver
pillars; golden candlesticks, rich silken and velvet drapery, scarlet
purple, azure, and orange colors; silver crucifixes, crosses, statues, all
of solid silver and gold. Altar rose on altar in a pyramidial series of
platform, each accession in elevation more glorious than the lower.
The whole dazzling structure was crowned by a blazing cross of
precious
stones.
All this was seen by the light of seven wax candles which burn day
and night before the alter. They were seven feet high, and stood in
pillar-like candle-sticks eight feet in height, of solid silver. I was
moving
away from the spot on which I had stood beholding this scene of
elaborate magnificence, when I was startled by a low sobbing near me.
I looked in the direction whence it came, and discovered a female
keeeling before the altar. She was obscured by the shadows of the
railings, which, interrupting the light from the candles, fell across the
crypt, throwing it upon alternate bars of light and shadow. As I
gazed, she seemed to be at prayer, for I heard low words in a soft but
sad tone. I was deeply moved.
I drew nigh and passed her twice with a heavy step. But she took
no notice of meshe seemed to be wholly wrapped in her grief and
devotions. I felt tempted to speak to her and assure her of my
sympathy
;
but I reflected that she might not be able to understand
English
and I could not speak Portuguese.
While I was thus deliberating she rose from her knees, and crossing
herself glided away towards the corridor on the right of the altar. I
followed her and saw her enter a low door and disappear. I began to
think then of what I had read in old romances, and it seemed to me
as if I was acting a part in one of them. What I had seen was so in
keeping with the place, that all the romance of my nature was kindled.
I fancied, for she was evidently youthful, that she was some lovely nun
who had a tyrannical father, who had compelled her to take the veil;
that her loverfor I gave her a loverhad pined away and died of
grief and was buried beneath the crypt; and every night she came to
weep and pray upon the tomb; for she had been kneeling on a white
marble slab.
I went back to see what was inscribed upon it, when to the
discomfiture
of the latter supposition of my story, I found that the person
whose memory it commemorated was an Archbishop of seventy, who
had died half a century ago
Seeing my friends about departing, I now hastened to join them,
and together we left the place.
`Here is a marble basin,' said Saul, `where they keep what they
call `holy water.
As he spoke he laid his hand upon an indistinctly seen urn of white
marble that stood by the door.
`Every body dips their finger in it going in and coming out and
makes the sign of the cross upon their breasts and forehead. I asked
old Juana once what they did it for, and she said it was to keep the
devil from going in with 'em, and when they come out to keep him
from getting into 'em!'
With this remark of Saul's we emerged into the square, and took
our way towards home, which we reached without any adventure, but
not without being challenged or stopped at every guard-house we passed
on the way.
CHAPTER XXI.
The Battle.
Upon
entering the house we found the old man up waiting for us.
He met us with an angry look and demanded very fiercely why we had
staid out so late. It was about half-past nine. Neither of us made
any reply but passing him proceeded to our rooms. We heard him
foaming and fussing and calling us all kinds of names as we closed
our door and fastened it. Striking a light we set it upon a table and
called a council of war.
`It is time,' said Fairfax, `that the old man and ourselves came to
an understanding. As to remaining longer with him degrading
ourselves
by retailing soda and Port wine sangarees to the officers of the
navy and army, I for one will do it no longer!'
`Nor will I! Nor I! Nor
I!
' was the unanimous response.
`Softly boys,' said Hewitt. `We must move with discretion. We
have caught ourselves in a scrape and we must act prudently to get out
of it.'
`If you choose to remain,' answered Radsworth, `you are at liberty
to do so. I think you have a sort of hankering for the old deceiver.
You seem to be on better terms with him than any of us; and he likes
you better than the rest of us!'
`I have acted prudently only. You know we are dependent on him
and until we can find other employment must continue to be. This I
have thought of. If I had money I would not stay another day, but
dress up and go and board at the British Coffee House till I could get
a passage home. Suppose we should all leave him to-morrow, where
should we go? Where should we sleep to-morrow night? I have not
but thirty dollars in the world, and each one is worth its weight in
gold to me so far from home. None of you have much more. Paul,
here, says his father forgot to leave him any when he took leave of him
on board the brig, and he was too much taken up with parting to
remind
him of it.'
`I have ninety-five dollars,' answered Fairfax very positively.
What Hewitt had said was the truth. My father had not given me
any money, and I had not asked him for any, supposing he would leave
some with me at parting. In the hurry and grief of separation, I did
not again think of it, and perhaps, he did not; at any rate, I had with
me but seven dollars and a quarter, and ten thousand miles from home,
without a friend or acquaintance, and only eighteen years of age. I
was not, however, disheartened. Neither of us were disposed to
despair
.
We were healthy, had a good flow of spirits, plenty of hope and
were ready to do and dare!
`Your ninety-five dollars, George, won't last long if you go to a
hotel. They charge three dollars a day.'
`You shall all share with me. We will make one purse in common,
boys!' he said generously. `All our riches together will make about
one hundred and seventy dollars. I propose that we quit old Hunks in
a body to-morrow and trust to fortune for the inture!'
`I don't think so,' said the moderate Hewitt. `Let us stay and save
every dollar till we shall need its use.'
`I propose,' said I, `that we in the morning come to an
understanding
with the old man. Let us have a regular `talk' with him, let him
know that we are acquainted with his duplicity, and then tell him that
it is our intention to quit him and throw ourselves upon the protection
of the American Consul. At this he will become alarmed, and then
we will propose to him that if he will pay us each a dollar a day we
will consent to remain with him until we can do something better, or
get a passage back to the United States. We shall thus be getting
money for our services, and laying up something for a day of necessity.
If he refuses we will then wait upon the Consul, state our grievances
and the trick that has been put upon us in thus luring us from our
native
land and be guided by his advice. I have a letter in my pocket
from my father to Colonel Forbes, our
charge d' affaires
at Buenos
Ayres, which I will show to the consul in testimony of our `
respectability'
and let him understand that we are not exactly `bar-boys.'
This speech of mine was received with general approbation, and it
was decided unanimously that this course should be adopted.
`I never thought of the Consul,' said Hewitt with an air of surprise.
`He's the very man to look to! He stands instead of our country to
protect us and all other Americans. We'll get the weather side of old
Bedrick yet!' And rubbing his hands he chuckled and snuffled his
nose at the idea.
We now retired to bed. I slept little for the fleas, and for thinking
of the step we were about to take in the morning. I may observe here
that I was less and less annoyed each successive night by these
miserable
natives
, and was rapidly bringing to a successful test the remark
of Saul, for I had not been a fortnight on shore when nearly every
pore in my body had been pierced by their bills.
About daylight I was awakened from a drowsy sleep into which I
had fallen by a heavy cannonading mingled with musketry. In my
half-waking half-asleep state I fancied that it was a thunder storm
accompanied
by hail rattling upon the roof. I heard, however, my
companions rousing up and calling out that there must be fighting. I
sprung to my feet and hastily dressed, while the walls of the house
shook with the heavy discharges of artillery, and the flashes of the
explosion
reddened to the zenith and lighted the room, for it was yet
scarcely day.
While I was putting on my coat the old man came running in in his
green flannel gown crying in great trepidation:
`There is a battle? There is a fight! They are attacking the
town! What shall we do?'
I did not answer him, but hurrying on my dress hastened to the roof
of the house, which I reached at the same moment with Fairfax and
Bill Bedrick. I have already said that the top of our house
commanded
an extensive view over a portion of the city, the harbor, the curve
of the opposite shore, and the castillated mound. Upon gaining the
top of the house and mounting the battlement, I witnessed a scene
that made my blood thrill with wild excitement. The castle upon the
Mount, a mile and a half distant from the place on which I stood, was
in the act of being stormed by the patriots. The masses of cavalry,
some dismounted and acting as infantry, were surrounding its base,
swaying this way and that like the waves of the sea, now pressing
forward
like an overwhelming billow, now retiring a little to renew its
onset, while from its van, its bosom and its flank flashed sheets of flame
which gave light to the terrific scene. The castle which they were
assaulting was enveloped in smoke and jetting flames from the artillery
which from the embrasures poured its fire upon them. In the harbor
four of five vessels were opening their broadsides upon the patriots,
raking them across a low piece of ground which lay at the foot of the
hill. The roar of artillery, its red glare in the heavens, like incessant
sheet lightning, the rattling of musketry, the sharp ringing of pistols,
and the cries of those engaged, which distinctly reached our ears,
presented
a scene such as I had before no conception could be enacted
on this lower earth, The tops of the houses were crowded with
spectators
,
whose vivas and exclamations were constant. The city itself
was in a condition of the highest excitement. Drums sounded to
arms, bugles swelled upon the air from every quarter. General officers
dashed up and down the streets, now this way now that, encircled by
their staffs, giving orders to their aids as they galloped by. In a few
minutes after I had reached the roof I beheld a regiment advancing at
a round trot from the Grande Square, their officers with waving swords
and loud voices encouraging them on. They passed along the street
beneath me like a torrent. Then appeared a detachment of cavalry
galloping after them at full speed. Then from a cross street came
battalion
after battalion of infantry and artillery, all pressing forward
towards
the quay. I soon saw the object of this movement by beholding
several barges filled with troops launch out from the mole and pull
across the harbor. All the boats of the fleet were in requisition.
Barge after barge crowded with men rapidly pulled across towards
the scene of contest. While I was looking, Saul Freelove stood by
my side.
`So you are looking at the battle. Wall, it's a sight one don't see
every day in the States, but since I've been here I've seen so much
fighting I've got a sort a used to it! I came over here as I couldn't
see the castle plain from my house, and to tell you all you needn't be
frightened, it'll soon blow over. The darned Brazilians think they'll
do somethin' by sendin' over their sogers in the boats, but the patriots
ain't going to be caught in a trap. They know what they are about;
though it does seem a sort of foolish thing to take a castle without
artillery
!
Look and see how them brave
sellers
climb up the walls.
There's bloody work going on there, and God have mercy on their
souls. It's as bad as Bunker Hill!'
`Can you tell how many patriots there are engaged?' I asked.
`About two thousand I should guess; but they don't stay still enough
for me to count 'em, and then there is sich a smoke and firing?'
`I wish I was there in the midst!' I cried with youthful enthusiasm.
`I would like to help the patriots.'
`You'd wish yourself back again,' answered Saul dryly. `Jest see
them fellers tumble off the horses and roll down hill. See them
horses
without riders flying like mad towards the country. You be like
never to see Boston State-hus agen if you was there!'
Nevertheless I felt as if I should very much like to be there. I had
caught the spirit of battle, and I almost wished for wings to fly to
mingle in the conflict. The interest of the contest grew each
moment
more absorbing. Battalion after battalion marched through the
city, embarked at the mole, and pressed towards the opposite shore
where they disembarked and formed under cover of the fire from the
shipping. In the meanwhile, the assailants strove to possess
themselves
of the fortress with a bravery that was wonderful.
Unintimidated
by the fire of the artillery from the yawning embrasures, the heavy
and galling discharges of musketry from the battlements, they pressed
round the walls with ladders and fascires. We could see the brave
men fall here and there from their horses and objects descended swiftly
and heavily from the walls into the moat which Saul said were soldiers
slain by the patriot's fire. At length the detachment which had
landed
began their march, about fifteen hundred in number, to attack the
rear of the patriots' force.
`Now Llavelleja will get caught in a trap if he doesn'tretreat,' said
Saul. `The Brazilian means to try and cut him off from his camp!'
While Saul was speaking I saw the patriots, from whom I scarcely
kept off my eyes, make a movement simultaneously to retire. The
infantry
,
or rather those that were dismounted, I saw disappear in a sort
of a ravine, while the cavalry, forming in a close column and bearing
off their wounded across their saddles, began to trot down the hill.
They were in a few moments joined by about six hundred cavalry that
emerged suddenly from the ravine.
`Them are the men we saw disappear on the other side o' the hill,'
said Saul. `They left there horses there so as to attack on foot, and
now they have gone and mounted again. That's jist like them Quacho
rancheros! Now they fight on horseback, now on foot, jist as it
happens
.
They be the bravest fellers in the world, Yankee boys always
excepted. But they haint got the old castle this time. But they go
off with flying colors and sounding bugles!'
The patriots had indeed found it expedient to retire; but they did
so as if they did not fear their foes. They moved in a compact
column
at a free but not a hurried trot, with banners glancing in the sun
which was just rising, and bugles sounding. We could hear their
tirrah-tirrah!
through the still air where we were. They passed
within
a third of a mile of the Brazilian battalions, which drew up in
order
of battle as if expecting a cavalry charge. But the vast body of
horse passed them without notice, and in a few minutes wound into a
gorge between two low peach hills, and disappeared towards the
interior
.
A cannonading had been kept up after them from the fortress,
but I saw that only one shot appeared to take effect, from witnessing
some slight confusion in the midst of a column and a brief detention
in the rear of some score or two of the horsemen, who appeared to be
lifting wounded companions upon their horses.
The Brazilian force did not pursue; but after a little delay about
two hundred of them were detached from the line and marched towards
the fortress, which they entered. The firing from the shipping ceased,
and also that from the castle, and silence once more reigned over the
scene of war. With a small pocket spy-glass, which I now recollected
I had in my trunk, and which I regretted I had not thought of before,
I was able to view the battle ground with much nearer proximity. I
could plainly discern the bodies of men and horses strewn over the
green hill-side, and fancied I could make out the stiffened features of
many a fallen patriot. I counted seventy-four dead bodies of the
patriots
,
and upwards of a hundred horses. Carbines, swords, pistols,
so far as I could make out, were scattered in all directions. I could
see no bodies of Brazilian soldiers save near the gates; for those that
fell had been shot upon the walls and had plunged into the moat. It
was a bad scene, and it was a relief to remove the glass from my eye
and place again a wide distance between. My heart sickened at such
slaughter. My sympathies were with the patriots. They had not
been beaten, but had returned only to avoid collision with a superior
force of fresh troops.
We gathered together in a group, we four, and talked over what we
had witnessed. One idea seemed simultaneously to take possession of
our minds. I was the first to give it language by saying to them:
`How would you like to join the patriots?'
`It is just what I was thinking of,' they answered almost in the same
breath.
`Then the way of honor is open before us,' I answered. `If we
leave Bedrick we leave him to join Llavelleja. Is it so?'
`Yes,' was the response of all three.
We joined hands upon it and then obeyed the call to breakfast; for
if men fight they must eat too. Nothing can be done in this world,
without beef, bread and coffee.
CHAPTER XXII.
The Resolution.
The scenes of the morning had given a new turn to our thoughts
and a direction to our energies. We now beheld before us a field not
only of action and honorable employment but a patbway to fame. We
breakfasted in good spirits and afterwards went each to our respective
shops; for we decided to keep perfectly secret our plans until they
were fully matured. We, therefore, assumed extraordinary diligence
in business during the day in order the more fully to disguise our
purposes
.
Our shop was all day crowded. More soda was drank that
day on the score of the fight than had been on any previous day, not
excepting that on which we opened the establishment. The battle was
the only theme of conversation among all visitors, among whom were
naval officers from the French, English and American vessels of war
in the harbor. During the day we were honored also with the presence
of the commander of the castle, and several of his officers who had
taken part in its defence. One of them was wounded and had his arm
in a sling.
They talked valiantly of their exploits upon the walls. From the
conversation of several parties I got the facts of the affair. It
appeared
that General Llavelleja had, the night before, secretly marched
from his camp at the head of a detachment of about two thousand of
his cavalry, for the purpose of surprising the castle. His force
proceeded
without discovery to the base of the Mount, about five miles
distant from his camp, where he separated them into three divisions.
One of them, consisting of five hundred dismounted cavalry, silently
marched around the hill and took a position, in ambush, directly under
the walls at the rear of the castle. The second detachment of seven
hundred men was sent to a ravine at the foot of the hill, where it
dismounted
,
leaving their horses tethered, and there formed in column,
ready for the signal of onset. The third and main body remained in
saddles at the base of the hill, directly in front of the main entrance to
the castle and about five hundred yards distant, the ascent to the gate
from their post being gradual, the hill being in shape not unlike an
ant hill, the castle crowning the whole.
The motive for this disposition of his forces was the fact Llavelleja
knew that every morning at dawn, the main gate of the castle was
thrown open for the soldiers to go down to a spring a hundred yards
from it to get water to cook with. Upon the opening of the gate,
therefore
,
the detachment in ambuscade were to rush forward and surprise
it and thus get admission into the castle, which would then have fallen
easily into their hands.
Having made this disposition of his forces under cover of the
darkness
,
he awaited until the dawn for the gate to be opened. When at
length the day began to break, he, in person, drew so near to the gate
that, it was said, he heard the turning of the bolts as it was unlocked.
The moment the gate was opened and the soldiers with their buckets
began to come forth, he wound his bugle and dashed at the entrance
with the whole of the ambush at his back.
So sudden was the onset and surprise that he fairly gained the
entrance
,
cutting to pieces about a score of the soldiers which had come
out and wounding and slaying several that opposed under the
portcullis
.
The garrison, however, met him with courage, and the officer in
command had presence of mind enough to drop the portcullis in the
very midst of the melee, cutting in two several of the combatants of
both parties that were fighting beneath it.
Finding the gate thus closed, the patriot general gave a general
order for storming the citadel. Now opened the cannonading upon
the advancing cavalry of the main body which had awakened the
sleeping
city from its repose, and me among the number. The failure of
this bold attempt I have already stated.
The British and American officers whom I heard discussing the
affair
,
called it a gallant thing, though some of them were disposed to
censure the Patriot general for not waiting for his artillery before he
planned such an expedition; while others ridiculed the idea of
employing
cavalry to storm a fortress. But others urged that as all his
army were cavalry, it was in character; and besides, the cavalry drawn
up at the foot of the hill could be made available in protecting the
infantry
,
should a sortie of the whole garrison be made and drive it
back.
All the forenoon barrows laden with wounded soldiers from the
castle passed the shop on the way to the hospital. The enthusiasm,
however, of the citizens was not damped by these sights, sufficiently
familiar to their observation. There was a general joy throughout the
town. Men spoke of it as a great victory; and in the afternoon
salutes
were fired, flags displayed, and other marks of victorious triumph
manifested. In the evening the Governor-General, who had witnessed
the battle from the cupola of the palace, gave a ball, and fire-works
were let off in the Grande Square. Exultation was on every Brazilian
visage. It was said that the detachment of fifteen hundred men which
had been sent across the harbor, would be the next day increased by
four thousand more, and an attack would be made upon the patriot
camp. All was excitement and warlike enthusiasm.
Our Consult, it was said, asked the Governor General why a sufficient
force was not sent over at the time to follow the retreating patriots and
press them into their camp, cutting them to pieces in the confusion
of their discomfiture. His reply was that he apprehended that the
attack
was only a ruse to draw his attention and the flower of his troops
in that direction, while the remaining four thousand cavalry surprised
one of the city gates and endeavored to carry the town.
The Brazilian General's opinion of the courage of the patriots was
flattering to them, to say the least, that he should suppose four
thousand
men would be able to take a city garrisoned with seventeen
thousand
!
surrounded by a wall thirty feet high, which was defended by
a moat as many feet deep and sixty feet wide, filled from the harbor
with water, which flowed all around the city like a circular river; the
gates double, protected by drawbridges and portcullis, by a strong
guard and cannon frowning above them! But the truth is, the
Brazilians
stood much in fear of their brave foes, and attributed to them
prowess in arm worthy of the heroes of ancient Greece or the Scythian
warriors, whom, indeed, they not a little resembled.
Llavelleja was sustained only by his six thousand Ranchero cavalry
in his siege. The Buenos Ayrean Government had no fleet, save a
few gun boats, two or three schooners and a corvette of twenty guns
which had once been a New York merchant ship, but which the
Patriot
Government purchased and converted into a vessel of war. This
vessel was the flag ship of the little squadron which was under the
command of Admiral Brown, once an English officer, but for many
years in the service of Buenos Ayres; a brave, daring man, a finished
seaman, and a thorough fighting sailor. This squadron was at this
time blockaded in Buenos Ayres by the Brazilian fleet which I have
already spoken of as stretching from shore to shore about fifteen miles
from Montevideo. The siege of Montevideo was therefore incomplete,
and would have been had Llavelleja's force been fifty thousand men;
for so long as the harbor was open to the Brazilian vessels the place
could not be starved out. But what the patriot wanted in means was
supplied by invinsible courage, energy, and love of country. They
had the sympathy of all the Americans and French in the port, and of
most of the English, who, however, could not so entirely overcome
their prejudices against republics as to extend to them hearty and
cordial
wishes for success.
The character of the patriots and the patriot general inspired us
with the strongest interest; and I was filled with the greatest desire to
see him. The analogy between the Republic and our own enlisted
our national pride. We had been told that she had adopted our
constitution
almost literally, and that her form of government was
modelled
after our own. We knew that her people were brave, and were
combatting on the side of justice and right. Our resolution, therefore,
to take part with them was confirmed the more we reflected upon it.
There we were, thrown upon the world, as it were, by an act of
duplicity
on the part of one who should have been our protector and
friend. We had the world all before us where to choose. It was
either ignobly to return home, if we could get a passage, or carve out
our fortunes with our own hands. The war closed all avenues of
business but selling soda-water, which seemed to flourish under it, and
the army and navy of the patriots seemed to invite us. They needed
every arm that would volunteer in their cause. The idea of fighting
in the patriot cause thrilled our youthful bosoms! There was a charm,
a fascination in the very word! We might also rise rapidly to fame
our country might yet hear of us with pride!
Our determination was taken. We that night got together, and
after talking the whole matter over with a gravity becoming a
Napoleonic
council, we made up our minds to take the first opportunity to
join the Patriot force outside of the city. We were divided in choice
of the service however. Fairfax and myself were inclined, after
reporting
ourselves to Llavelleja, to proceed to Buenos Ayres and join
the squadron under the gallant Brown; for we both had a fancy for the
sea. Radsworth, whose father was a general officer in the last war,
and Hewitt, preferred the military service. Fairfax and I were not
disposed, be it understood, to get out of fighting distance by joining
the squadron in the port of Buenos Ayres. We expected to fight, and
wished to. A report was in town that Brown was then preparing to
sail down the river with his little squadron, to break the blockade and
open the river, at least temporarily, to the vessels waiting below to
come up. We hoped to reach him in time to take part in the affair.
Thus having settled matters for the future, it only remained for us
to embrace some opportunity for quitting the city. This was likely
to be a difficult object to bring about. The only outlets from the place
were by the gates towards the country, which were triply guarded, or
by the mole on the harbor side.
The next morning after the battle, the old man came into the shop,
and said he was going on board an American ship which had just come
in, to hear what news there was from the States.
`Now young men,' he said, speaking through his beaked nose and
looking very authoritative, `I shall be gone just two hours to a minute.
You know my punctuality. I expect you to remain in the shop.
Don't leave it Perril, on your
peril
, as you did yesterday. If I
maintain
you I shall expect you to give me every minute of your time.
Now see that I am obeyed. My son Edwin goes with me. Have you
seen William?'
`I have not since yesterday,' I answered.
`The dog! He will yet get his head taken off or be put in prison.
He is always adventuring about. I don't know but I shall have to try
and get him a place in Ford & Co's House? He is getting unsteady
and wild!'
Well might the old gentleman say so. His son was as wayward and
independent as the wind. He was a handsome, reckless, fiery young
man, with an utter contempt for his father, and a merciless quizzer of
his literary brother, Edwin. He was a good fellow at heart, but a
perfect
devil when he was roused. He refused to do anything, but dressed
elegantly and passed his time in cafes, or flirting with such young
Spanish girls as his impudence aided him to get acquainted with.
Once in a while he would lounge into the shop and chat awhile, take a
glass of soda-brandy, smoke two or three cigars and then disappear.
He was, however, on excellent terms with us; and well knew that we
did not intend to remain with his father any longer than we could help
ourselves; for finding him friendly we had told him. He kept our
secret
,
and said frankly, that he did not blame us; `for the old man had
fairly taken us in.' He added, too, that he was surprised after he had
seen more of us on board the brig, that such a set of young men as he
found us to be, should have consented to go out to Buenos Ayres, to
tend soda-shops! But when we, as a few days after our arrival we
did do, explained to him in confidence the deception, (which he
warmly
professed his ignorance of before) he expressed his indignation and
said that we should but serve the old man right to quit him at once,
and let him find others to tend shop as he could. We did not,
however
,
fully let him into our secret purposes.
CHAPTER XXIII.
The Fate.
After
the old gentleman had quitted the shop to go on board the
newly arrived vessel, I went to the door to watch him safely down to
the quay. I then took my hat and arming myself with a dirk and
pistol
to protect myself against dogs and bipeds both, I left the shop and
took my way down a street that led to the walls. Fairfax was well
aware of my object, it having been previously arranged, and promised
to tend both fountains till I returned. My motive in thus stealing
away was to take a survey of the walls and gates and see what chance
offered for our escaping on the country-side. My intention was to go
quite around the walls on the inner side, there being a wide, open
space or street next to them extending their whole circuit. In some
places this space widened into broad, open ground like a square,
covered
with piles of offal and swarming with dogs. One of these squares
was called Congo Square, and was the favorite resort of the negroes
on holidays for dancing the fandango.
The street which I took to go to the walls was narrow and filthy
and inhabited by the lowest canaille of the city. I passed numerous
pulperias thronged with drunken soldiery and villainous
looking-ruffians
.
No one, however, molested me, as I sauntered carelessly along;
and being dark complexioned and having black eyes and hair, I was
the more readily suffered to proceed as I looked like a young Spaniard
or Brazilian, having, indeed, been more than once taken to be one.
So I attracted no particular attention and went on in security where
blue eyes and fair hair might possibly have been in peril.
Two-thirds of the way down the street I was met by a party of
soldiers
with a barrow. Upon it was stretched a soldier writhing with
pain. His shirt was stripped off and his naked, braway chest and
shoulders were crimson with blood flowing from a gun-shot wound in
his neck. I heard one of the soldiers answer in reply to a question of
one standing by that the man had been a sentinel upon the walls and
was just shot by a Quacho riderthat is, a patriot horseman. They
were bearing him to the hospital. This sight had called to my mind
what Saul had told me, viz: that the Quacho cavalry will often ride
up within carbine shot of the walls and pick off the sentinels. They
approach in this way:Wild horses, be it understood, are always
roving
and browsing about in the vicinity, and can be seen in large troops
from the walls. Some of them sometimes gallop up close to the walls
neigh a sort of defiance and then scour away over the low hillocks that
break the barren surface of the region within a mile of the walls.
The sentinels accustomed to see them come near, pay no attention to
them. The Quachos, who are the best horsemen in the world, taking
advantage of this, strip themselves of all superfluous clothing and
armed
only with a carbine advance within a mile of the walls mounted as
usual. They then worm their way nigher and nigher behind the
hillocks
driving a score of wild horses before them; until they get as near
the walls as they can. They then throw themselves partly off their
horses, sticking to his side by one hand upon the mane, and the feet
twisted under the hams. In this manner they gallop forward keeping
the other side of the horse next to the walls. The sentry, seeing no
rider, for the Quacho is hidden on the other side of the horse, to which
he clings like a leech, takes no beed of him, regarding him as one of
the wild steeds of the pampas. As soon as the Quacho finds himself
within shot of his man he throws himself across his courser's back,
discharging his carbine with unerring aim; the sentinel tumbles into
the moat or falls wounded upon the battlements, while the horseman
retires with the speed of the wind waving his carbine above his head,
and shouting defiance.
In this manner had this man been shot, who, from the examples he
had before his eyes of the fate of many of his comrades, ought to have
been better on his guard.
Near the foot of the street I passed a door of a house before which I
saw a small gilt cross in the hand of a little child dressed in white with
flowers in her hand she held a plate on which were a few pieces of
money She offered it to me, and upon my asking her (in my best
Spanish, in which I was daily improving so as to talk pretty well) what
it was for, she said it was to pay for masses for the soul of a little
infant
,
her sister! As she spoke she directed my attention through an open
door into a room where upon a table and covered with a white fringed
cloth, stood a small coffin ornamented with gold paper, and wreathed
with flowers.
`Entre usted, senor?' said the little girl as I placed a medio (a
sixteenth
of a dollar) in the plate, a sum, which I thought more than
adequate
to pay for all the sins the little babe had committed in this
wicked
world.
I entered and gazed upon the wax-like features of one of the
loveliest
infants I ever beheld. Its little fingers were clasped upon its breast
and held a small silver gilt cross and a rosebud. A coronet of fresh
flowers bound its temples. It was arrayed in a snowy white
embroidered
robe and looked like a sculptured cherub. There was no one in
the room but an old negro woman in a white scarlet gown and scarlet
turban, who was incessantly making the sign of the cross in the air,
and muttering `aves,' while I gazed down upon the child.
Leaving this house I continued my walk to the foot of the street,
where the caliboose was situated. This was a huge, gloomy structure
of stone, with a window full thirty feet high, something like a gothic
church window, looking upon the street. It was strongly grated with
a lattice of iron bars like a gigantic cage. Around this window was
collected a motley group of both sexes and all colors and costumes,
who were gazing in upon the prisoners or talking with them through
the bars. I stopped to view the scene. The window was literally
covered to its top with prisoners who had climbed up the bars on the
inside over one another's head to look out, and hear, and see and talk
with their acquaintances in the street. Such a noise I never heard.
It was a jargon of voices that gave one a good idea of Bedlam. Some
were talking from street to grate at the top of their voices, some
swearing
,
some calling out, some laughing, jeering, mocking and shouting.
I stood for a few moments appalled. I then crossed the street and
drew nearer to get a better view and look into the prison. Two or
three of the prisoners, many of whom were nearly as naked as they
were born, spying me out, thrust out their murderous looking hands or
their old caps and called vociferously for `dinero, dinero, senor!' `
money
,
money!' One fierce, bearded, piratical villain, who was twenty
feet above me, in particular, made his loud demands. I chanced to
have in my pocket about ten or twelve coppers which I threw against
the window. Such a scramble, such oaths, such superhuman exertions
to get possession of those that fell inside, it is impossible for words to
do justice to. The piratical villain from the top, let himself down over
the backs of his fellows beneath him, like a panther descending a tree.
The window was deserted, and fifty miserable wretches were
scrambling
upon the floor of the prison under it for the coin. In the midst
of the uproar and quite satisfied with what I had witnessed, I
withdrew
from a scene which could hardly be paralleled in hell.
Such visages as some of those fellows exhibited as they peered
through the grating, would degrade the devil. Ferocity, brutality; lust,
fury, hatred, malice, all were stamped there with the seal of unmixed
depravity. Many of them had not been shaven for weeks. Many of
them wore chains upon their wrists, which clanked harshly upon the
ear at every movement they made. Many of them were without other
clothing than the upper portion of ragged trowsers bound about their
waists with a bit of rope. Some of them were native Africans who had
been but a few weeks in the land and had been put in for murdering
their masters. Some of them were domestic slaves. Some were
mutinous
seamen of the fleet. Some were soldiers, either deserters or
assassins. Not a few were professional pirates and midnight assassins.
The room in which this miscellaneous band of wretches were
confined
,
was about sixty feet in length, thirty high, and twenty-five wide.
Here about one hundred prisoners were herded together, day and night,
without distinction of crime. It was the only prison in the city, and
into it were thrown all persons, indiscriminately, who came under the
censure of the Government, or who incurred the displeasure of the
Captain-general
.
I shuddered at the thought that circumstances, which
were yet unforeseen, might make me an inmate of that Infernal Saloon.
After leaving this place I passed on a little farther and reached the
open space that separates the streets from the walls. I walked along
with my eyes closely surveying their height and scanning their
situation
.
All that met my eyes was a lofty mass of stone crowned by
battlements
with sentries pacing along the sky-line with their muskets at
their shoulders, At the base were heaps of rubbish and offal, and
digging
into them for food, were the usual hordes of hungry dogs,
howling and snarling like a pack of famished wolves.
At length I came to the first gate, from which a fine street extended
into the very heart of the city, losing itself in the Grand Square.
Here were groups of soldiers lounging about, and four sentinels on
duty
,
two on each side of the entrance. Guard houses also flanked the
entrance, in which I saw soldiers playing at dominoes, smoking and
sleeping. Over the gate also stood a sentry with his face to the
country
a sort of stationery vidette. The gates were closed; but a small
wicket in it was partly open that was just large enough to admit a man
at the time. While I was standing looking, I saw a peasant admitted
with a bag of vegetables upon his back. He seemed well known to
the guard, and many questions were put to him. An officer came out
of the guard-house and questioned him, and he was then strictly
searched
to see if he bore any letters from the patriots; for no man was
trusted
,
however well known. Even his bag of vegetables was poured out
and overhauled; and then only he was suffered to proceed up the
street into the city. After he moved away, I lounged up to the gate,
and as the wicket was still open I stooped down to take a peep through
into the country. But my curiosity was rewarded by a friendly
musket
which was pressed side-ways so forcibly against my breast that I
had nearly tumbled over backwards. The hint was accompanied with
a friendly admonition to keep out of the way and mind my own
business
.
I was minding my business to the letter; for I had come there
for the very purpose of seeing the chances that might offer for escape.
I did not, however, tell the sentry so, but walked away well satisfied
that there was no hope of reaching the patriot army by the gates.
END OE PART FIRST.Boston
,
Oct. 3d, 1827.
`SirI am about going to South America for the purpose of
establishing
a mercantile firm. I wish to take out with me three or
four young men, from seventeen to nineteen years of age, as clerks.
I am willing to pay their passage out from Boston, and to allow
them a fair compensation for their services after we shall reach our
destination.
`If, sir, you chance to have in your institution any youths who would
like to embrace this opportunity for entering life and seeing something
of the world, you will confer on me a favor by communicating to them
my letter. If any are desirous of accompanying me, be so kind as to
say to them that the ship will sail on the fifteenth of the present month,
and that I would like to have them here by the 13th, that they may
make their preparations for the voyage.
`I refer you, sir, and the friends of such youths as may wish to go
with me, to Colonel , of Boston, S C, Esq., of Salem,
and P T, of Marblehead. You will oblige me by an early
reply. I have made this application to your institution, as I am anxious
to have young men of character and talent.
`I am, sir, your ob't serv't,
`JONATHAN BEDRICK.'Watch-house,  street
,
6, A. M.
Dear brother Paul:
Here we are in a fix every mother's son of us! After we left you
last night we went to Bruce's and had a first-rate oyster supper. About
ten o'clock we sallied forth pretty well `up!' If I had known how
tipsy brother 'Siah was, I'd have locked him up in Bruce's back room
before he should have gone out with us. Well, he was as `drunk as a
soger.' He sang songs to the top of his lungs, and took up the whole
side walk as he went. I never saw but one chap before so tipsy and
stand. Well, we got to the corner of Broomfield lane when 'Siah saw
a `Charlie,' and so he began to sing, `O'er the water to Charlie,'
adding
some few personal impromptu, that made the watchman mad; so
he told us to keep quiet: for to tell you the truth we all joined in full
chorus. I told the watchman, gentlemen had a right to sing, and that
there was no law which put them under obligations to ask a `Charlie'
what songs they should select for testing their vocal powers. At this,
`Charlie' seized me by the collar, when brother Sam up fist and
knocked him over. Charlie sprang up and then sprang his rattle. It
was answered from half a dozen corners, and in two minutes we were
every soul of us captured, though we fought hard. 'Sias was taken up
out of the gutter and Sam was only taken prisoner after giving two
bloody noses and a black eye to the enemy. The upshot was that we
were marched off to the Watch-house except Josiah, who had to be
carried between two Charlies; and the best of the joke was, although
he was too drunk to walk he would sing, and all they could do, he
kept up a rip-roarous serenade to all the houses we went by until we
were safely lodged here.
Now my dear Paul, I write to you to ask you to do what you can to
get us off. The watchmen swear unless we pay them ten dollars,
which is two dollars apiece, they will have us up before the Police
Judge, and then our names will get into the papers and we shall be
dished. We have turned our pockets inside out, and all we can raise
is a dollar and fifty-two cents, brother 'Siah planking the two coppers.
Now you have some money I know. If you have n't enough just go
down to the bar and borrow the balance on father's account, and tell
him father will pay it when he comes up on Monday. If he objects,
tell him your trunk is in your room and shall be security. Now, my
dear Paul, do this little act for us; for we know you are a good
fellow
,
and I am sorry I quizzed you. You know if we are put in the
papers it might injure you; for Mr. Bedrick might suppose you were
quite asasas(what word shall I use?)never mind! You
might lose your chance of going to South America; which we should
be very sorry for, as it would be on our account. So not to have your
disappointment on our three consciences, get the `dollars' and hasten
to us without delay. The Court opens in an hour; and if the Charlies
don't have the X by that time up we go!
Your affectionate and loving brother
Tom
.
P. S.Do get the money, dear Paul, that's a fine fellow, and we'll
never say `green' to you again.
Yours faithfully,
Josiah
.
N. B.Paul, my dear boy, don't fail to get us out. We are shut
up in a dog's hole, and nothing to eat or drink. Our safety and only
hope is in you. We must get out in time to open our shops or we shall
all be shipped, and only for an innocent spree! Do your best Paul,
and we 'll never forget you while memory holds a place in our souls.
Your brother in limbo,
Sam
.
P. S.Put a small bottle of Cogniac in your pocket and half a dozen
cigars; for we are so confoundedly stiff we shall have to be carried
home in hand-carts unless we are warmed.
Tom
.
Sam
.
'Siah
.CHAPTER I.
The Sally.
After
leaving the gate, San Piedro, I continued my walk along the
inside of the wall until I came to the nezt gate which I found guarded
in like manner with the first. In front of it was drawn up a squadron
of cavalry as if about to issue forth into the country, and also a
battalion
of infantry. Several mounted officers were grouped near the gate
in conversation, and seemed much excited. Suspecting some
interesting
movement was about to take place, I drew as near them as I could
without peril to myself, and watched the proceedings. Upon the wall
above the gate, I saw two officers standing with spy-glasses surveying
the country, and every moment or two reporting to the general, who sat
upon his horse below surrounded by his staff. In their rear was the
cavalry, about one hundred and fifty fierce looking fellows armed with
carbines, pistols in holders, and huge carbines slung across their backs.
Every man wore a mustache, which added to their ferocious aspect.
They were dressed in blue jackets and gray trowsers. Silent and
expectant
they sat immovable in their high pommeled saddles, each with
his sword drawn and in his hand and resting across the saddle-bow.
Behind them the infantry, in scarlet coats and white trowsers with tall
caps crested with horse hair, were drawn up in a line. The little
wicket in the great gate was opened as I came up by the captain of
the guard, and a colonel alighting, took a peep through into the green
but treeless country.
All at once the officers on the battlement above the gate shouted
some word of alarm, and instantly the colonel was in his saddle, the
wide leaved gates were thrown open, the draw-bridge lowered, and the
word `forward' being given, the cavalry wheeled rapidly into column
and advanced at a round trot through the gate and over the resounding
bridge spanning the moat. The infantry wheeled and followed at a
brisk march, but the cavalry without waiting for them pursued their
way headed by their colonel, (a gallant looking fellow to whom I had
sold many a glass of soda!) towards a cluster of little hills strewn with
ruins about a mile distant. I could follow their course with my eye,
as the gates remained open in order that the general, who remained
within the defences, might watch their progress. By stooping a little
I could see underneath his horse what was going on quite as well as he
did in his saddle. In five minutes after the cavalry quitted the
drawbridge
,
they disappeared about three quarters of a mile distant in a sort
of ravine. The infantry did not follow exactly in their course, but
detoured
more to the left, yet moving forward at a steady trot.
`Have they yet reached the place?' called out the general to the
officers
stationed over the gate-way.
`They are very near, senor,' one of them answered. `They will
not fail to cut off the party.'
`What party?' I asked of a Spaniard who stood near me, and whom
I had often seen in the shop, for he had a great fancy for brandied
soda-water
.
`They have discovered a detachment of about a hundred Patriot
cavalry hovering about the old convent Santa Maria,' he answered;
`and suspecting some mischief may grow out of it, they have sent out
a detachment to disperse them. General Torres fears that they intend
to mount a battery upon the walls of the convent, which would
annoy the city not a little. He therefore takes this prompt step to drive
them away.'
I thanked the Spanish gentleman for his information, kindly given
as it was, with a slow and distinct enunciation so that I could
understand
each word; for he seemed to appreciate the difficulty of a
foreigner's
unaccustomed ear in getting hold of the meaning of rapidly
uttered
sentences, though each word in it, if distinctly pronounced would be
comprehended. I always desired those who replied to me to speak
slowly, which they always cheerfully did; and I found them invariably
happy to oblige me, and ready to take pains to make me understand
every word they uttered. In this manner, and by talking Spanish with
all and as often as possible, I rapidly acquired the language; so that I
opened conversations with confidence with the citizens. But to enable
me to do this I studied three or four hours daily. My grammar and
phrase book was almost always in my hand; and in the shop when I
was not drawing soda I was studying words and phrases. Every thing
I said in English to my comrades, I mentally put the same into Spanish.
In this way I learned rapidly, and became an interpreter oftentimes for
my less ambitious friends.
In about ten minutes after the detachment was hidden by the bare
hillocks it re-appeared upon the ground in front of the convent. At the
same instant I saw the Patriot cavalry issue at a gallop from the ruins,
which they had doubtless been inspecting for the purpose of mounting
cannon upon it; for Llavelleja (I afterwards learned) was at their head.
He dashed past the Brazilian horse discharging their carbines at them
in a volley as they rode by, and scoured away for their camp four miles
off. The Brazilians tumbled from their horses in great numbers, and
were for a moment thrown into great confusion. The General cursed
as he saw this, and seemed almost furious, while his officers and the
captain of the guard swore like demons incarnate. The cavalry,
however
,
soon rallied and spurred on after the Ranchero horse, filling the
air with their cries and the ringing of pistols and carbines. The
infantry
pressed on to intercept the Patriot horse at a stone bridge which
they would have to cross by a road which led nearer to the walls of the
city than the convent was. The infantry reached it first and
presented
a boid front. The Patriots as they came up did not draw rein, but
letting off their carbines in their faces, and then drew their sabres and
in an instant they cut their way through them, fairly riding them down.
The next instant they were lost to the eye in a hollow beyond a low
hill. The Brazilian cavalry came up in a few seconds afterwards, and
without waiting to help the wounded infantry soldiers, dashed across
the bridge in full pursuit.
`That pursuing detachment will hardly return again to the city,' said
the old Spaniard to me quietly as we stood watching the two clouds of
dust which indicated the position of the two parties. `The Patriots,
when they get so many Brazilians outside of the walls will not
willingly
let them back again!'
`The Colonel will fall into an ambush,' said the General, speaking
with solicitude. `He is rash to pursue so far. Fire a gun for his
re-call.'
A cannon was discharged from the top of the wall. At the same
moment we saw the two clouds of dust unite. The report of fire-arms
reached us but faintly, as they were full two miles from the gate. The
General became excited. He gave a few orders with rapidity. His
aids galloped away with the speed of the wind. In ten minutes they
returned at the head of a regiment of cavalry mounted in hot haste,
half the men putting on their accoutrements and fastening them as
they rode. As they came up to the gate, the General, who was a
grey-headed
warrior of sixty, placed himself at their head, and the whole
body of horse began to pour through the gate like a river of helmets
and banners. They numbered full five hundred men.
The gate was wide open! The country was all before me! Why
could I not manage to get out with the rest unperceived. In two hours
I could reach the patriot camp.
Such were my reflections as the long columns of horse was trotting
past me. A man in the rear platoon whom I had seen once at Sauls,
(who said he was the only honest soldier he had known) dropped his
helmet off. It fell at my feet. I picked it up and handed it to him.
As I did so, I asked upon the instant impulse, if he would let me mount
behind him!
`Spring!' he answered as readily.
I obeyed, placing my foot upon his, and the next moment was
galloping
over the draw-bridge in the rear platoon of the squadron! My
sensations I will not try to depict. My blood thrilled with excitement.
I caught the enthusiasm of the time and scene, and only wished I was
behind a Patriot instead of an Imperial soldier, or rather upon my
own horse riding in their columns against the Brazilian troops. We
moved forward at a rapid trot, sometimes at a gallop. The onward
motion of a large body of cavalry, the jingling of spurs and chains,
the clattering of sabre-sheaths, the tramp of two thousand hoofs,
the flaunting of banners, the glitter of arms, armour, for many of the
cavalry wore cuirasses and steel helmets, the warlike swell of bugles,
and the loud voices of command, all contributed to render it one of
the most striking scenes of my life.
The road along which we moved was an unfenced pathway, winding
about low hillocks of offal which surrounded the walls like huge ant
hills. Not a tree or shrub grew near it. We at length came to the
bridge where the infantry had been overthrown. We passed them
drawn up in column. The ground was strewn with the dead and
wounded. The General lingered a moment to order them to march
back to the city with their wounded after stopping and burying their
dead. We then swept past them across the bridge and over the bodies
and up-turned faces of men whom I had seen half an hour before leave
the gate full of life and warlike ambition. The vultures already
scented
the blood from afar, and were gathering from all quarters of the
horizon to the banquet. I could see them approaching at first
seemingly
no bigger than flies, then growing larger and larger to the eye
till they hovered above the bridge with their huge flapping wings
circling
about and descending lower and lower at each revolution, ready
after we should pass to alight upon the carcases of the dead. My soul
sickened at the sight of them, and nearly cooled the warlike fire of my
blood. After crossing the bridge we galloped on at top speed for half
a mile over a barren field covered with briars and strewn with
skeletons
of horses, cattle, dogs, and other glaring bones which once made
up a human frame. After crossing this heath we entered a pass
between
two low ridges. I here looked back. The city with its high
wall and towers, and dome, and battle-mounted roofs rose with
imposing
majesty from the heath-like suburbs which environed it. It
looked
like some gigantic citadel, and to my eyes seemed impregnable.
To the right the masts of the shipping in the harbor were visible, like
a leafless forest; and farther beyond towered the Mount with its castle
above which waved numerous flags. The sides of the pass soon shut
out this view, and I had time to reflect upon my novel situation and the
result likely to follow.
`Here I am,' thought I, `astride a Brazilian horse, behind a
Brazilian
trooper riding for life and death to deliver a party of the
Emperor's
troops from a Patriot force. In the first place I had no business
to leave the city without my three companions. I have gone beyond
my instructions; for I have been especially instructed to take a survey
of the walls but not to go beyond them. My absence, too, cannot be
explained to them, if I escape from this troop and go to the Patriot
camp, as there is no communication with the city. It may also place
them under suspicion, and prevent them from leaving the city when
they wish.'
These and other reflections led me to resolve to go back with the
troop and not attempt to quit it, as I was planning to do. Much as I
wished to join the Patriots, I felt that I had no right to do so, under
the circumstances, without my friends. It would be an ungenerous
and selfish desertion of them and their fortunes; and I therefore
resolved
to stick to the trooper's saddle, and return with him if he went
back alive; but avail myself of the opportunity of getting all the
knowledge I could. I also thought that when I returned that we might
manage to slip out of the gate, one at the time, and so effect our
purpose
.
My cogitations, which my trooper had not disturbed by any notice
of me, were now interrupted by the report of carbines at the head of
the column, and loud orders from the General to push forward.
`Now,' thought I,' `here's fighting, and I am in for a bullet or two,
or a sabre-cut!' I however, stuck close to my man, feeling sure that
a bullet would hit him before it would hit me, as he was tolerably
portly
and looked likely to keep all the lead that went into his body. I felt
however, helpless, without any weaponthough I did not like using
one against the Patriot's whom I supposed were aheadand took out
my pistol. It was a small affair, and not having much faith in it, I
asked the soldier if he would let me have one of his.
`Ah, you there, mi amigo!' he said looking over his shoulder and
laughing. `Have you not had ride enough yet?'
`I mean to go with you to the end, but lend me a pistol,' I said
very seriously, for we were each instant approaching the uproar of a
conflict.
`Take it, my man,' he said; `but I'll try and protect you. You had
best not come I think.'
`I am here, and must make the best of it,' I answered, feeling that
I would give every cent of my little stock of money, to be safely
behind
old Bedrick's counter drawing soda-water. But I had little time
for regrets. He handed me the heavy pistol and I half cocked it and
set my teeth for desperate adventure.
By leaning over to the right side I got a glimpse ahead and saw that
we had emerged from the pass into a green, pleasant region of fields,
woodland, gardens and villas, scenery that I had often viewed from the
coof of our house. The whole vicinity of the city would have been
of similar beauty but for the policy of its defenders, who laid waste
and destroyed for a mile around it, whatever would afford ambush for
a foe.
At the extremity of an open field just before us, which skirted the
road, I saw a party of Patriots retiring up the slope firing at our van
as they retreated, and driving before them full a hundred cavalry
prisoners
.
The ground before us were heaped with the slainhorses and
men, and temporarily obstructed our advance. The brave Patriots, it
seems, had halted in ambush, at this place, and fallen suddenly upon
the two hundred and fifty pursuing Brazilian horse, had literally
hewed
them to pieces, taking one third prisoners. When we came up we
found but about thirty remaining, who had just galloped on to meet
the reinforcement we brought. The hundred Patriots did not seem to
fear us, but trotted at an easy pace, loading, and turning and firing in
their saddles as they went. Our General called a halt to remove the
dead bodies of horse and rider that barricaded the narrow path, and
then ordered half the cavalry to wheel from column to the left and fall
upon the Patriot horse.
CHAPTER II.
The Counter-march.
The
Patriot cavalry were just retiring over the verge of the hill,
when the order to wheel from column and charge them was given. To
effect this manuvre, it was necessary for the rear of our column to
take the lead, as we had to gallop round a garden to gain the field.
This placed me in the very front platoon with only my trooper's broad
back between me and the enemy. Our detachment consisted of about
half the cavalry, the remainder led on by the General himself moving
forward at a hard gallop to endeavor to intercept the Patriots at a
shallow
stream they would have to cross, not far ahead at the foot of the
hill. The Colonel who had commanded the party which had been cut
to pieces, and whom I have said I had seen in the shop, now rode to
the head of our column, and led it conjointly with his own
commander
.
His helmet was cloven nearly through to the head, his cheek was
partly cut away, and the calf of his leg badly cut by a sabre. He did
not seem to mind his wounds. His fine eyes flashed as he spurred on
and waved his sword. He hoped yet to retrieve the ill-fortune of the
day and avenge his honor upon his foes; for he had been overthrown
by a force scarcely one third as large as that he had commanded.
His eye fell upon me. He recognized me, and falling back near
me, he regarded me an instant with surprise, and then said in tolerable
English,
`What do you here, senor? How is this, Pedro?' he sternly asked
of the trooper in Portuguese.
`I don't hardly know, senor Colonel,' answered the man
stammering
.
`He was by the gateI dropped my helmet. He was so kind
as to pick it up. He asked me if he might mount behind me. I had
seen him at my friend Saul Americano's and thinking he might like to
see a skirmish, I bade him mount.'
`You have done wrong. Ride out of the column and return at
once to the city. He is too young, and is unarmed.'
`Senor,' I said in English,' if you will let me remain now that I
am here, I should be very glad. Pedro ought not to be disgraced on
my account.'
`Well, well, but you should be mounted better than that,' he said
smiling as well as he could for the wound in his cheek. As he spoke,
he pointed to a horse which had belonged to some of the slain
dragoons
,
and which was cantering along parallel with our column, as if
desirous of again mingling in the exciting scenes of war. `Pedro,'
he said, `ride up and secure that horse for the young Americano!'
Pedro glad to escape censure, galloped out of the ranks and coming
along side of the animal seized him by the rein.
`Now into the saddle,' he cried, and without hesitation I sprang
into
the deep, well secured seat, between the high back and higher
pummel
.
The reins were upon his neck. I grasped them and gathered
them up, and at the command of the Colonel galloped up by his side,
and went dashing along with him at the head of the column. I could
hardly realize my own identity as I thus found myself thundering
along one of a body of three hundred horse pressing forward to engage
in battle. It was useless to wish myself in the city or at my father's
quiet fire-side. I had run the risk with my eyes open, and there
remained
nothing for me but to make the best of it. Had I been on the
right
side in the affair, I should have felt much better; but as it was I
had to spur whither fortune pushed me.
`You did wrong to come out with the troop, young man,' said the
Colonel after looking at me a moment or two in silence as I galloped
by his rein, `but you look as if you could look out for yourself. Keep
close to me whatever happens!'
`I will try to,' I answered.
At the same moment we came in sight of the Quacho horsemen who
were crossing a level field about a third of a mile distant. They did
not seem to be in hurry, but bore themselves with that bold air of
defiance
and contempt of their enemies which always characterized them.
They drove before them a number of mounted prisoners quite equal to
their own. They were easily distinguished from them by the flowing
skirts of their scarlet ponchas, their white, fringed, short trowsers, and
broad somberos, as well as by their superior horsemanship.
`Forward!' shouted our commander, pointing at them with his
sword.
`Forward!' responded the whole cavalry, and setting spurs dashed
onward.
`Forward and charge, and give no quarter!' again shouted the
officer
as we drew near them.
The Quacho horse instead of trying to escape, suddenly wheeled to
the right and left and retiring swiftly behind their body of prisoners
turned about and faced us, placing the prisoners directly between them;
selves and our advancing column. It was a masterly manuvre. The
head of our detachment instinctly drew rein. The Quachos fired a
volley over the heads of the prisoners at us, the shot whistling about
our ears and knocking here and there a trooper from his saddle. The
bold fellows then put spurs to their horses and winding a lively air
upon
their bugles, went off like the wind, mocking pursuit by our heavy
cavalry. The next moment we came up with the prisoners, and to
prevent running them down had to halt so suddenly as to throw us into
confusion. Before we could form again, and get a passage open
through the prisoners nothing could be seen of the Patriots but the
waving of their pennons as they descended into a hollow of the
country
about half a mile distant.
At the same moment, General Torres with the other division of
Brazilian
cavalry came up on the flank, having been unable to get ahead
of the Rancheros on account of a ravine which he had to enfilade to
its extremity. This delay saved the Patriots, and almost maddened
the Brazilian officers. Torres rode up and consulted a few moments
with the two colonels. I could not make out their words as they spoke
rapidly in Portugues; but I learned that Colonel De Silvia (my friend)
was desirous of pursuing with the whole body, while Torres and the
other Colonel remonstrated, fearing that they might fall in with
Llavelleja's
main body, and thus be cut off from the city.
I had seen Llavelleja himself, the hero of my imagination. I have
said that he placed himself in command of the hundred horse which
had been to reconnoitre the old convent, and there is no doubt their
masterly escape was wholly owing to his skill and presence I got a
full sight of him when he placed the prisoners between our fire. He
rode at the head of his little party, which was diminished to about
eighty men, mounted upon an iron-gray charger without the usual gay
trappings with which his men covered their horses. He was dressed
in a blue frock closely buttoned to his chin, and scarlet trowsers with
Wellington boots reaching above his knees. Upon his head was a
laced chapeau with a snow white plume covering it like a cloud. He
was tall and finely made, and sat his horse like an Arabian chief, firmly,
gracefully, and without thought. He did not hold the reins which lay
upon his horse's mane, but guided him by the pressure of his knees
and voice. He had holster's to his saddle; and in his hand was the
sword which he waved as he gave his orders. His voice I heard
plainly
two or three times. It was deep, rich and manly, and struck me as
calm as if he had been giving orders at a review.
I was so absorbed in gazing upon him, that I was nearly over-run
by the troopers behind me. How I wished that I could safely gallop
across the space that separated us and place myself by his side I
even calculated the chances, but my di-cretion got the better part of
my thoughtless wish, and I stuck by the side of my Colonel. All this
cogitations within my breast occurred while the Patriots were galloping
round to the van of their prisoners to check our charge. The next
moment, as I have said, they were pouring in the volley from their
carbines
,
and scouring away towards their camp.
As I was directly in the van of our column and open to their shot
(not having the friendly back of my dragoon Pedro as a shield) I
woundered then and wonder now that I escaped; for a score of men
examine back were killed in their saddles. I had to feel my face and
examine my body very suspiciously all over with my eyes to see if I
was bleeding any where, before I felt sure that I had not been hit by
someone of the whistling balls. The shot were a quarter as large as
billiard balls, being discharged from their carbines, which looked like
iron trumpets set in short gun stocks.
After a brief purley between the officers, the command was given
for the column to counter-march at a rapid trot towards the city from
which we were nearly a league; a bold distance for Brazilian soldiers
to adventure from the cover of their walls, with six thousand
Ranchero
riders within two or three miles. The prisoners whom we had
rescued, or rather whom the Patriots had resigned to us, though
mounted
,
were without arms. They were ordered to the front, and in this
manner we retraced our way to the city gates. As we came up to the
bridge we disturbed vast flocks of vultures that were already feeding
upon the dead bodies. They waited stubbornly and impudently until
we were within pistol shot, when they would either hop away to the
road-side, dragging reeking entrails after them, or soar slowly and
heavily a few feet into the air, and hover as if reluctant to quit their
prey, and fearful lest it should be snatched from them. Colonel De
Silvia, to whose detachment the dead men had belonged when living,
here stopped with a sufficiently large force detailed from the troop, to
bury the torn and disfigured bodies. As I rode by them I saw that
those bodies which were not otherwise torn had their eyes picked out.
It was a horrible sight and one which will never be effaced from my
memory. Colonel De Silva desired me to stay until the bodies were
buried; but the scene was so revolting that I was about to say that I
had rather go back into the city, when it occured to me that I might
have an opportunity of effecting my escape while they were engaged
in inhuming the slain, and gallop to Llavellaja's camp. It was a bold
suggestion and altogether a mad one; and one that could only have
been hatched in the brain of an impulsive, thoughtless lad of eighteen,
for I was no more than a lad, manly as I thought myself; and I trust
that the reader will put down all my follies that he may find here
recorded
`to the indiscretion of youth;' a charitable veil that every
generation
finds it more or less in need of.
So I remained with him, letting the main body gallop on towards
the city, the walls of which as well as the roofs and towers I could see
covered with anxious spectators of the sortie of General Torres and
his cavalry.
As I had nothing particular to do, while the soldier were excavating
a natural cavity somewhat deeper to contain the bodies, I sat in my
saddle aloof from the melancholy spectacle which my eyes refused to
rest upon after the first look, and watched the vultures. They are
large, dark brown birds, taller and longer in body than the wild turkey,
and covered with very coarse feathers. They appear immensely strong
and evinced their strength; for when we first disturbed them on the
bridge three of them having their talons and bills fastened into a body
dragged it two feet before they would release their hold; which they
did at last only when the hoofs of the advancing horses threatened
them.
They have a small but fierce sharp eye, and are slow in their
motions
,
especially when full to repletion after gorging. Then they will
scarcely move from the way side. They looked to me more like beasts
than birdsa sort of feathered wolf. Some of them, now sat upon
the walls and ruins of an old mill near watching vigilantly the soldiers,
while others more boldly at every opportunity would light upon a body
and tear flesh from it. About a score of them circled about in the
air, sometimes swooping so low that I more than once waved a sabre
that I had picked up from the ground, which was strewn with the
arms of the fallen, to keep them off; for as I was light, and they were
about to be robbed of the dead, I was not sure but they would carry
me off out of my saddle bodily, by way of reprisal. My sabre,
however
,
kept them off; while the Portuguese soldiers laughed at my
apprehensions
.
Having pistols, sabre and horse, the reader will see that
I only needed helmet and cuirass to make a very respectable looking
Brazilian trooper. These I could have had for the picking them up,
as they lay around in any quantity, but although I had as it were,
taken
part in a charge against the Patriots with a body of Imperial
cavalry
,
I had no idea, with my patriotic predilections and sympathies, to
identify myself with them more fully. I felt already that as an
American
,
I had sufficiently disgraced myself.
Which I was watching the voracious vultures, who were also as
intently
watching the work of burying the dead, with a certain air of
dogged silence as if they privately resolved to scratch them up after
the soldiers should finish their work and retire, I was startled by a
low howling on the left, as if a borde of wolves were advancing.
Looking in the direction, I beheld what was little better, a pack of full
two hundred gaunt dogs. They came on in a body each striving to
outstrip his fellow, and the whole band howling with savage vehemence.
They came up to within a hundred rods of the bridge and there
stopped
,
snuffing the air, and yelping and yelling. Some of them then
trotted forward, the rest followed at first with hesitation, for they did
not much relish the presence of the soldiers, and the whole legion
swept past me within a few yards and dashed towards the dead bodies
on the bridge.
CHAPTER III.
The Barrack Yard.
The hungry pack of vulture like dogs having swept past me,
howling
from every throat, dashed towards six or seven bodies which the
soldiers were removing for burial in the deep hole they had excavated.
The men stood their ground for a moment and then fled. The fierce
brutes pounced upon the dead with ravenous cries that chilled my
blood. The Colonel, who was upon his horse near by, shouted for
the men to fire a volley upon them. The discharge did not in the
least move the mass, though a dozen of their number were knocked
over dead. One of them which I saw tumbled over and over by a ball
which broke his fore shoulder after gaining his feet, went limping
back again to the human carrion as fierce for his food as before.
Altogether it was a fearful and revolting scene and I never wish to
witness
such another one. After several vollies, which was followed up
by a charge of thirty or forty mounted men, the dogs, (if dogs they
can be called) were driven off at a distance, where they sat upon their
haunches licking their bloody jaws and howling at intervals, with the
most fearful cries of rage and desire, while the soldiers once more
proceeded to bury the mangled remains.
At length the rites of sepulture, rude and hurried as they were,
were completed, the Colonel made the sign of the cross ove the
mound and then gave orders for his men to mount and fall into
column.
I had been so much taken up with the scene I have described, that I
quite forgot, until this moment, my purpose of trying to effect my
escape
to the Patriot lines. As the cavalry were wheeling into
marching
order, I began to reflect upon my original intention. But a
moment's
observation showed me the peril I should be in making the
attempt
.
I had began to think that it was my duty to return to the city
and share the fate of my friends. Even if I could effect my escape to
the camp of the Buenos Ayrean General, it would be like treachery to
my companions who, placing confidence in me, had appointed me to
act as a spy and ascertain what were the best means of quitting the
town.
These considerations fixed my decision, and I resolved to return
with the Colonel and his escort, and not think of joining the patriot
camp until I could do so with my comrades.
When I had come to this resolution, which ought from the first to
have governed mebut when I was so near the camp and so well
mounted to spur, it was a temptationColonel De Silva rode up and
ordered me to fall in along side of him. He looked very grave and
stern, and one or two expressions he let drop, showed me that he was
reflecting with mortification upon his defeat. I rode by his rein in
silence, the column winding on in the rear among the low hillocks
that covered the desolate surface of the country near the walls. The
dogs had hardly waited for the rear to move, ere they rushed howling
towards the place where the bodies had laid.
Our way did not lay by the road we had come, but we took a path
to the left to enter the city by a gate further to the East. It led us
near the `Campo Santo,' or `Holy Field,' a burial ground of large
dimensions walled with stone and situated upon the side of a low
elevation
.
It was the cemetery for the inhabitants of the city. A
desolate
place it was. Scsrcely a tree shaded its white-washed and
crumbling
tombs, and its walls were falling into ruin. Vultures sat
brooding
upon the monuments, and dogs wandered about seeing prey in
the shallow graves. The burning sun shone down hot upon the place,
and the atmosphere was ftid with exhalations from the putrid
sepulchres
.
But what was most revolting was the sight of human skeletons
with the muscles still cleaving to them, laying about in the `holy
ground,' and here a skull, and there an arm, with its fleshless fingers.
To crown this desecration of the dead, in one corner of the burial
place were `cords' of human bones, piled fike wood, eight and ten
feet high, with pyramids of skulls heaped upon the top. It was
altogether
a `Golgotha,' a place of skulls. I asked Colonel De Silva
what it meant. He answered me in English that every year the bodies
were taken from the graves and thus disposed of, that the graves
might be used for fresh tenants. The half-fleshed skeletons strewn
about, he said, had doubtless been torn from their graves by the
vultures
and dogs.
He spoke with the unconcern of one familiarized to such scenes;
but I shuddered and prayed fervently to Heaven that it might never be
my fate or that of any of my friends to die in this country and be
committed
to the Campo Santo for burial.
Leaving this horrible place behind us, we trotted along a stony path
bordered by thistles, which run parallel with the moat, and at length
came round to the eastern gate, which the Colonel decided to re-enter
the city by, as it was near his quarters. For a few hundred yards we
had the moat close upon our right, the walls towering beyond them
high in the air, and thronged with troops and citizens watching us.
The moat was filled with dark-green, stagnant water, covered with a
slimy mould, and its edges lined with the most abominable filth. I
thought that its condition was sufficient to deter an enemy from
attempting
to cross it even were it fordable. The draw-bridge which
remained raised until we came within speaking distance of the gate,
now was slowly lowered like a huge trap-door and spanned the moat.
The gates were at the same time thrown open and we trotted across
the bridge at a round pace and entered the city. As the last man of
our column entered, the bridge was raised and the gate closed. The
Colonel did not halt his troop, but riding at a hand-gallop dashed
through an arched way in a high wall which led into the court of the
cavalry barracks. Here they wheeled into line, and after a few brief
words addressed to them by him were dismissed to their quarters.
Poor fellows! glad enough they seemed to be discharged from further
duty, for they had had a hard day's work of it, and a defeat instead of
a victory as the result.
I threw myself from my horse with the rest, and the animal released
galloped off to the stables. As I felt quite satisfied with my little
military experience in the Brazilian cavalry I did not delay making
the best of my way out of the barrack-yard. I deposited my helmet
upon the ground and placing my sword beneath my arm and retaining
my pistols looking to future use for them, I walked towards the gate.
The sentry seeing me thus accoutred and in citizen's dress, no doubt
thought I had been stealing the arms, and instead of letting me pass
out presented his musket across the passage and ordered me to
surrender
the weapons. I understood him, little as I knew of Portuguese,
and very firmly told him in Spanish for his `Portuguese' that he should
not have them.
`You are a thief,' said he, `and I shall put you under arrest in the
guard-house.'
As he spoke he laid his hand upon my shoulder. I drew back and
cocked one of my pistols, and told him in as good Spanish as I could
muster, with here and there an English word by way of greater
emphasis
,
that I had fairly come by the arms in the sortie,though they
happened
to belong to a Brazilian dragoon instead af a Quachoand that
I would keep them.
The fellow stepped back, and scowling, while his huge mustache
moved with rage, brought his musket to the charge, and I believe
would have run me through if I had not coolly stood my ground and
covered his breast with the muzzle of my pistol. In these respective
attitudes we stood for full thirty seconds, I resolved not to surrender
my weapons, and he hesitating whether to run the risk of
bayonetting
me, when my old friend the trooper, who had mounted me
behind
himself, came up, with others, on hearing the uproar. The
first thing he did was to knock up the sentry's musket and then to
wrest my pistol from my hand. He demanded to know what was the
difficulty and why the sentinel was about to kill his `Americano
amigo.'
The soldier told his story, when the stout trooper made a warm
defence
of me and my conduct. It was not altogether comprehensible
to me; but it produced quite a change in my favor. The soldiers
about looked upon me with smiles, and the sentinel gave me his hand
and shook mine warmly.
Nothing then would do but that I must step into the guard-house
with half a score of them and drink a glass of muddy sweet wine with
them, when I took my leave, in high favor with the be-mustached
fellows
,
half of whom, I forgot to say, were three shades blacker than
ebony.
I now made the best of my way back to the shop from which I had
been absent on this my first warlike expedition, no less than five hours.
It was past one when I reached the shop. Rairfax was there alone.
Upon seeing me, he exclaimed, between anger and gratification,
`Why, Peril, where in the deuce have you been all the forenoon?
I began to think you had got into some scrape.'
`Where is the old man?' I asked, with some perturbation, for I
stood in a wholesome fear of the bald-headed deceiver, and
apprehended
a `blow up.'
`He came in after you had been gone three hours and asked where
you were: I told him you had stepped out and I expected you in
every moment. He swore a little and then, I believe, went round to
the other shop.'
While Fairfax was speaking the old man entered.
`Soh, you are here! Very well, sir! You, I see, think my time
your own. If you dare to leave the shop again without my leave
I'll have you thrown into the calaboose. One word of complaint from
me and you'd be arrested, no matter whether you were innocent
or not. They don't ask about such things here. I'll have you up,
sirrah!'
Here the old man stopped, pale with rage, and for want of words
expressive of his displeasure, shook his fist in my face.
I was about to make some quick retort when I caught Fairfax
looking warmly at me. So I repressed my resentment and smiling,
walked behind the counter. He did not say any more then, as the
old black cook we had hired came to say that dinner was ready up
stairs.
At night, after we had done the day's work, we four went all on
the house top to enjoy the cool night air before going down into our
sleeping rooms. They had asked me during the afternoon to tell
them where I had been, for they all saw by my manner that I had
something to tell, and I had put them off till evening. Now, beneath
the starry skies, with a pleasant breeze from the water, and seated
upon the battlements in one corner of the roof, I told them the events
of the day.
When I had done they expressed their regret that they had not been
with me, so that we might have reached the Patriot camp together.
We then talked over several plans of getting out of the city, but each
presented obstacles that seemed insurmountable. The idea of getting
out of the gates it seemed useless to entertain. At length Radsworth
suggested that we should be on the watch when another sortie would
be made, offer ourselves as volunteers, and when we got fairly outside,
spur for the goal of our ambitionthe Patriot camp. But I had had
experience enough in my mad-cap foray to see the difficulty and danger
attending such a measure, and opposed it.
`We seem likely to have such difficulty in getting out of the city,'
at length said Hewitt, `I begin to think, on the whole, we had best
stick by the old man. I had a talk with him to-day and he said he
would by and by give us a fair compensation.'
`I wouldn't trust him,' answered Fairfax, warmly. `Besides, I have
no fancy to be a shop-boy. It will stick to us through life as it is, I
dare say, and I am determined to quit it at once!'
`Don't you mean to go into the shop again?' demanded Hewitt.
`No,' answered Fairfax, firmly. `My mind is made up. I have
nearly a hundred dollars in silver. I will go and board at the Coffee
House, and be on the look out the while for some way to get us off.
By the time I have spent it, I will find some way of escape, or I
will let the Portuguese tumble me into the callaboose!'
`If I had money,' I answered promptly, `I would go to the Coffee
House with you. But you know, boys, how I am! I must stick to
the old man or be dependent on others.'
`I will lend you,' said Fairfax.
`I won't borrow,' I answered, `so long as the old man has a roof, bed
and table which I have a claim to!'
`I have but a little more money than Perril, answered Hewitt, and
I shall have to stick to the soda-pipe.'
`I think it best to try it a little longer, and let Fairfax look out for
us, we at the same time watching every chance for our escape,' said
Radsworth.
After a little more discussion of our several positions, it was finally
decided that Fairfax should go to the Coffee House, and while there
avail himself of every means to find a way of escape from the city for
the whole party, while we were to remain with the old man, but not to
relax our diligence in bringing round our ultimate purposes.
We then retired for the night, leaving the howling of dogs and the
calls of sentinels, making night hideous with their confused noises.
CHAPTER IV.
The Crisis.
The
next morning brought with it a crisis in our affairs as the
reader
will shortly see. As soon as the breakfast was over, the old man
got up from the table, and rubbing his hands together began, as usual,
to hurry us away to the shops.
`Come, boys, it is seven o'clock! time to be at work! Lazy legs
never made full purses! Stir yourselves and let's see which shop will
take the most money to-day!'
`I have decided, sir,' said Fairfax firmly, `not to go into your soda
shop again!' and he compressed his lips with a resolute air.
`What sir!' exclaimed the old man pale with surprise and anger;
`what is that you say?'
`I will repeat it again if you desire, Mr. Bedrick. I say it is my
firm determination never to go into your soda-shop again!'
`You young scoundrel, you!' cried the infuriated old man; `I'll have
the city guard here in five minutes! I'll'
`I don't fear the city guard nor you, sir! You have more reason to
fear it, old man, than we have.'
`I? I?' repeated the old gentleman almost bursting with rage, and,
as I thought, looking at the same time conscious of guilt.
`What do you mean, sir? How do you dare address my honored
father so?' demanded the young gentlemen Ned, in spectacles, looking
white as ashes and bullying up to Fairfax.
`Don't interfere, sir, between Fairfax and Mr. Bedrick,' said I
laying
my hand gently upon our `tutor's' arm, and drawing him back.
He looked round at me as if he would very gladly knock me over;
but he saw something in my eye that doubtless restrained his rage
within discreet bounds; for he was a contemptible fellow, and I most
cordially despised him, as also did the rest of us, not exceptlng even
his own brother.
`A conspiracy, father! Let us call the police.'
He ran to the door, when Radsworth placed himself before it and
said quietly,
`If you know when you are well off, Ned, you will keep quiet and
let Fairfax and your father have their talk out.'
The `student' drew back shaking with rage and fear, while Fairfax
continued to the old man,
`I repeat sir, you have the most reason to fear the city guard! Does
not your conscience tell you so? It is time we all understood one
another
.
Hear me, Mr. Bedrick, for I am resolved to speak. I speak
not only for myself but for my friends here, for we are one in interest
as we are one in your gross deception.'
`Deception?'
`Yes, sir. Do not try to hide your crime against as. We know all,
and knew all before we landed at Montevideo. You wrote down to
the Lyceum when we were at school, saying that you were a merchant
going out to Buenos Ayres to a large Commission House, and that you
wished Professor Haley to recommend to you four respectable youths
who would like to go out with you. Your letter bore the face of truth
and fairness, and your references seemed honorable men. We four,
deceived ourselves as well as our parents, embraced the offer and
joined
you at Boston. There the veil which covered your base designs
upon us, was carefully kept drawn, and we embarked with you wholly
unsuspicious of your character and ultimate object. You represented
yourself as the owner of the cargo of the brig, and told us many other
things to bolster up your deception. At length, when we began to
suspect the trick, Captain Pright unveiled the wholeremoved the
mask, and showed you to us in your true character. He told us that
so far from owning the cargo, you had nothing on board but four soda
fountains, a few boxes of syrup, and some other articles for opening
soda-shops. He told us that you were a broken merchant dependent on
your friends, who had paid your passage out, and given you the money
to buy these articles, glad to get you out of the country on any terms,
they had given you a `character.' They were not aware that you had
imposed upon us by deceiving us with the belief that you were to open
an `extensive' mercantile house, when you were to open only a paltry
soda-shop. They supposed we went with you with our eyes open.
Sir, why did you practice this arrant roguery upon four young men of
good families! Why did you not employ youths from a different
condition
in life? Doubtless, because you could find none willing to go
with you to tend soda-shops in Buenos Ayres who could be trusted;
and so you thought you would aim high, and by deception get
respectable
youths whom you could trust. Did you not look forward, sir, to
the time when those youths arriving in Buenos Ayres should see the
deception you had practiced upon them. Or did you suppose that,
finding themselves twelve hundred miles from home, they would be
willing to become your hewers of wood and drawers of water! But,
sir, you are mistaken. When we learned the full extent of the
treachery
toward us, from the Captain of the vessel, our indignation was with
difficulty restrained. But we resolved to remain quiet until we
reached
Buenos Ayres and then throw ourselves upon the protection of the
Consul. Instead of going there we were brought in here. To the last
you kept up your deception, and suggested to us, that as we were
unable
to reach our port we might pass our time in selling soda. But I
will not repeat all your falsehoods. We came on shore with you! we
assisted you! we have continued to do so to this time, not from fear
or love, but partly because we pitied your indigence and would give
you a start, and partly because we felt that you owed us a house so long
as you had one. If we had possessed money we should not have
remained
with you a day. You have upon us no claim whatsoever.
We have assisted you in your shop because we could do no better. I
have, however, resolved to remain no longer in an occupation for which
neither my ambition, my family connexions nor my education has
fitted
me. I have enough to support me a few weeks, and I shall go to
the Coffee-house and board. For the food, lodging and bed you have
given me, I have re-paid you my labor in the shop. As for my friends
here, they have less money than I have, and they are willing to stay
with you, I believe, till they can do better; though the fact that we
have been soda-shop boys will always level us in the eyes of others of
our own condition here till they are informed of the facts. My friends
here, now, will speak for themselves.'
Thus ending his spirited speech, Fairfax walked aside to the
window
and amused himself with gazing into the street, and humming
Yankee Doodle. The old man and his son had listened in silent
consternation
;
the face of the former livid and flushed by turns as a sense
of guilt or anger filled his bosom. At length he spoke with a cowed
look, more like a criminal in the presence of his judges, than the
avaricious
and petty tyrant, whom we had so long quietly suffered to rule
over us.
`I confess that I have in some sort deceived you, young gentlemen;
but I wanted respectable young men: and I supposed that you could
easily better your fortunes after you got out here, if you didn't like to
stay with me. But I, in truth, hoped through the profit that I trusted
to realize in three or four years with my shops, to accumulate a
sufficient
capital to enable me to open a Mercantile House. I assure you
this was my intention. But if you are resolved to leave me,' he
continued
in a whining tone, `I can't help it, though it would give me
great satisfaction to have you continue with me. I acknowledge that
I can't hold you; but I trust you won't all of you desert me, just as I
have begun to make some money. If you will remain with me I will
agree not only to keep you, but pay each of you a quarter of a dollar a
day besides!'
`The price of one glass of soda-sangaree,' I answered smiling at my
companions.
`I will give you then half a dollar,' responded the old man.' `I
shall be ruined if you leave me!'
`There are your two sons,' I answered with irony. `But I suppose
they are quite above the business.'
`William,' you know, I have no control of,' responded the old man
almost crying; and as for Edwin, he is of age and does as he pleases,
besides his time is taken up in studying the language!'
`We are quite as much entitled to act the gentleman as either o
your sons, sir,' answered Radsworth; `but as we can do no better at
present, I for one am willing to remain with you till something offers
more suitable; but I must have a dollar a day, which will be but a
trifle-out
of the sum which we are earning for you.'
`I am willing to remain on the same terms,' answered Hewitt.
I hesitated. I had not five dollars in the world, but I felt that I had
rather take my chance with fortune than remain with him any longer;
for I not only detested the business, but had such a contempt for him
that I could not bear to be in his presence. Even at this moment,
though years have passed since then, my blood tingles as I recall him
to mind. At length seeing that Radsworth and Hewitt were looking
with solicitude for my reply, I answered,
`I too, sir, will assist you in the shop at a dollar a day till I can do
better, but I shall quit you the very first opportunity!'
`This is an imposition, father! A dollar a day! Three dollars a day!'
cried Ned bristling up.
`Silence, sir,' I said. `You had best say but little and weigh well
that little. We are doing this to favor your father not ourselves. If
we chose, we could this moment enlist in the Imperial cavalry and have
a horse, armor, clothing and good pay.'
`It is hardthree dollars a day!' ejaculated the old man, but it can't
be helped. I wish,' he added in a pettish under tone, `that every
mother's
son of them was back in the States!'
I laughed and rejoined,
`That we would all gladly go back, if he would pay our passage, in
the first ship that offered.'
He made no reply, but began to curse Captain Pright, accusing him
of treachery, and swearing he would write home to the owners. We
left him in this mood, and went down into the shop. Fairfax got a
negro to take his trunk on his shoulder, and leaving us went to the
English Coffee House, while I remained in the shop; Hewitt and
Radsworth going to the other one on the Calle San Pedro. As I was
left alone, I was honored most of the day with the old gentleman's
company, who was as active in drawing the soda for the customers as
a boy. He looked, however, very sour, and more than once reminded
me that I must stir and be busy, for he would have his full dollar's
worth out of me. I only laughed at him; for I felt perfectly
independent
of him, resolved that when I got tired of him, I would quit and
trust to fortune.
In this manner, we remained with him several days, the old man
growing
each day more civil and fawning; as our independence of manner
alarmed him; for he well knew if we left him he could get no one to
fill our stations, and that he would either have to hire Portuguese
negroes
,
who would rob and perhaps murder him, or close his shops
altogether
.
His avarice, therefore, made him obsequious; and so, bating
our constant sense of degradation in following so low an employment,
our time passed more pleasantly than it had done. Every day we saw
Fairfax, who, though dilligent in making every observation within his
power, could yet discover no way of getting out of the city to join the
Patriots. In the meanwhile, we made our Connectiout friend, Saul, a
full confidant of all that had occurred, but did not let him know
until
a fortnight after our `crisis' with the old man what our ultimate
intentions
were. When at length, as one Sunday afternoon we were at
his house, we told him that our ambition was to get outside and join
the Patriots, he made every effort in his power to dissuade us from such
an attempt
`It you are took tryin' to get off, you'll be shot as dead as four
redherrin'
!'
he said emphatically.
`But we don't mean to be taken.' I answered.
`You can't help it. The Portuguese 'll discover you from the walls
may be fire on ye; or if you get safe into the country you'll be shot
down by the mounted robbers that's scourin' about as thick as hops;
or else the packs o' tarnal hungry dogs 'll fall on ye and tear ye to
mince meal!' It's much as yer lives is worth to try to get to the
Patriots
.
Ten to one if yer get near 'em they'll shoot you down takin' you
for enemies, afore you can say `camarada!' Take my advice and stay
here till somethin' turns up!'
`What can we do?' we asked.
`Wall, that's a thumper, true enough. I would n't 'vise you to stay
with the old man, for you'd sarve him right to quit him right off; but
a dollar a day's somethin.' I suppose you'd think my trade was n't
more genteel than his, or I'd take you to help me!'
`Your trade is respectable, Saul,' I answered. `I do not despise it.
I would rather a thousand times be an honest mechanic, than a pedlar
of glasses of soda-grog. But it would take a good while before we
could make ourselves useful to you. You are very kind. The only
way left for us is to join the Patriots. We have no money to get home.
Business here is dead, and we could get no employs as clerks. We may
never be able to reach Buenos Ayres to do any thing there. The only
course for us is, to try and join the Patriots, and there win fame, and
may be, money.'
`Wall, Yankee boys is al'ays devil-bent,' answered Saul. `But jest
let me advise you to keep your own council. If the old man should
guess you were watching a chance to get out of the town and join the
enemy, he'd report you to the Governor General, and I guess you'd be
shot for spies and traitors! These Portuguese are mighty ready with
their muskets. Keep all still, and if any thing turns up let me know;
and don't forget that so long as Saul Freelove has a house over his head
you are to hum in it!'
We thanked the honest fellow for his interest in our behalf, and
promised that we would act with caution.
CHAPTER V.
The `Host.'
The season of Carnival now approached. It lasts twelve days, and
is as all know who are conversant with Roman Catholic Holidays, a
period of merry making where every extravagance is indulged and
Comus reigns in joyous misrule. I should fill chapters to attempt a
description of the scenes which were enacted in Montevideo during
this season of folly and festivity. The presence of an army without the
walls each day becoming more formidable from the increase of
numbers
and the accession of artillery, by no means put a bar upon the
mirth peculiar to the time. For some days prior the greatest
preparations
were going on to celebrate the occasion. The churches were
trimmed with garlands of flowers, and every house was decorated with
wreaths and bouquests. Smiles were upon every face, and the greatest
good humor prevailed among all classes. Even the African slaves
seemed to enter with spirit into the scenes, although the majority of
them being heathens had little knowledge of Christian festivals; but
as they had full license to enjoy the days in their own way, this
religious
merry-making was quite as acceptable to them as to the most
devout Catholics.
The morning of the first day was ushered in by the firing of cannon
and the clang of bands of music. The whole garrison paraded during
the day in the public squares, and at night the palace was thrown
open for a grand masked ball, to which all foreigners of any
consideration
were invited. We had not the honor of an invitation, as we were
soda shop boys. Sunday was the gayest day of the first three. As we
refused to keep the shop open on that day, notwithstanding the urgent
desire of our employer, we made it a holiday, and, dressed in our best,
went into the streets. The scenes that everywhere met our eyes were
novel and full of life and interest. The thoroughfares were crowded
with persons of both sexes and all hues and costumes. At the head of
the street we met a procession which, in the United States, would be
termed a Callithumpian one. The leader was a motley-dressed fellow
wearing a hideous mask, with a nose a yard long, across which was a
pair of spectacles a foot in diameter. He wore a cap and bells, and
his dress was painted all over with red and blue devils, with forked
tails and pitchforks. He was mounted on a donkey fantastically
accoutred
and having at the end of his nose an elephant's trunk. Ever
and anon the fellow astride upon him would sound a ram's horn with
the most dissinant twang. He was followed closely by a group, two
and two, as extravagantly accoutered as himself, each masked most
furiously, and every one striving to make himself, as ludicrous as his
mother wits would let him. There must have been full three hundred
individuals, satyrs, devils, hobgoblins, angels, wizards, necromancers,
saints and sinners in all; and as they went along the streets they
would crack jokes upon the spectators, and were in return pelted with
harmless missiles.
The balconies were lined with females, some of them old and ugly,
but many of them extremely beautiful. The Montevidean ladies under
twenty are, indeed, lovely. Their large black eyes, full of passion
and love, their rich brunette complexions, their raven hair tastefully
dressed with jewels and flowers, and set off by the folds of black lace
veils worn with coquettish grace; their rich scarlet lips and beautiful
voluptuous figures, comprise points of feminine beauty in which they
excel almost all females of other lands. Their voices, too, are so
melodious
and flute-like, that one is thrilled whenever they speak. They
smile, too, so beautifully, and with such `naivete,' that the heart is
taken by storm and surrenders at discretion.
Such, at least, were the impressions then of Paul Perril, eighteen
years old and a devout worshipper at the shrine of beauty. Enthusiastic
as I was, my situation as shop-boy had withheld me hitherto from
seeking
the acquaintance of any of them, though there were two or three
little black beauties I had seen who lived in the neighborhood,
whom I resolved, when I should get quit of the shop, to endeavor to
form a nearer acquaintance with than distant arrow glances could
give!
As we entered the square we beheld a martial spectacle that fixed
our attention. Eight thousand of the Imperial troops, cavalry and
infantry
,
were passing in review before the Governor General and his
staff, which were posted in a group in front of the palace. The
splendor
of the cavalry uniforms and that of a great portion of the foot
soldiers
,
gave a gorgeous aspect to the whole I had never witnessed
before
.
They were all in motion at once, while at least five hundred
instruments of music were filling the sky.
Near us drew up a mounted general and several officers, who stood
awhile looking on as the battallions passed them. The uniform of this
body of officers literally blazed with gold. Of all magnificent military
dresses I have since beheld, I have seen none to equal those of the
Brazilian officers. Most of the wearers of them, however, were small,
under-sized men, and some of them beardless boys.
On horseback the Brazilian officer looks well, for his low stature
does not contrast with the splendor of his apparel; but on foot they
look diminutive and often insignificant. They want, too, manly
strength of profile, and are far from possessing the martial
countenances
that characterizes military men of other countries. It is true,
there were among them some fine-looking, soldierly officers; but these
were their exceptions. Their courage is, also, questionable, or
rather
,
their pusillanimity unquestionable.
The best officers in the Brazilian army were Frenchmen, who had
been schooled in the battle-fields of Napoleon, and who now sought
fame and occupation in the service of Don Pedro. There were also
in the army some Austrian officers, who had followed the fortunes of
the Brazilian Empress, who was an Austian by birth; and who
sometimes
led her own armies to battle, herself mounted astride and habited
like an Amazon.
Not long previous to our arrival at Montevideo, she had sallied from
Rio Janeiro, the capitol, leaving Don Pedro at home in his palace,
and marched to the interior, at the head of an army, to quell an
insurrection
,
which she successfully put down. This does not say much
for the warlike qualities of the Emperor, who, I believe is no Napoleon,
though he chose an Empress of that heroic blood.
After we left the square we turned to the right and suddenly
encountered
the `Host,' borne by a priest who tramped on at a rapid
pace beneath a crimson canopy supported by four boys in white
surplices
.
The consecrated wafer was contained in a small chased silver
vase or box, held upon a velvet cushion fringed with gold and decorated
with flowers.
It was preceded by a little boy ringing a bell and by four soldiers
with muskets, and followed by several priests and boys in surplices
bearing colored candles. As the procession advanced, every man,
woman and child dropped upon their knees and crossed themselves.
Some went down in the mud, some upon the pavement, others upon
the balconies, or roofs, or the doors, just where they happened to be.
Every good Catholic in sight was bound to drop upon his knees.
Some of the cavaliers, in white trowsers, I saw, took the precaution
o spread a handkerchief upon the ground to protect them. As we
came near we found ourselves standing alone surrounded by a
kneeling
,
crossing multitude. We stood still and stiff. The little bell
tinkled louder and sharper, and the soldiers eyeing us, one of them
cried out sternly in Portuguese, `kneel heretics!'
I slightly raised my hat over my head, but inwardly resolved I would
not bend knee to a piece of bread deified by idolatry. My two
companions
stood also firm until a soldier's bayonet was advanced
horizontally
in the direction of their abdominal region, when they retreated
into a fruit shop, the door of which stood, fortunately, open. I was
about to follow when a soldier took me by the shoulder and pressed
me down, as if he would make me kneel whether I would or no. This
proceeding roused my indignation, and, hitting the fellow a blow
between
the eyes, I caused him to release his hold, when I turned to
escape
.
The kneelers so crowded the way that I could not advance.
Above me was a verandah, upon which stood several ladies.
Impulsively
I seized one of the branching irons that supported it, drew
myself
lightly up and bounded upon the balcony among them, leaving
my discomfited soldiers gazing up from the street and cursing me with
oaths which I did neither understand nor care to.
The fellows finding they were interrupting the progress of the
procession
,
fell in again in the front, the little bell tinkled with an
expression
of angry vehemence, and canopy, hosts, priests and little
boys in white shirts moved on again. The people rose by the dozens
as it went past them, and in a few moments all was noise and talking
and mad gaiety. Maskers once more paraded the streets and music
resounded on all sides, mingled with peals of laughter.
I looked about me. The house which I had scaled so
unceremoniously
was of large size and had an imposing air of aristocracy. The
balcony was elaborately ornamented with grotesque figures cut into
the iron balustrade, and vases of plants both shaded it and shed
around a sweet fragrance. There were four tall windows, curtained
with crimson and orange drapery that led from it into sumptuously
furnished drawing rooms. Open windows on the other side of them
showed me another verandah overlooking a court-yard in which played
a fountain.
These points were observed at a glance. I next observed the
occupants
of the balcony. There were five persons, one of them a
stern-looking
priest: the others females. Three of them possessed nothing
very striking in their appearance, one being old, the others plain, and
full thirty, save the elegance of their dress. But the fourth instantly
enchained my eyes, and made my heart bound as if it would break its
imprisonment.
She was about sixteen, two years younger than I, that bewitching
age of freshness of beauty and love. She was a brunette, with the
most brilliant sloe-black eyes, that pierced like diamond-tipped arrows.
She was as graceful as a fawn, with a figure superb, like those of all
Spanish girls. Her hand was so small, that seen through the fold of
a curtain, it would have been taken for a child's of eight years. Her
hair was dark as night and freely waving in glittering tresses about her
shoulders. Her lips were like `a crushed rose leaf,' and around them
played a smile, full of the most captivating snares.
I stood bewildered. I feel that I must have looked supremely silly;
or I stared without other consciousness than her presence. She
smiled, and I became conscious of my rudeness. I remembered where
I was and how I happened there.
I was about to make an apology for my rudeness in my best
book-Spanish
,
when the priest laid his hand firmly upon my arm, and
looking
as if he would annihilate me, cried in Portuguese,
`Are you a heretic?'
`I am an American!' I answered in Spanish.
`An Americano!' repeated the young Spanish girl who had set my
heart playing cupid's tatoo; and her beautiful eyes beamed, and an
expression of curiosity and pleasure animated her fine oriental face.
`You have deserved to be imprisoned,' said the priest, in Spanish.
`I shall send for a guard and have you sent to prison, for disturbing
the peace!'
`It was the soldiers, not I,' I answered. `I stood quiet and raised
my hat!'
`Why did you not kneel?' he demanded sternly.
`I was taught by my father and mother to kneel only to God!' I
answered.
`That was your God! It was Christ in the Host, and is not
Christ God!'
I was not then much skilled in controversial theology, and scarcely
knew the difference between consubstantiation and transubstantiation;
nevertheless I answered him that I could never believe that God ever
dwelt in a wafer to be eaten.
This reply caused the fierce priest to look still more terrible, and
he was about to call for some one to go for the guard, when the
young Spanish girl stepped forward and laid her little white hand on
his arm.
`Padre mio,' she said in Castilian, and in the most musical voice
imaginable, which made one think of nightingales and bulbuls, `the
young gentleman is to be pitied, not harshly condemned. Let him
depart
in peace, and perhaps your leniency will convert him. Severity
will not do it, be assured!'
`Then be it as you say, Senorita Isabel!' answered the priest,
steping
back. `The obstinacy of these heretics is amazing, especially los
Americanos!'
I thanked my beautiful intercessor as well as I could for the
embarrassment
her eyes gave me, which I feared to look into, and then was
looking about to see how I should reach the street, when she said,
with a smile, that I had best wait a few minutes until those people who
had witnessed the late scene should have passed on; when she
graciously
conducted me through the drawing room to a flight of
spacious
stone stairs leading down to the court-yard.
CHAPTER VI.
The Banjo-Dances.
As I parted from the frank, beautiful Spanish girl, she smiled and
said pleasantly and with an arch manner,
`Senor Americano, if you don't care to bow to the Host, you should
keep within doors when it passes. You have been very rash. You had
better bend the knee than lose a life!'
`Had you, fair Senorita, been the bearer of the sacred wafer I would
willingly have bent the knee, but to you, not to the wafer.'
She laughed and shook her taper finger at me slightly frowning, yet
looking pleased at the bold compliment.
`Adios, senor,' she said hastily, turning from me and re-entering the
drawing-room.
`Vaga usted con Dios!' I responded, and left the patio fully
persuaded
I had left my heart behind. But young men between eighteen and
twenty-one, have a good many hearts. At least, they are often
deluded
,
as it were, by echoes, and it takes them a good while to find out
where really the true heart is.
Upon gaining the street I was unable to find my friends, and so
walked
on alone, though not without casting many a look back to the
balcony
.
She was upon it, and I thought looking after me; but I was
not certain of it, and the idea clearly shows how far I had gone in that
foolish vanity, which is peculiar to the beardless lover. I lingered a
moment at the corner to see if she did not waive her fan, or give me
some sign of recognition, but in vain. So I laughed at myself, and
pursued my way resolved to think no more of her; for what had I, a
soda-shop boy, to do with falling in love with a Spanish beauty
belonging
to one of the first families in the city.
At the corner was a
pulperia
, or grocery, and I bethought me after
passing it a few steps, to return and inquire of the proprietor who
dwelt in the large casa which I had left. The man was seated in his
door, rolling a broad leaf of tobacco into the shape of a cigar. He
was smoking a palpillito, and singing a Portuguese battle song. Upon
his head was a red woollen cap. His dark features stood out beneath
it in bold relief.
`Who lives in that house with the verandah, senor?' I asked in
Spanish
,
for I had found by experience that the Portuguese well understood
this language while I could make out pretty well their Portuguese.
`That, senor, is the house of Don de Noris,' answered the pulperio,
with courtesy, pausing with his cigar half made, and looking towards
the house.
`Is it a Spanish family?' I asked.
`Si, senor. Don Diego is one of the old Spanish citizens. He is
a rich muchissimo rico. He would have been glad to go up to Buenos
Ayres, but the Governor General keeps him here; for he knows that he
would give his money to help the patriots?'
`Then he is held as a sort of prisoner?' I asked.
`Yes, but he has liberty to go where he will so that he goes not
beyond
the walls; which he would find it hard to do,' added the
Portuguese
with a smile.
`I see ladies upon the balcony. Are they his daughters?' I
modestly
inquired.
`Don Diego is not married,' answered the man. `He has two
sisters
and a neice that form his household.'
`The neice is what age?'
`About seventeen, and a great beauty she is, too, and all the
Brazilian
cavaliers are dying for her; but she won't look at them. I dare say
she has a lover among the patriots!'
This idea caused my heart to feel a sudden pang, and a sensation of
an unpleasant kind passed over me. I felt no more desire to ask
further
questions, and thanking my talkative informant, I left him to
finish
rolling up his tobacco leaf, and wondering if she really had a lover
in the patriot camp. I at length came to the conclusion that she had,
and I resolved that if we ever met, I should hold him as an enemy.
But at this crisis, the reflection of my situation in Montevideo as a
bartender
,
made me smile and feel angry at the same moment, and
dissipated
at once all my ambitious love dreams.
A horrible discord of musical sounds, now suddenly burst upon my
ear, accompanied by a sort of Indian pow-wow-ing. Looking down a
narrow street, up which the uproar came, I saw an open space between
the foot of the lane and the walls, near which I had strayed, and filling
it, were throngs of Africans, who seemed to be in the height of
enjoyment
.
As I had seen nearly every other feature of the carnival, I
thought I would be a looker-on here. So traversing the short street
that terminated in the square I entered it. It was a space of about an
acre and a half of hard, well-tramped earth. At least two thousand
negroes
were gathered there. They were dressed in the most fantastic
style and in every color of the rainbow. After a general survey to see
what was going on, I at length saw that they were divided into some
score or more of groups, each surrounding a party of dancers. I
passed
from one to the other. One of the circles contained about a dozen
negroes of both sexes dancing with the most extraordinary outlay of
muscular exertion and physical activity to the music of banjos (skins
drawn tightly over a hollow log and thumped with a mallet,) congo
castinets
,
and other instruments, as rude in their construction at they were
noisy. Every group had its banjo and castanets, and these being
assisted
by a continual pow-wow of voices, the uproar of noises
diabolical
may easily be conceived. I never before heard such infernal
sounds. The dancers, some of them, were nearly naked, exhibiting
barbarously tattooed bodies. One fellow bad the sun, moon, and any
quantity of stars tattooed upon his breast and back. Some of the
women's faces looked as if a hot gridiron had been placed upon them.
They were all, too, such hideous Guinea-nigger looking heathens! I
noticed that the dances, features and costumes of nearly every group
were dissimilar, and upon inquiry was told by a complacent Spaniard
who was looking on and smoking, that the negroes were from as many
tribes in Africa, as I saw groups assembled there. He informed me
that the poor slaves retained here in their land of bondage, in a great
degree, their distinction of tribes, and that on holidays they met
together
to perform their dances, which perhaps, said he, are heathenish
rites.
Having obtained this information, I looked on with greater interest,
and once more made the round of the place, comparing the looks of
one tribe, with those of another. With this view, I was enabled
without
difficulty, to observe a wide difference between the tribes. The
Congo negroes were short, flat footed with long heels and ape-like
arms, and as bandy-legged as baboons. They were hideously ugly,
with noses flattened to the face and enormous lips. The Mangoes
were tall, well-formed, black as a polished boot, had prominent
features
,
and looked like men of fierce dispositions, while the females
were rather good looking, with fine eyes and teeth. The Mandangoes
were generally lazy, with sleepy eyes, square heads, and a brick brown
color of the skin. They also had beards, which the other two tribes
had not. I noticed in particular the negroes from the Gold coast.
They looked not unlike the Creek Indians, only blacker; but their
hair was long and but slightly crisped, and their profiles bold and strong,
some of the men having beak-like noses and high, bald foreheads.
One of them had quite a martial air. He stood looking on with an
aspect of stern indifference. I set him down for a chief, both on
account
of his appearance and a sort of deference which the rest paid
him. He was full six feet in height, finely formed, and leaned upon a
long staff. Upon his head was bound a scarlet handkerchief, and he
wore an open shirt of blue and red calico, over white trowsers rolled
up to the knees. He was a black Apollo in symmetry and noble
physical
developments.
Some of the old women which were seated on the ground beating
hollow sticks together, looked like old she devils, wrinkled, grey,
haggard
,
and their naked paps hanging down like ponches a foot long.
They kept up a see-sawing with their bodies, and uttering all the time
a monotonous
ye-yah-yeaw
that was doleful enough for music to dance
by. The dances were generally mere tramps of the feet, varied with
fantastic and uncouth gestures. One party seemed to me to do
nothing
but pad round in a ring at a sort of lock step, yelling a shrill note
at every foot fall, while the sweat ran down their naked bodies like rain.
And such an odor. It would have taken a river of Cologne to have
purified the atmosphere. I breathed by a sort of internal process so
as not to inhale the surcharged atmosphere. It is a curious fact that
some of the negro tribes do not exhale that peculiar pungent odor
which seems to be the native atmosphere of the individual African.
I saw subsequently some negroes of tribes near Timbucto that emitted
none of this from their skins. These are selected as domestic slaves,
for the olfactories of the inhabitants of the country are quite as
sensitive
as ours. Some of the negroes, however, of one tribe in
particular
,
the name of which I fortunately forget, for if I had kept it in my
memory it would have carried an odor with it, some of this tribe will
render an apartment uninhabitable by merely passing through it. But
if I say more upon this dark subject, I fear that the reader will have to
fumigate my paper before he can proceed farther.
Leaving then this scene of African revels, where no `sweet south
breathes upon a bank of violets,' I pursued my way along the inside of
the walls, which rose massive and strong on my right. From the top,
the sentries were looking down into the square and watching the
dances
.
I passed the gate out of which I had sallied with the cavalry, and
then entering the street of San Pedro proceeded towards the centre of
the town. I came soon upon a lively portion of the street, which
contained
some of the best houses, and met maskers with music going
before
them who made themselves merry at the expense of the passers-by,
I saw many beautiful ladies upon the verandah, which were gay with
awnings and decorated with flowers and streamers of silk. As I
turned
into the street where our `shop' was situated, I saw quite a
movement
of people near it, while loud peals of laughter proceeded from
them. As I came near, I beheld three or four officers belonging to the
frigate Doris, then laying in the outer roads, scaling a balcony filled
with ladies.
I forgot to say, and I will do it here, that one of the great causes of
sport on the carnival days is colored eggs. The yolks are removed,
the shells dyed blue, green, yellow, red or parti-colored, and filled with
rose water the ends sealed up, and boys and girls go about selling them
by scores. They are bought by every body, though in many families
where there are roguish girls, they are prepared at home; and the
sport is, for the ladies to pelt the gentlemen with them from the
balconies
as they pass along the streets. If any gentleman thus
bombarded
,
can succeed in scaling a balcony in face of the brisk fire from half
a dozen handsome ladies, who are supplied with amunition from
baskets
held by slaves, they are entitled to a kiss.
Directly opposite to our shop was the residence of an old Spanish
merchant, Don Pedro Lamas, who had three pretty daughters who were
much visited by the English and American navy officers. They were
of the ages of seventeen, nineteen and twenty-one. I knew them by
sight, indeed, had formed a sort of eye, smile and bow acquaintance
with them when they were on their balcony or promenading the roof,
and we upon ours. Once they had despatched a slave for soda, which
I laughingly sent; but as they did not send a second time, I rightly
judged that not a globule of effervescence was in the glass when it
reached them. Their curiosity was satisfied. But to the cause of the
excitement which I now witnessed in the street.
CHAPTER IX.
The Siege.
As I approached the animated scene near the shop, I had an
opportunity
of witnessing the whole adventure of the officers before
mentioned
.
It seems that as they were lounging up the street together
that they were suddenly assailed from the Don's balcony by a shower
of eggs filled with rose-water. Each of the young ladies had a basket
full by her side, and the colored missiles fell upon their heads and
shoulders in a shower. In an instant they all started to scale the
balcony
,
for the lower doors were, to be sure, carefully bolted and barred.
The height of the balcony was not less than fourteen feet from the
street. It was supported, not by column, but by iron braces
projecting
from the wall obliquely upward. These braces were full eight feet
from the side-walk. The officers sprung to the escalade and, like true
sailors, began to mount upward, the projections of the windows
affording
them footing to reach the braces. Two of them, as I came
up, were hanging to them and trying to clamber up over the verge of
the balcony, their situation being precisely like passing by the futtock
shrouds over into the ship's tops, only in this case they had no other
support than an iron rod for feet and hands.
The ladies leaned over the balustrade, and with loud laughter
poured down into their faces and bosoms a perfect hurricane of grape.
They were deluged with rose water. The young American lieutenant
at length got his hand over so as to grasp one of the uprights of the
balustrade, but the moment he lifted his face it was battered with
these rose scented missiles. He was blinded with the fluid, and the
crash of the shell upon the face or in the eyes was by no means
pleasant
.
He made several desperate efforts to get up, but at length, fairly
blinded by the rose-water, he was forced to retreat, amid the shouts of
the spectators, who looked on, enjoying the scene with infinite gusto.
I could not keep my eyes off the four beautiful girls, for they had a
handsome cousin, Donna Irene, to assist them in defending their
fortress
and their lips! Their faces were so gloriously animated, so
brilliantly
flushed, and so full, withal, of laughter, that at length rendered
them almost incapable of throwing their missiles. Their spirited
attitudes
,
their grace and thousand movements of beauty enchained my
gaze. I never witnessed a sight so beautiful and captivating. Their
mellow laughter, too, rang most musically. The crowd, which was
composed of officers, soldiers, black and white, slaves, maskers, monks
and sailors, encouraged, cheered, hissed, shouted and roared with
laughter.
The American officer and the other Englishman made a second
attempt
.
They reached the verge of the balony and closing their eyes
clambered over. The Englishman was driven back for an instant.
The American pressed forward while the crowd cheered him on. The
ladies retreated, still keeping up a spirited fire into the drawing-room.
The American followed, and the Englishman bounded in after him.
In a moment or two we heard loud laughing, shrieks, and the
multitude
shouted `viva! bravissimo!'
The cavaliers had won the victory! The people now dispersed,
seeking amusement in some other quarter; for the town was all over
mad with frollicing.
I have now to relate an `egg adventure' that is not quite so
romantic
as that I have just describe; but as it is personally interesting to
me, Paul Perril, I will give it as it happened.
After I had seen the adventure thus happily terminated, I was seized
with a desire to be the possessor of some scores of blue, red, and
green eggs which I had seen a negress carrying in her basket upon her
head, while the scaling of the balcony was going forward. I now
approached
her and asked her if they were for sale.
`Si, Senyah,' she answered.
`How much a dozen?'
`Kart real,' she answered, in her negro Portuguese.
Four reals, which is half a dollar, was a great deal of money for
me, when the reader remembers the depth of my purse. I had but
two dollars and three quarters in the world; for as yet the old
gentleman
had not paid us any portion of our dollar per diem. He preferred,
he said, paying up in the lump! The temptation was irresistible, and
the dozen eggs were bought by me and transferred from the basket
very carefully to my handkerchief.
I then opened the enormous doors which led into our court-yard,
with the intention of ascending to the roof and having some private
sport of my own with the eggs. Some thoughts of bombarding the
opposite house, where dwelt the daughters of Don Pedro, passed
through my mind; for it occurred to me that an egg of rose-water
might be a means of introduction to them, in a merry way. Of
course I did not intend to hit them, and expected to draw their fire
upon me.
I had ascended but a few steps of the flight which led to the roof of
the `casa' when my eye fell, by ill-luck, upon an old vinegar-faced
virago who dwelt in the next court. She always sat in her door, with
a striped handkerchief upon her head, smoking paper cigars, which
she made for the purpose by skillfully rolling up cut tobacco in small
slips of white paper, pinching the ends so as to make them tight and
hold well. I had often watched, and been more than once tempted
to play a trick upon her. If I could have got powder into her
tobacco
,
it would have been there. She was so cross, and beat two
old negro slaves so, and scolded so fiercely and vixenishly, that I had
a grudge against her.
The reader will not forget that I was eighteen, and something wild
and wayward, and often did things with little reflection upon the
consequences.
Upon reaching the first landing of the stair-way, I saw the old
yellow-visaged crone seated upon her door step, smoking. Her face
was turned with its profile towards me. I thought of my eggs, and
slowly descending the stairs again to the court approached a hole
in the wall, as large as a hat, out of which two or three bricks
had fallen. She was within five feet of me as I looked through at
her, with an egg, the largest in the lot, in my fingers. I only wished
it was a rotten one.
I softy raised my hand, and raised my hand, and taking good aim
hit her fairly in the cheek. The howl she set up was tremendous. I
sprung aside, but not before she saw who it was that had scented her
with rose-water; for which she ought to have been most grateful.
Finding I was discovered, I proceeded boldly to discharge a second
missile; but she was as active as she was hideous; and springing lightly
aside she caught up half of a brick and discharged it through the hole
at my head. It flew with unerring aim, and as I darted back it fell at
my feet, rebounded, and dashed in pieces a huge demijohn of vitriol
within half a yard of me, three of which belonging to the old
gentleman
were placed against the wall. The contents flew all over me like
liquid fire. I remember uttering a yell of the most excrutiating
agony, and the next instant I was up to my chin in the cistern, into
which I had instantly leaped.
I shall never forget the sufferings of those moments. My pantaloons
fell from me in tinder before I had touched the water and my body
and arms, to say nothing of my legs, were on fire. The water gave
me temporary relief. My first outcry, rent from me by inconceivable
torments, had brought from the balcony both of my friends and the
old man. They flew to my relief, but he on seeing his demijohn
demolished
,
began to swear.
The old witch, with her tanned and devilish visage filling the hole
in the wall surveyed the scene and langhed with malicious triumph as
she saw me up to my neck in the cistern. The sight of her kept me
from showing my agony in my face; for, I believe, if she had not been
looking on, I should have fairly roared and howled. I can bear
physical
pain as well as most persons; but every body has not been
victimized
by a smashed demijohn of the oil of vitriol. What with the
old man's oaths, the vixen's laughter, and my friend's sympathy, with
a groau or so from me by way of variety, there was quite a scene. I
was at length got to my bed, half-flayed alive. I had not a piece of
skin left below my knees, and above them it was taken off in large
patches. I had had enough of the carnival! I kept my bed three
days; but with care and kind attention from my three friends, in a
week I was in the shop again, with a whole skin, but somewhat a
tender one, as may be supposed.
By the time I got out, carnival was over. Lent had begun, and the
town was fasting, and as quiet and solemn as the Sabbath in New
England. The contrast was most extraordinary. Every man looked
as if he had just buried his brother, or as if the plague reigned.
Having recovered, I bore no grudge against the old woman; for I
fairly deserved what I got. I had been the aggressor, and while she
only intended to return me a brick-bat, Providence added a bath of
vitriol. The lesson I have never forgot. It has cured me of many
prejudices, and taught me never to assail thoso whom I have reason to
think cannot avenge themselves. With this little bit of a moral I will
go on with my narrative.
The siege of the town was daily becoming closer, and during the
last two or three days of Carnival, the Patriots contributed fire-works
to aid the general festivity; they were, however more solid than
picturesque
,
coming over the walls in the shape of eighteen-pound shot and
shell, not charged with rose-water, but old iron and bullets. This
contribution to the amusement of the citizens was by no means relished
and the streets were less thronged, and many of the balls bounced into
them and sometimes went skipping along over the paved walks for a
square doing some mischief and producing more terror. Llavelleja
had taken advantage of the merry-making within the walls to advance
his lines, and one night he threw into the old convent a large force,
with five peces of cannon, and in the morning, to the surprise and
dismay
of the garrison, opened his battery upon the walls. From this
time the joys of carnival were a little qualified by personal
apprehension
,
for the shot came clattering upon the roofs and hopping into the
streets at all hours of the day.
The Brazilians returned the fire from the walls, but discreetly kept
within their defences. Thus the last day or two of my confinement to
my room I was regaled with the almost continual music of a two-sided
cannonading. A shot very unceremoniously knocked over one of the
urns on the corner of our roof, and striking the battlements of Don
Pedro's house opposite, made a breach that exposed the whole area of
the house top to our view. Fortunately the Senoras had a few minutes
before finished their evening promenade and gone down into the
parlor
.
We all got quite used to the roar of cannon, and were
unconcerned
even at seeing a ball light in the street before our shop door
and kick up a dust that rattled upon our windows like hail. There
were however, but very few persons killed or wounded. The soldiers
on the walls had the worst of it, judging from the number of poor,
bleeding forms that were carried every half hour or oftener by our door
to the hospitals, borne on the shoulders of their comrades. Custom
has such influence upon the mind that these painful sights, as well as
the falling of the shot into the bosom of the town, were very soon
regarded
by us almost with indifference. The old gentleman and his
son Edwin, however, never could get accustomed to it; and turned
pale and shrunk up into as small a space as possible at every discharge
of the guns. The former was as nervous as he could live, and seemed
to endure the tortures of a living death. Doubtless his conscience
troubled him, and he knew better than any one else what sins he had
to answer for,
This state of things continued for nearly a week after the carnival,
the bombardment being only for a few hours intermitted at the time,
only to be resumed again with more vigor. We still sold soda, for
although it was Lent, and fasting was commenced, there was no papal
bull against soda-water dashed with Port.
At length one afternoon Fairfax came in. He said he had boarded
out nearly all his money, and that it was time something should be
done. In this we fully concurred, and we agreed to meet that
evening
at the coffee-house, by his invitation, he holding the purse, to
discuss
the matter. Before we closed the shop, however, it was resolved
that we should ask the merchant for our dollar
per diem
. The amount
due each of us was twenty four dollars, excluding the Sundays.
So when the doors were about to be closed, and the others had come
in from their shops, I, with some misgiving, asked the old man, who
was counting at the drawer his gains for the day, if he would let us
have the wages due to us.
CHAPTER X.
The Coffee House.
In
a minute after I had put the question, the old gentleman made no
reply, but continued to count the money, until he had ascertained the
amount of the day's receipts. He then looked up and setting his
spectacles
more firmly upon the bridge of his nose, peered at me sternly
through the glasses.
`Wages! You are in a hurry, young gentlemen,' he answered with
a sneer which became his face much better than any other expression;
`I don't expect to pay you except quarterly. Besides, I begin to think
that a dollar a day is exhorbitantenormously exhorbitant. Do you
know that you are running great risks, very great risks in compelling
me to pay for your services. The law here looks upon you as my
servants
,
sons, for you are under age, and it will sustain me in my
authority
.
I have inquired into the matter and know all about it. I shall
not pay you any thingnot a stiver! If you dare to leave me I will
have you arrested and thrown into prison, you may depend on it. Do
you think I am going to pay your passage out here and then pay you a
dollar a day. No, no! I am not the old fool you think me. I have
had counsel and know that you must stay with me on my own terms or
try the comforts of a Portuguese prison. You may tell your story but
who will believe you in the face of my own, and the fact that you have
come out with me. No, no, young men, independent as you think
yourselves
you are completely in my power!'
Our indignation, our supreme astonishment at this reply kept us
silent
.
We looked at one another in thorough amazement, and then by
one impulse quietly walked out of tho shop and hastening to the coffee
house. Here we found Fairfax. We immediately took him aside and
made known to him the old man's answer to our application. We then
swore vengeance. Having seated ourselves at a side table, and called
for coffee and toast we began to discuss the matter:
`There is no doubt,' said Fairfax, `that the old man has been
consulting
with some persons here as to the authority he can have over
minors, and that he finds the infernal Portuguese laws will sustain him
in any exercise of authority he chooses to display over us. He would
not talk so boldly, if he was not convinced that the law was on his side.
He is right in saying that his story will be believed before our own,
inasmuch
as our having come out with him shows a voluntary act of
submission
on our parts.'
`So far as I can see,' said I, `we are in a fix. The old man is bad
enough for any thing. As to remaining with him longer I will not.
He refuses to pay us what he owes us, and we can't compel him to, that
seems clear.'
`What shall be done?' asked Hewitt with a snuffle of the nose, and
looking somewhat perplexed at the crisis affairs had taken.
`My opinion is,' said I, `that we do not delay another hour getting
out of the city and joining the Patriots.'
`There I am with you,' said Fairfax and Radsworth warmly.
`I am not so certain that we can get there or better ourselves,'
responded
Hewitt. `For my part I have about resolved to remain with
the old codger, till I can get some clever Yankee Captain to give me a
passage home. There will be some vessels soon going back to the
States, I dare say, as soon as they find they can't reach Buenos Ayres.'
We felt disposed to look with contempt upon Hewitt's forbearance,
and began to talk over (we three) the best means of getting out of the
city. Fairfax said that he was satisfied that we could not pass out by
the gates, and the only way would be to try and possess ourselves of a
boat at the mole in the night and pull across the water, a mile and a
half to the inland shore.
At this moment, a Boston sea-captain, whom we had often seen and
liked for his frank manners and fine social qualities, came up to the
table where we were. As he approached a Portuguese lieutenant who
had been leaning against a columu near by smoking his cigar, slowly
retired, though not before I had caught his eye which met mine with a
singular expression.
`Ah, my young friends, you love to drink coffee better than soda, eh?'
said Capt. Conway with a smile. `Well I am glad to see you enjoying
yourselves.'
`Will you take a cup, Captain?' we asked.
`No. I have to go to the Consul's to supper, and it would spoil my
appetite.'
With these words he left us, and passed on up the saloon. He was
a large, portly, bluff looking gentleman, and had the air of a lover of
jokes and of good cheer. He was master of the barque Blakely which
lay then in the harbor, having been turned from her destination (
Buenos
Ayres) as we had been, by the Brazilian cruisers, and brought into
Montevideo. We had become acquainted with him by seeing him in
the shop.
After he had left us, we finished our coffee, and together took a stroll
up into the Grand Square to hear the Governor's band play. We then
returned homeward, still deeply engaged in the discussion of the best
way of getting out of the city; for we were resolved not to remain in
it another day. Upon reaching our lodgings about half past eight
o'clock, we met at the door our friend, Captain Conway. The
moment
he beheld us, he hastened towards us in the greatest excitement,
saying,
`I am glad to see you at last. You have no time to lose.'
`What is the matter? what has happened?' we asked earnestly and
filled with surprise.
`Your imprudence at the coffee-house has betrayed you into
difficulty
.
At this moment, I suspect an order is being issued for your
arrest.'
`By old Bedrick?' I asked indignantly.
`No. But lose no time. Hasten into your rooms and get what
clothing you can carry in bundles and then follow me to the quay.
My boat is there awaiting me. Your only safety is in reaching my
vessel
without delay.'
We did not fully comprehend the source from whence danger was to
be apprehended, but assured that it menaced us, we did not ask for
further explanation, but hurried to our rooms, moving as lightly as we
could not to disturb the old man. There were but three of us,
Hewitt
having left us in the square, to call round and see Saul Freelove.
We had no time to think of him, though we resolved not to go without
him, as he was exposed to the like danger with ourselves. We
hurriedly
took from our trunks what articles were mostly needed by us,
such as shirts, socks, vests, &c., and tied them up in our handkerchiefs.
We were not five minutes about it, and on returning to the street door
we found the good Captain walking up and down impatiently waiting
for us.
`You are in good time,' he said; `now follow me to the mole.'
As we were leaving the door, Bill Bedrick appeared, and wanted to
know where we were going? As he was a friend of ours we told him
that there was an order out for our arrest, and that we were going on
board the Blakely for security.
`Here's with you then,' he answered. `I will just go back and get
my bundle, and I will be with you before you reach the quay. But
what are you to be arrested for?'
`We hardly know,' I answered; but Capt. Conway has given the
alarm and recommended us to fly.'
`Why, the young mad-caps,' answered the Captain, `have been
overheard
at the coffee house, declaring their intention to quit the city by
the first opportunity and join the patriot army. This has been
reported
to the Governor-General by some spy who overheard it'
`That confounded sly-looking Portuguese lieutenant,' I exclaimed
warmly. `But we spoke in English, Captain.'
`He doubtless understood English. The Governor has his spies
every where. You have acted imprudently, but there is no help for it
now. You have to get out of their reach as soon as you can. Come,
my friends, do not delay, for in less than fifteen minutes a file of the
city guards will be at the door in search of you.'
We now pushed on after the generous hearted Captain, and reached
the mole five minutes before the nine o'clock gun was fired. Young
Bedrick joined us in a moment or twoafter our arrival. The Captain's
boat with our men was waiting for him at the stairs. The sentry
stopped
him and asked his name, and that of his vessel, and then let him
pass on. As it was dark we passed with him as his sailors, having
previously
,
at his suggestion, tucked our coat-skirts up under our waists
to make the garment look like a roundabout. We also assumed a
swaggering, rolling gait, the better to deceive the soldier.
Just before arriving at the sentinel, the Captain had said to us,
`Boys, if he refuses to let you pass, we will take his musket away,
tumble him into the boat with us and take him on board. We,
however
,
passed him without suspicion. The watch, too, was not kept
with such dilligence in going from the mole, as coming into the city;
and the numerous sea-captains constantly passing and re-passing
rendered
the sentries less vigilant at that point.
We got into the boat, the Captain having sent one of the men to
Freelove's to inform Hewitt of his danger, and advise him to remain
quiet where he was, until he could join us on board the barque.
We pushed from the mole stairs just as the nine o'clock gun fired,
and pulled out to wards the Captain's vessel. The harbor was filled,
crowded with ships and brigs of every maratime nation, with about
thirty Brazilian vessels of war anchored about here and there among
them. To reach the barque, therefore, we had to pull now around the
bows of a Swedish ship, now under the stern of a Brazilian gun-brig;
then the cable of an English merchantman would bring us up, or the
stern hawser of an American ship. It was, dodge in and out for a
quarter of a mile, when we came along side of the barque, and
ascended
the sides.
When we stood on her deck, we felt a sensation of freedom that we
had not experienced for some time. To be again on the deck of a
Yankee vessel, drew us in association back to our country; and to
tread upon plank that had grown in the pine forests of Maine, made
us feel ourselves almost at home again.
The Captain invited us down into the cabin, turned out both cook
and steward, and ordered a hot supper. After a little while we sat
down to the table with him, and for me, I enjoyed one of the heartiest
meals I had ever partaken of. During the progress of the supper, no
allusion was made to the circumstances which had brought us off, but
we talked only upon general subjects, such as the next news from the
States, the condition of the garrison, the force of the patriots, the
progress
of the siege.
At length, after we had well eaten, the good Captain ordered wine
and glasses. These being placed before us, at his invitation we filled
and drank the following toast proposed by him:
`The Star Spangled Banner! If we suffer one of the stars that
beam in its blue field to be extinguished, may we have the thirteen
stripes laid upon our backs!'
Having drank this sentiment with immense applause, and
proportionate
pounding upon the table, we were reminded of our peculiar
position
at that present time, by the following propounder from the
hospitable
Captain:
`My lads what do you intend to do?'
For at least a minute there was no reply. We looked blankly at
each other. We had decided upon nothing, and it had been
continually
upon my thoughts ever since we left the house, what we should do.
`Join the patriots,' at length responded Radsworth resolutely. `We
can be landed by your boat on the main.'
`That will not be so easy as you think,' answered Captain Conway.
The whole shore is watched by guard row-boats. No boat can land or
take the water without discovery. If you will take my advice you will
do better, perhaps, than join LlavellejaI mean for you to reach Buenos
Ayres!'
`How?' we exclaimed all at once.
`I will tell you,' he answered, as he filled another glass of old
Maderia
and passed the bottle to us with the admonition not to take `too
much for our health.'
CHAPTER IX.
The Preparation.
After
we had filled our glasses I proposed `the health of Captain
Conway,' which was drunk with grateful enthusiasm.
`Two glasses all round I think will do for young people like
ourselves
,'
said the Captain smiling; `now for my plan. I submit it to
you, and let you judge for yourselves.'
`We will be guided by your superior judgment and experience,' we
answered.
`Well, hear first what I have to propose. You say you wish to join
the Patriots. Now the best and the only way to attain your end is to
try and reach Buenos Ayres.'
`But the blockade, Captain,' said Fairfax.
`Very true. But if you are the young men I think you are, you
will not let half a dozen Brazilian blockades be any obstacle in your
way. As it is, Montevideo is no longer safe for you. You say you do
not care about returning to the States without accomplishing
something
more than selling soda-water by the glass. I like your spirit.
When I was a young man I felt just so. As to your agreement with
Mr. Bedrick that is of no force. He has shamefully deceived you (we
had told the Captain the history of the affair of our coming out to
South America, while in the boat) and you have nothing to reflect upon
yourselves for leaving him. Besides, you can no longer stay in the
city. By this time your house has been searched, and I have no doubt
the town will be strictly overhauled to find you; for it is death to make
any attempt to join the Patriots; and if you are taken you will be
likely
at the very least to be thrown into the calaboose, and be kept there
till the war is over. The American Consul could not save you after
your open expressions of attachment to the service of the enemy. I
am not sure that you will be safe on board my vessel many hours, or
you should remain as long as you like. I have no doubt I run great risk
in bringing you on board; for if they should find you here, my vessel
would be confiscated.'
`We will leave it this moment, Captain,' I answered warmly, `rather
than involve you in any danger.'
`This is noble in you, but I have begun to save you, and I never do
things half way. There is no doubt but that when they find that you
are not on shore, they will search every American vessel in port. Now
hear the plan I have thought of for your safety, and also for bringing
about your wishes. I have on board swinging at the quarter deck, a
whale boat, which I picked up off San Salvador, adrift. It is almost
new, staunch, and will do service. The mate has amused himself in
calm weather, in making a mast and sail for it, as he thought it would
be handy to pass to and from the vessel in, when we should lay in the
outer roads from Buenos Ayres, which are two leagues from the
landing
.
Now this boat, which is worth about eighty dollars, is at your
service, and you may pay me for it in Boston when you can. You
shall take her with four oars, mast and sail, and try to reach Buenos
Ayres in her. It is a perilous attempt I allow, and requires bold hearts
and steady nerves to go through with it successfully. But I have great
faith in you, my lads, and have no doubt you will achieve the
adventure
handsomely, and do honor to Yankee land.'
We assurred him that we would try to do so, and thanking him for
his offer told him with one voice that we would make the attempt to
reach the blockaded city.
`There can be no more danger before us than now surrounds us,'
said Fairfax; `but ready as I am to undertake it, I don't see how we
are to get out of the harbor, much more reach Buenos Ayres.'
`It will be a delicate affair to manage, young gentlemen, and will
require all the coolness and energy you possess to carry it through.
But I feel confident that you will succeed, young men, if success
is possible. About twelve o'clock to-night would be a good time
to start, for you will be less likely to fall in with the guard-boats,
for at that time they generally pull in to relieve duty. By muffling
your oars, two of you pulling, one at the helm, and the fourth to look
out at the bows, you may be able to pull safely out among the fleet in
the harbor. Once outside the guard-ship, and half your danger is
over. You will then step your mast and make sail on her and run for
the British frigate Doris, which is, you know, anchored about five
miles out in the river. By the time you get up with her, you will be
far enough out to put your helm up river and steer right for the
blockading
squadron, which you know stretches across the river about five
leagues above this city. The blockading squadron you will find
anchored
within gun-shot of each other, from shore to shore, making a
chain of vessels a mile and a half apart, and sixty miles long. Through
this squadron you will have to pass; and as you will come in sight of
the lights of the vessel before day, (for the wind is fresh and fair for
you outside) I should advise you to strike your sail when within a mile
or so of them, take the bearings of the two nighest vessels and pull
mid-way between them. In the darkness, and your boat lying so low
in the water, you will not be discovered like a larger vessel. If you
get through in safety, as I hope you will, you had best pull on again a
mile or two before you set your sail. Then you will have the river all
before you for an hundred and twenty miles; but as there will
probably
be cruisers stealing about for many leagues above the squadron,
you must keep on the constant look out, and pull into the land when
you see any thing suspicious looking. For the rest, you will be
guided
by circumstances and your own judgment. In four or five days you
ought to be at Buenos Ayres, if all succeeds with you. Now you have
my plan and can embrace it or not at your pleasure. The whale boat
is at your service, and I shall order Jack the cook to boil some beef
and pork for you; the steward shall put in a bag of buscuit and some
wine, and I will lend you a chart of the river, a compass and a
spy-glass
,
so that you may be able to detect the enemy's colors at a distance
and keep out of their way.'
The kind Captain having ended, we thanked him with grateful
enthusiasm
and pledged ourselves to be guided by his directions and reach
Buenos Ayres or die in the attempt.
`I know that you will, my lads. And that you shall not want for
arms to defend yourselves with in case of need, I will let you have a
pair of boarding pistols a piece, and a cutlass!'
As he spoke he took from a rack half a dozen old Turkish sabres,
but in good condition.
`These I bought in Smyrna at auction, with half a dozen more like
them. They belonged to a Turkishpirate who was captured and brought
in there while I was there. Doubtless they have done some service in
their day. The pistols, also, are Turkish, and although something
long in the barrel, are good fire-arms. Help yourselves to them, and
if you get to Buenos Ayres safely, you may pay me for them when you
can. Remember,' he added, smiling, `that I only loan them to you;
so that you are not at liberty to surrender them to any Portuguese
rogues that may give you chase!'
`We shall bear it in mind, Captain,' answered Fairfax in the same
spirit; and if you never see them again be assurred it will be because
we are not living to restore them.'
`Don't be rash, boys; but if you let the Brazilians capture you I
shall be very much disappointed in you.'
`From what I have seen of Brazilian prisons I would rather die
than go into one,' I answered. `But, Captain Conway,' I added
suddenly
,
`how did you learn our danger and hear that we were to be
arrested
?'
`After I left you at the coffee house, I passed out and went on my
way to the Consul's. Just before me walked two Brazilian officers,
one of whom had come out of the coffee house before me. They were
conversing, and hearing the word `Americanos,' I quickened my pace
and listened, as one was talking to the other in a loud, animated tone.
They did not heed me behind them, and so I overheard that one of
them had heard `four young Americans' in the coffee house propose
to join the patriots, and planning a way of escape through the gates.
He further said that they had spoken against the Governor-General, the
Emperor, and the Brazilians in a mass!'
`This was true,' said Fairfax.
`Did the officer whom you heard speaking, wear a scarlet, round
cap, with a gold chain, and a green jacket?' I asked. `And was he
tall and very slim?'
`Yes.'
`I saw the fellow and caught his eye. He seemed to be smoking and
paying no attention to us!' I said indignantly.
`He was a spy and has betrayed you, or rather you betrayed
yourselves
,'
said the Captain. `Coffee houses are not safe places to speak
one's mind in, especially in Montevideo with an enemy at the gates.
Well, this man, whom I knew could be only speaking of you, said to
the other, that you had spoken enough to show that you were both
enemies
and traitors to the Emperor, and that he was hastening to have
you arrested. Upon hearing this, I immediately turned back in great
alarm to put you on your guard, and found that you had quitted the
place. I hastened to your lodgings and learned from a black woman,
who stood in the door, that you were not in. I then went from place
to place for you, where I supposed you might be, and finally after going
a second time to your house, fell in with you.'
We thanked the noble Captain for his kind efforts in our behalf, and
assurred him that we should never forget him; and here I pay this
public
tribute to his generosity of heart. I know not whether he be living
now or not; but if he is, and his eyes chance to fall upon these pages
he will see that he is remembered, though many years have elapsed
since we met him.
A little before midnight all the preparations were made. The whale
boat which was but eighteen feet long, sharp at both ends, with four
thwarts, or seats, was lowered into the water, and drawn along under
the starboard gangway. In it the mate had placed a bag of boiled
corn beef, and a bag of biscuit, not forgetting a box of wine, the
compass
,
spy-glass, and chart of the river. The latter was valuable to us,
to enable us to find out where we were as we run up along the shore.
We now came on deck with our pistols, ammunition and sabres, and
passed them into the stern of the boat. The mast and sail were
snugly
furled together, and laid traversly along the thwarts in the centre.
The oars were also muffled by binding canvass upon the part that
played
in the row-locks, and placed upon the seats. A dark lantern was
also supplied and put in the locker with the compass. All these
preparations
without the least possible noise, for a vessel of war was close
by us.
Every thing being reported by the mate as ready, the Captain once
more called us into the cabin, and repeated some of his previously-given
instructions, particularly enjoining the strictest silence as we passed
out of the harbor,
`Give every order in a whisper. Choose your helmsman and your
look-out, while two take the oars, and keep each to his station till you
get fairly clear of the port. If you are challenged by any of the
Brazilian
vessels of war that you pass near, answer one of the `Doris,' in
a clear, free manner, and you will be suffered to pass, as you will be
taken for the Doris' (the British frigate that lays outside) boat which
often goes off with her captain as late as this; and `Doris' is his reply
when challenged. I trust, however, that you will manage to creep
along so stealthily that you will not be observed. If you are you must
trust to your presence of mind to take care of yourselves. Perilous as
the path is before you, it is quite as dangerous for you to remain
behind
.
So my brave young countrymen, good night, and God bless you
It is time you were off!'
He shook us warmly by the hand all round, and tears glistened in
his manly eyes. We, ourselves, did not part with him without some
emotion. At the side he again took leave of us, and as we descended
his last words were,
`If you love me, don't let me be told to-morrow that the Brazilians
have you in their hands. Remember that you are Yankees, and that
each one of you is equal to twenty of these Portuguese. Good bye,
boys, and move along as quiet as a fish two feet under water!'
CHAPTER X.
The Escape from the Harbor.
Having
spoken our last low farewell to the excellent Captain as he
leaned over the side, we quietly took our respective stations in the boat
preparatory to starting on our perilous enterprise. It was a clear,
starry night, with just wind enough to cause the little waves it raised
to break into heads. The only sound that could be heard were the
howling of dogs from the streets in the city, and the calls of the
sentries
to each other.
Fairfax took the helm; Radsworth and Bedrick the two oars, and I
stationed myself in the sharp bows to look out ahead.
`Are we all ready?' whispered Fairfax.
`All ready,' was our subdued answer.
`Pull away, then,' he added; and pushing from the side, we
noiselessly
let fall the oars and began to move on.
The barque was on oll sides enclosed by vessels at anchor. We had
not taken thirty strokes when we passed under the stern of an English
ship. The officer of the watch was whistling as he paced his lonely
deck, and was heard by us so distinctly that we feared our rowing
would have been detected; for it would have been dangerous to have
been hailed by any ship, as it would have drawn towards us the
attention
of the Brazilian vessels of war which were all about. We let the
oars fall as softly as if they were made of feathers and passed under
the stern, and so near that we had to bend low to prevent the rays of
light shining through the cabin windows from falling upon our persons.
The next vessel was a Yankee brig, which we passed across the bows
and so nigh that I gave the boat an additional impetus by taking hold
of the cable which we went under. The next vessel was a large
Brazilian
brig of war of sixteen guns, anchored with her best bower out
forward and a kedge astern. I had to keep a sharp look out not to run
our boat against the cable or hawser, which, in the obscurity of the
night, it was difficult to do. As we came close upon the brig I
whispered
for the rowers to pull gently, and at the same time gave
directions
to Fairfax how to steer her. Seeing the outline of a sentry in
the gangway, I thought that our safest course was to keep close under
the counter of the vessel; as he might detect as if we were off a few
yards distant attempting to pull by. So I whispered to Fairfax how to
steer and we run directly under her taffrail, and so near that I touched
her as we passed, and pushed the skiff along. We had not passed three
strokes of the oars before we were started by a sudden and loud cry
upon decks. My heart jumped into my mouth. I felt certain that we
were discovered, and so did the others. But the cry formed itself into
intelligible words, and we were relieved by hearing the `all's well' of
the Portuguese sentry instead of an order for us to come to. We now
pulled on steadily, gaining confidence with every vessel we got safely
by, until we had passed full twenty in silence and unsuspected, though
we had once nearly upset our boat by striking against the cable of a
French barque. The noise alarmed a watch-dog on board who set up
a loud baying, and to escape detection we pulled directly under the
bows and lay there as still as death. The officer of the deck took the
alarm and not only looked over the quarter himself to examine the
water
,
but we heard him give orders to his men (for I understood a little
French) to look about forward. We could see the men's heads
peering
over, but as we were so snugly hidden under the bulging bow we
remained undiscovered; though every little while a dog would set up
a howl. After remaining
perdu
about ten minutes finding all still we
shoved out and pulled stealthily away and met with no other
misadventure
until we had, as I have said, passed safely about twenty vessels,
when we came to a Brazilian corvette of twenty guns. This ship lay
at anchor broadside towards us, and as she had a boat at her booms,
we feared we might be discovered by the keeper. We, therefore,
pulled
out as far from her as possible, though at the risk of falling aboard
a gun-boat which was anchored fifty yards astern of her. We laid as
low to the water as we could, taking off our hats, and making
ourselves
show as little as we possibly could. We then pulled steadily on,
and had nearly passed between the two, when we were electrified by a
sharp hail from the quarter-jeck of the corvette.
`Kien loh!' was the sound though not the words, that reached our
ears; but I give the sound rather than the orthography. `Who goes
there?'
`Doris!' promptly responded Fairfax with a presence of mind that
could not be too highly praised.
`Pass on!' answered the sentry.
`Now give way without fear,' added Fairfax. `We shall be
suspected
if they do not hear your oars. Shorten them to the place where
they are not muffled, so as to make them play noisily in the row-locks!'
We continued to row in this manner, until we had passed one or two
merchant vessels near the ship, when once more we began to steal
along with muffled oars; for a large Brazilian frigate lay just before
us; and notwithstanding we had deceived successfully the sentry of
the corvette, were not rash enough to try to pass the frigate. Fortune
might not favor us again. We, therefore, pulled along until we came
near her, when I stood up and made a careful survey of her position.
To avoid her `booms' was the most perplexing part of the affair. At
them I saw two boats, and thought I could discover the `tender' in the
one nighest to us. I asked Radsworth to hand me the glass from the
locker, and opening it, I was satisfied he was in the boat. All around
the frigate were anchored Brazilian vessels of war to the number of
half a score, and some so near each other, that two oared boats could
not pass one another between without trailing their oars. To attempt
to pass under the frigate's stern or across her bow would expose us
most certainly to the observation of the boat tender. There was,
however
,
no time for hesitation. The dark hall of the frigate towered
above us, casting its black shadow nearly towards us, and embracing
us within it. Trusting to the gloom, I said to the rest,
`Pull on, boys! Steer so as to run under her stern, Fairfax. There
is no alternative. If the boat keeper discovers us we must tumble him
into the water and pull for it. Give way, but row as if your oars were
dipped in down.'
We pulled steadily on and steered past the boom unobserved, (the
fellow being asleep no doubt) and direct for the frigate's counter. We
shot in under her guns which overhung us, and then stopped our way
under her stern-room windows. Some one was thruming a guitar
upon
her deck, and we could hear voices in the cabin. The tramp of
the sentry upon the deck, and also upon the gang way plank fell
distinctly
upon our ears. The least imprudence upon our part would have
betrayed us and placed us prisoners on board; and what account could
we give of ourselves? Tell what story we chose, though not one of
us would have concealed the truth had we been taken, I am confident
they soon would have found out from the shore that we were flying
from arrest and were friends to the patriots. There is little doubt but
that we would have been shot or else thrown into the calaboose to lay
till the war was over; for by professing to have an intention of joining
the patriots, we had (though we did not reflect upon it at the time) so
far denationalized ourselves as to place us quite beyond the protection
of the American Consul, or the Government at home. But wisdom
and due discretion are not to be expected of youths of eighteen.
After remaining a few moments under the
friendly
shelter of the
frigate's stern we were satisfied that all was safe yet, and once more
pulled on, Fairfax and I now taking an oar and giving our places to the
others, Bedrick at the helm.
We now moved on past vessel after vessel with the same caution we
had hitherto used. Once we were startled by the barking of a dog on
board an armed schooner, and laying on our oars waited till he was
silent
;
though he was probably barking from some other cause than
consciousness of our vicinity. But we were startled by it not a little.
Still we perseveringly kept on our way, and at length had the
satisfaction
of coming in full view of the guard ship, which was the last ship
in the harbor. This had once been a Spanish line-of-battle ship, but
was now dismantled and moored exactly in the mouth of the
pear-shaped
harbor. The entrance at the best was very narrow; but this huge
hulk lying in the way left but a narrow passage between each
extremity
and the shores for vessels to come in and go out. The shore either
from her bows or stern was within musket shot. On the right or west
side towered the mount itself within half a mile, the guns of its
castle
commanding the entrance; and on the left shore close to the water
and nearly upon a level with it was a formidable battery. The
guard-ship
lying between and showing them three tiers of guns, pointed
inside
and outside the harbor, completed the defences. Every vessel
that entered or went out was challenged from the guard ship, along
side of which numerous armed boats were always held in readiness to
board every suspicious craft. When we came within about two
hundred
yards of this formidable monster of oak and iron, we, with
singular
discretion for us, lay on our oars and deliberately surveyed her
island-like hulk
`This looks like a case, boys,' said Fairfax dryly.
`It looks confoundedly ugly,' responded Radsworth.
`We shall be likely to fetch up here all told,' observed Bedrick with
the sort of devil-me-care air characteristic of him.
`There is nothing like trying to go by her,' said I, after taking in
her formidable outline with the eye, and feeling rather uncomfortable
at the possibility that we might all soon have a view of the filling up!
`We have accomplished more than this,'
`But these fellows in the boats at the booms,' said Bedrick looking
with the glass; `I think if we get by it 'll be with the shaving of our
eye-brows!'
After some debate it was finally resolved to stand in shore on the
Mount side, and hug the beach, and creep by in this manner. When
we had pulled in close to the land, what was our surprise and confusion
on discovering a sentry pacing up and down on the sward. We
backed
water quickly, and then continued to go backwards until his form
was lost in the gloom. We were now hear the guard-ship again.
There was now no alternative but to take the middle course, and if
we were seen to trust to our oars, and escape into the offing. For this
purpose we shipped the two other oars, and all four pulled together.
We passed along like harbor thieves, so noiselessly was our passage.
As we came abreast of the stern of the hull, our bosoms swelled with
the strong emotions of hope and fear, which at such moments of
suspense
irresistably take possession of the human heart.
We moved on and on, and for five minutes I verily believe not one
of us breathed a full breath. We had passed her in safety! We
could see her each moment fading into the darkness. When we knew
that we could no longer be visible from her, we ceased rowing as by
one impulse. I sprung up and waved my hat and cane, and came very
near giving three cheers for our success. But I did not indulge this
exuberant feeling, though we all felt quite mad with joy, and shaking
hands all round congratulated one another upon our achievement. A
the suggestion of Bedrick, the locker was opened, and a bottle of
champagne opened by knocking off the neck against the side of the
boat. We filled bumpers in a tin pot and drank `success to the
Universal
Yankee Nation,' one at the time, for we had but one dipper.
It was now proposed that the sail should be hoisted, as there was a
five knot breeze blowing fair for us. This proposition was well
received
,
for we were pretty well tired of rowing, having been nearly two
hours reaching that point of comparative safety. I say comparatively,
for we were not yet, by any means, safe. There were Brazilian
cruisers
constantly beating about the mouth of the harbor, sometimes
running
in, sometimes standing down the river or stretching up to
communicate
with the blockading squadron. We were, therefore, each
moment in danger of falling into the power of one of these. We,
however, stepped our mast, and, hauling our sheet aft, let the wind
drive us on. We now sailed merrily. All we had to do was to sit
quietly down together in the stern, save one to look out ahead, and
enjoy
our success. We had indeed achieved a remarkable adventure,
having passed safely through a fleet of above two hundred vessels, thirty
of them armed ships and brigs, where on every deck a constant
watch was kept.
We run on for about three miles, our way lighted by the stars, while
the watch lights of the castle on the mount, of the guard-ship, and the
port, were visible far behind us. I was looking out ahead when I saw
looming up before us a large vessel. I soon saw that it was a brig
standing towards us. We doused our mast and sail instantly, and
threw ourselves flat in the bottom of the boat. She passed within fifty
yards of us, and the swell of her wake as she receded violently rocked
us. We rose up to see her disappearing in the distance, not a little
overjoyed at our escape. I took good care to keep a sharper look-out,
and Fairfax lent the aid of his eyes also. At length we discovered a
light close to the water some ways ahead, and took it for that of the
British frigate Doris which we knew lay off here. We stood boldly
on ready to strike our mast (for we had set it again) when we came
near, in case it should prove to be an enemy's light. But as we came
near, we saw the dark form of a large ship at anchor, looming up, and
in a few minutes were satisfied that she was the Doris, by the position
of two lights on board which Captain Conway had described to us as
being marks by which to distinguish her. In five minutes more we
came so nigh as to be discovered from her decks and hailed by the
sentry.
CHAPTER XI.
The Frigate `Doris.'
`
Boat ahoy
! What boat is that?' resounded gruffly over the space
between us and the frigate, before we replied.
`Shore boat!'
`Shore boat come along side!' was the stern command.
There was a light at the same moment passed along the deck to the
gangway, which showed us the sentry pacing his platform outside, and
the forms of two or three persons in the port.
We had already dropped our mast and taken to our oars. The waves
by this time running pretty high, for the wind had increased as we got
outside of the harbor, and we found that without great precaution, we
should be in danger of getting our frail skiff dashed against the lofty
sides of the frigate and swamped. As we came near I stood in the
bows with a short pike and fended off, while Fairfax caught a rope
which a sailor threw over his head. He passed it forward to me, and
in a moment I had secured the end by a double turn about the bow
thwart. Our little boat in the meanwhile, bobbed actively up and down
on the restless chop seas that broke against the frigate.
`Come on deck one of you and let us know your business,' said an
officer looking down upon us, and trying by the aid of a battle lantern
held by a marine, to make us out.
As I was nighest the ladder, I seized the man-rope and ascended to
the gangway port where he stood. I immediately recognized him to
be one of the Doris' officers, to whom I had frequently the honor of
selling many a glass of brandied soda. I called him by name. He
looked closely at me, and then recognizing me said,
`How is this? Why are you off here in an open boat at this time
of night?'
`To escape from the Brazilian authorities,' I answered.
`Why what have you been doing?'
`We got tired of remaining at Montevideo, our original destination
having been Buenos Ayres, and we planned to get out of the city and
join the patriots for want of something better to do. Our plan was
listened to by a spy and reported to the Governor-General, and we got
wind of it in time to make our escape in the boat.'
`And how have you got out of the harbor?'
`By muffled oars and stealing along, and once when we were
challenged
,
we got off by making use of the name of your frigate.'
By this time Fairfax and the others had reached the deck. The
lieutenant shook their hands with a warm welcome, and said that he
was very glad that we had not fallen into the hands of the Portuguese,
`but,' he added, `I fear that we shall not dare to protect you, if the
Brazilian Government should order you to be surrendered.'
`We do not intend to burden you with any responsibility,' answered
Fairfaz; `we have started with the intention of going up to Buenos
Ayres.'
`In that little whale boat?'
`Yes, sir.'
`You know that the river is blockaded, and also thronged with
cruisers
.'
`We are aware of it,' I answered; `but we shall try to get past
them, and trust we shall succeed as well as we have done in getting
out of the harbor, through the fleet and past the forts.'
`This is a bold enterprise, and I fear you will be unable to carry it
through. Wait here a few moments and I will let Sir John know you
are on board, for it may be that he would like to see you. Two of you
men go down and keep their boat from knocking her nose to pieces
against the ship.'
With this he left us and went aft. We stood by the gangway
surrounded
by middies and petty officers and seamen, who had gathered
at the spot to hear our story. They asked us innumerable questions,
and being well aware from experience of the vigilance preserved in the
port, they could hardly believe that we had succeeded in coming out
undetected. But there we stood, and there along side, danced our
little
bark in attestation.
At length the lieutenant returned, and said, that Sir John Sinclair
would like to see us in the cabin.
Upon entering the cabin we found the English Captain seated in an
arm-chair wrapped in a silk brocade dressing gown, and his feet thrust
into yellow slippers.
`So these are the four young Americans who have run away from
Montevideo, and are going to try and break the blockade?' he said
looking
at us and then addressing his lieutenant. `Sit down, sit down,
young gentlemen,' he added in a kind cordial manner. `Tim get the
wine and glasses; they must feel like taking something after their long
tug out! So my brave fellows,' he said turning to us, `so you took a
fancy to join the patriots?'
`Yes, sir,' answered Rsdsworth, on whom his eye fell as he put the
question.
`That is just like you, Jonathans all the world over. You drink in
love of republics, and hatred of kings and emperors with your mother's
milk. But if you wished to join the army outside you should have
been more cautious. It seems you were overheard making your plans,
and an order was sent for your arrest as enemies and traitors to the
Government?'
`Yes, Sir John,' answered Fairfax. `We learned it through an
American Captain, who aided us in getting on board his vessel after
nine o'clock; and there we obtained the boat with which we escaped
out of the harbor!'
`A whale boat?'
`Yes, Sir John
`And you have managed to come through the whole harbor fleet and
pass the guard-ship and forts in safety?'
`We came with great caution,' I answered, `having our oars muffled
and one to keep look out while two others rowed and one steered.
We had several hair-breadth escapes; and once was challenged, but
we promptly answered `Doris,' and so passed as your gig.'
`That was well donecapitally done! You are a set of brave
fellows
!
How in the dence you run the gauntlet of so many armed
ships I can't imagine!'
`We repeatedly struck their cables,' I replied; `and once aroused
a dog on board of one, but we pulled under the bows and lay
concealed
until all was still again. Several vessels were passed by pulling
directly
under their taffrails; we found it safer to hug them close than
to keep out at a distance where we might be seen!'
`You did, eh? By St. George, you made your calculations and
carried
through your parts like veterans. But why do you wish to go over
to the patriots? Are you mere adventurers? You do not look like
such!'
`We were passengers in a Boston brig bound to Buenos Ayres,'
answered
Fairfax; `whither we were going for the purpose of being
clerks. We were brought to, and carried into Montevideo. There
we have turned our hand to keeping a soda-shop; but as we had no
desire to make this our profession, we resolved to leave the city and
join the patriots in hopes that we should be able to achieve something
worthier our ambition. It was while we were discussing this subject
and proposing means to get out of the city, that we were overheard;
and but for the friendly aid of an American Captain, who got
intelligence
of the kind intentions of the Governor-General towards us, we
should now be in the calaboose instead of on board your ship!'
`Well, I am glad to welcome you! But if you will take my advice
you will not think of attempting to reach the blockaded city, an
enterprize
which my lieutenant informs me you have in contemplation.
You will be sure to be captured, and then a sovereign to a sous you
would be shot!'
`There is no alternative,' Sir John,' I answered. `The same good
fortune that has favored us to-night, I am persuaded will continue with
us. We can not compromise you with the Brazilian Government by
making your frigate an asylum. There are no vessels going to the
United States, in which we could take passage. Besides, we have come
to South America in the hope of making our fortunes; and as the war
has placed us in the position we are now in, we are ready to avail
ourselves
of the war to see what it will do in our favor. We know that
promotion is rapid in the Patriot service, and that four young
Americans
will be a welcome arrival! We propose two of us on reaching
Buenos Ayres, to join their navy, and the remaining two take the field
with the army!'
`And this is your settled purpose, young gentlemen?' said Sir John.
`Yes, sir,' was our almost unanimous reply.
`Well, then you must take your own way. But you are to
encounter
great risks. None but a set of infernal young Yankees would ever
think of embarking upon an expedition of this kind. If you will
go, Heaven prosper the bold and the brave! What is it you have come
outside in?'
`An eighteen foot whale boat, Sir John,' responded the lieutenant.
`And in this shell you hope to reach Buenos Ayres alive! It is like
a voyage at sea. You know the distance is one hundred and fifty miles
or thereabouts, and that the river is in some parts fifty feet wide. The
pamperos sometimes toss up a sea that your boat would not live in
three minutes.'
`We must risk all these dangers, sir,' said Bedrick resolutely.
`Well, then, young men, if you will, I will do my best to fit you out.
Mr. Colverton,' he said to the lieutenant, `have a compass and chart
of the river put into their boat, and if you can spare a spy-glass let
them have one. It will enable them to make out enemies at a distance
and run in shore to avoid them.'
`We thank you kindly, Sir John,' said I, `but through the care of
the American Coptain, we are provided with all these.'
`The dence you are. Have you beef and bread?'
`Plenty, sir.'
`I'll lay a wager you haven't champagne at least.'
`We had a dozen when we left port, but we opened one to celebrate
our safe passage by the guard-ship.'
`Well, another dozen won't come amiss. Have it sent into the boat
and a demijohn of French brandy. Are any of you acquainted with
the river?'
`None of us,' I answered.'
`Then I will lend you a couple of my men. They will assist you
in managing the boat and otherwise be of service.'
We thanked the obliging Englishman for his kind offers, but begged
leave respectfully to decline them, saying that any more would
encumber
the boat, which was full narrow enough quarters as it was; and
that if we got into any difficulty we preferred to share it alone rather
than involve others in it.'
`Well, you are a generous and brave party of young men and
deserve
success, and I hope you will attain it. Let me give you some
directions as to your course. When do you wish to set out?'
`Each moment is of importance to us, Sir John, said I, `as we are
desirous of getting past the blockading squadron before daylight.'
`The deuce you do! Why you talk as if getting by was the easiest
thing in the world. Do you know that the Imperial fleet occupy the
whole breadth of the river, and are anchored within gun-shot of each
other. A shark couldn't go by without his fin being seen.'
`We shall try and keep equi-distant between two of the vessels and
dropping our sails pull with muffled oars,' answered Radsworth.
`Well, I perceive, that you need no advice of mine. You can get
along very well of your own wits, from what I see. But I would
advise
you to keep in with the northern shore for a hundred miles (if you
get safely by the fleet, that is) until you approach Colonia, a town and
fortress opposite Buenos Ayres, which is thirty miles across the river
from it. Colonia is in the hands of the Brazilians, as well as all the
North shore between Montevideo and Colonia. But there is no towns
or settled places between. Before you get to Colonia, I would
recommend
you to strike across to the South shore of the river towards
Buenos Ayres.'
We thanked Sir John Sinclair for his directions and expressed our
grateful sense of his kind interest in our welfare. We then joined him
in a glass of wine, in which he drank to our success. He then shook
us all heartily by the hand, and bade us good-bye and a safe
expedition
.
We then left him and followed the lieutenant upon deck where
we took leave of him and the other officers who crowded about the
gang-way port. They gave us their best wishes, and the lieutenant
said that he should go into town early in the morning, when he would
report our arrival so far, to our friends, especially to Captain Conway.
Two men were tending the boat, which otherwise would have been
dashed to pieces against the frigate's side. They had stepped our mast
for us and reefed our sail, as the wind blew quite hard. After we had
got into the little dancing affair, and secured a footing, we thanked the
men and told them to `let her go!' I took the helm, while Fairfax
hauled aft the sheet and secured it by a turn under the thwart, for we
had no belaying pins. Radsworth and Bedrick took a position forward
to look out.
The instant the two men sprung out of her to the ladder, the little
boat darted away like an arrow shot from a bow, and in five minutes
we had run the frigate out of sight.
CHAPTER XII.
The Fleet.
The
very brief space of time in which we had dropped the frigate
into the darkness, showed us the velocity with which we were
scudding
along. The waves ran alarmingly high, and sometimes broke
over the bow, but we actively baled out the water, and let her jump
`with the bit in her teeth!'
I have said that the river at Montevideo is about sixty miles across
from shore to shore, and gradually lessening in breadth for one
hundred
and twenty-five miles to Buenos Ayres, where it is but thirty miles
wide. It is indeed, like a huge bay, not dissimilar to the Deleware in
shape and dimensions. In depth of water, however, it is very
opposite
to this bay; the La Plata River being so shallow throughout its
whole breadth and length, that ships can anchor in any part of it with
a few fathoms of cable out of sight of the shores on either side.
The Brazilian blockading squadron taking advantage of this
shallowness
of the river, had very comfortably anchored in a line, from shore
to shore, there being vessels enough to form an unbroken chain of
sixty
miles, the space between each vessel being about a mile and a
quarter
that
is, within point blank range of any thing that might try to
pass between them.
The fixed squadron remained from day to day, with its sails furled
and with nothing to do but to keep watch that nothing went up the
river
past them. It had also videttes in the shapes of schooners and
gunbrigs
in advance that boldly sailed up the river within sight of Buenos
Ayres, off which in the outer roads, Admiral Brown's fleet was getting
ready to make a descent to force the blockade. Cruisers also scoured
the river below the blockading fleet quite to the mouth of the river, to
look after vessels coming in and politely informing them of the
blockade
,
escort them into Montevideo.
We were fully acquainted with all these circumstances before we left
Montevideo and well knew the risks we had to run. But our minds
were thoroughly made up to go through with what we had began
without
fear or shrinking.
In less than twenty minutes after we had run the frigate out of sight
the dark outline of the castillated mount had disappeared in the
darkness
,
and around us was visible only the wide expanse of water and
the starry skies over our heads. The wind blew very fresh, and our
little skiff waltzed to its hoarse music from wave to wave with the
lightness
of a feather. The white caps rose around us and high as our
heads, and sometimes; owing to the unskillful management of the
helmsman tumbled aboard of us, half deluging the boat. We threw
out the water again with our buckets aud let her drive through a
constant
shower of spray that wetted us to the skin. We were only
anxious
about our powder, which, however, were well packed away in the
locker, the little door of which we defended by our jackets so that no
water could enter.
As we could see no land, and the Northern star was not visible in
the Southern firmament to show us our course, we, at length, struck a
light and lighted our dark lantern. By its aid, we not only were
enabled
to look at the compass which told us we were steering a West
course, our proper one, but also to ascertain what hour of the night it
was. Fairfix boasting the possession of a silver watch, we found it was
ten minutes to four.
`We must be pretty well up wish the fleet,' said Fairfax, as he
replaced
his watch; `it is an hour and a half since we left the frigate.
This wind ought to drive us along eight knots, for if it blew a thimble
full harder, it would drive us under. Let us keep a sharp look-out
ahead, boys!'
And a sharp look-out we did keep. Three of us gave ourselves to
this duty, one at the bows, and the others on each side. We were
apprehensive
of falling aboard some gun-boat or schooner acting as
tenders
to the fleet, and while we let the skiff canter along the waves we
kept our eyes busily watching the surface of the river, and the horizon.
At length, I being in the bows and keeping a sharp look-out thought
I detected a break in the dim line of the horizon ahead. After
watching
it sharply, I was satisfied that some object was before us and not
very far distant.
`Let go the halyards,' I cried, `we are right aboard something or
other.'
Fairfax whose duty it was to tend the main-sheet, let it go flying at
the same moment that Radsworth slipped the halyards from the thwart
around which they were made fast. Down came our little sail by the
run, for it had halyards as well as brails, and the next moment a
lugger-rigged
gun-brig hove in full sight out of the darkness.
`Down, lay close!' I cried as she came dashing on seemingly right
before us. We had no alternatives, but to get run down or be taken
prisoners. Bedrick, with great presence of mind unstepped the mast
and threw it into the bottom of the boat, nearly breaking my head with
it as it fell. We then crouched so closely that nothing could be seen
of us, though we could look out upon the enemy. The lugger came
on and tumbled past us within seventy feet. We could see that she
had a good many men in her, and their voices reached us distinctly.
We trembled lest we should be discovered. Our hearts, at least mine,
was in my mouth, till I saw the lugger's stern, and beheld her rapidly
fade away in the darkness.
We now took a long breath, and sprung to our feet with mutual
congratulations
upon our narrow escape-
We now took a careful look out ahead, to see that there was no more
coming, and then once more hoisted our little sail and dashed onward
upon our course.
`That was one of the infernal Portuguese gun-boats that carry forty
men,' at length said Fairfax. `If we had been seen we should have
been taken, unless we fought for it!'
We all spurned indignantly at the idea of suffering ourselves to be
captured, either by gun-boat or gun-brig, and renewed our resolutions
made to Captain Conway that we would die before we would
surrender
to a Brazilian vessel.
We now sailed on with all our eyes open and watching sharply for
any thing else that might heave in sight. We calculated ourselves to
be nearly up with the squadron which was but fifteen miles above the
port out of which we had run the gauntlet.
Silently we drove on, eagerly intent upon the discovery of the first
vessel, when Bedrick electrified us by calling out,
`A light, a light!'
Scarcely had he got the words out of his lips, when I discovered
another
,
and Radsworth repeated the cry from his side of the look-out.
There were three lights in a range just ahead of us. They were as
dim as the faint fire-tip of a cigar, but they at once indicated to us the
position of the fleet. In a moment afterwards two more lights were
made, and in a range with the other three.
`There is the fleet, sure enough,' said Radsworth with great
animation
.
`Yes; they are the lights on board the anchored vessels,' I
answered
with joy at having at length come in view of the long-wished for
squadron.
We were all excited and exalted by the sight, and felt like giving
vent to our excess of spirits in a right down Yankee hurrah. But we
restrained the impulse with that discreet caution which the reader will
see hitherto governed our proceedings. The lights seemed to be about
half a mile apart, at the distance we discovered them, and at about
equal distances from each other. Two of them were much lighter
than the others; and these pronounced to be on board the two frigates,
one of which carried Admiral Lobo's flag, and which we were told by
Captain Conway would lay nearly in range of our course. After a
short consultation as to the most likely way to pass through the
squadron
in safety and unseen, we at length decided to run between the two
frigates and steer as near to the middle ground as we could, which
would make us within half a mile of each. We knew that the officers
on board would be likely to sweep the water around constantly with
night-glasses, and that any vessel of any size would unquestionably be
discovered. But we trusted in the insignificance of our craft to pass
through the fleet wtth impunity.
`It would take sharper eyes and better glasses than the Brazilians
have to see us half a mile off with our mast and sail down,' said
Radsworth
.
`I do not fear them!'
`The main danger is,' said I, `of falling in with any boats crossing
from vessel to vessel.'
`We must risk that,' said Fairfax, `and if they trouble us we must
fight 'em, we gain fast upon the lights.'
`Yes, I can make out the outline of two of the vessels,' said I.
`They can't be more than a mile distant.'
`Then it is time we douse sail and mast and take to our oars,
fellows
,'
said Bedrick.
We run on a few minutes further, until we could clearly make out
the spars of the nearest vessels and then dropped our mast and sail and
took to the oars. Fairfax kept the helm, it being his hour to steer, for
we took turns at each duty. I took the starboard oar, and Radsworth
the larboard, while Bedrick took the lookout; but for that matter we
all looked out, for it was a critical time with us; for if we could pass
the fleet in safety we had the river all before us with no danger to
apprehend save from the
videttes
that might be cruising above to watch
the movements, or rather the preparations of the patriot squadron; for
it had just reached Admiral Lobo's ears that Commodore Brown of
the Buenos Ayrean navy had sworn he would break through the
blockading
squadron before thirty days had passed.
The two vessels of war which we had selected to pass between, grew
larger and more distinct to the eye as we advaneed. We were
perfectly
still, and our oars being muffled made no noise. We were aware
that very faint sounds are heard at great distances upon the water, and
that any discretion on our part might betray our presence to the ears
of our enemies if not to their eyes. We had some misgivings that we
also might be seen; for we were well aware that men were stationed
aloft to scrutinize the surrounding water, and that their eyes
accustomed
to the duty could detect objects at a great distance. Still we
had hope and courage, and trusted to the good fortune which had thus
far attended us.
We rowed steadily on, now watching this vessel now glancing sus
piciously at that. Gradually we drew near and lost the lights in the
stern and got sight of the stationary battle-lanterns gleaming through
the ports. We were now
between
them. Both were distinctly visible
and so large in size that they seemed much nearer to us than they really
were.
`Steady pull, boys,' said Fairfax in a low voice. `We are right
abeam now and they have not seen us yet. Lay low and give it to her.'
`Hark! what is that?' cried Radsworth as a distant cry startled us
as it was borne wildly to us across the water.
`It is the sentinel's call of `all's well,' said I, recognizing gladly the
tones, which at first I had feared was an alarm.
`We are safe, yet, boys!' cried Fairfax. `Paul take the helm, and
Bill and I will relieve you and Radsworth.'
The change was silently and gladly made by us, for we had pulled
nearly a mile very hard, and were rejoiced to have a relief. We now
kept steadily on forging each moment ahead of the two vessels which
were anchored bows up stream, and at length we had the satisfaction
of looking behind us to see them.
We pulled on for about half a mile without stopping, and then
seeing
the ships just blent with the haze of night and scarcely
discernable
,
we ceased rowing and shook hands all round with warm
congratulations
;
and it being moved and carried that we should open a bottle
of champagne on the occasion, we forthwith took one from the locker,
and in a tin cup drank the following classical sentiment:-
`Hurrah for Yankee-land and confound the Portuguese squadron.'
It was not drank standing, for our boat knocked about so like an
egg-shell tossed in a whirlpool we could not keep our legs long enough.
We, however, honored it with three hearty cheers which our
enthusiasm
would no longer suffer us to forego.
Having emptied our bottle of champagne we stepped our mast, set
our sail, and giving the little craft which had done her duty so well, to
the influence of the winds, we in a few moments left the blockading
squadron out of vision, save one faint, distant glimmer of a light upon
the deck of Lobo's frigate.
The morning twilight now began to light up scarce perceptibly the
Eastern heavens, and gradually the night became gray, and the line of
the watery horizon was defined against the sky. We now began to
feel anxious lest we should not get out of sight of the squadron astern
before day should break. We, therefore, carefully trimmed our boat,
and swelled the threads of the canvass by casting water upon it to
make it hold the wind better, and thus having done all in our power for
safety, we seated ourselves in the stern of the boat and quietly left the
issue to Providence.
CHAPTER XIII.
The Voyage.
As the morning dawned we watched the horizon around us with the
closest scrutiny. At length we could discern the land on our right,
(the northern shore of the river,) about eight miles distant. It had at
first the appearance of a long black cloud, low upon the horizon; but
as the light of day grew stronger, we could see clumps of trees defined
upon it, and in one place was a whitish spot, which we took to be a
house.
The day at length commenced, and the sky over us began to be
flushed with crimson. We could now look around us, and see
whatever
was upon the water within the circle of the horizon. Our first
search was for the ship of the blockading squadron, which we could
just discover like a black spec full three leagues down the river.
South and west of us all was clearnot a boat or vessel was in sight.
We had the river, as far as we could see above us, all to ourselves.
The sun now rose and enlivened us with his beams and made us
feel cheerful. We had every reason to be in high spiritswe had met
with the most triumphant success, and left the fleet of the enemy far
astern. A hundred miles above us, or a little more, was the city of
Buenos Ayres, though on the southern shore. If we fell in with no
Brazilian cruisers in this hundred miles, we should be at the blockaded
port in safety.
`Now, fellows,' said Radsworth, rubbing his hands as the sun sent
his bright rays aslant the water; `what do you think of running the
gauntlet, hey? Don't you say that we are four of the luckiest fellows
in the world?'
`If I had time,' said Fairfax, `I would propose we went back and
take breakfast with old Lobo.'
`Talking of breakfast reminds me of our salt beef and biscuit,' said
I; `suppose we set the table and breakfast on board our own craft.
What with rowing and the night air I feel as hungry as seven men.'
`I second the proposition,' said Fairfax. `Gentlemen, suppose we
omit the table-cloth for this morning, seeing they are gone to be
washed
;
the first frigate we take we'll lay in a supply of clean ones.'
`I am not particular,' said Bedrick. `We will supply ourselves
with silver forks also then; but we must carve and eat with our sabres
for what I see.'
`I wonder,' said I, `how the old man breakfasts this morning? I
should n't wonder if he had lost his appetite.'
`He has certainly lost four first rate appetites,' said Fairfax, cutting
off a huge slice of corned beef with a jack-knife and thrusting it into
his jaws.
At this we all laughed heartily; and thus in the merriest mood
possible
we breakfasted. Besides the beef and cold ham, we had
ship-bread
,
and some bottles of ale, with which we washed down the beef
and hard-tack. I never ate a heartier breakfast in my life: and the
others were very positive that they never had. While we were eating
we let the skiff drive on with a flowing sheet, it requiring only a little
attention now and then at the helm, between our mouthfuls, to keep
her steady on her course.
`Now if we had cigars,' said Bedrick, as we carefully put away the
remains of the breakfast into the locker; `we should feel like
aldermen
!'
Cigars, however, were a luxury to be denied to us, and we bore the
deprivation like philosophers. As we had been awake all night it was
now proposed that we should divide ourselves into two watches, of four
hours each, so that we all might have a chance to sleep. Lots were
drawn, and the first watch fell to Fairfax and myself. The other two
then rolled themselves up into a knot and coiled away, one forward
and the other in the centre of the boat, to take a nap. In a few
minutes
they were fast asleep, rocked by the cradling motion of the waves.
The wind had lulled as the sun rose, and by the time we had got
through our breakfast, it blew very gently from the south-east. The
skies were clear and the waves gradually fell, till the river by and by
became as smooth as a lake. We moved pleasantly along within three
leagues of the shore, at about four knots, while our `watch below'
slept, and part of the time caught ourselves napping.
The shores, which I examined with the spy-glass, presented only a
barren ridge sloping to the water, and here and there diversified by a
ravine or clump of low wild peach trees. No signs of habitation were
apparent. In one instance I saw a drove of wild horses, that covered
full an acre of ground, galloping along the ridge-slope for a while, and
then disappearing over the verge towards the interior. The prospect
was barren and uninviting. The line of the shore was nearly straight,
with scarcely an indenture for serveral miles. We compared our
observations
with our chart, and at length discovering, some distance up
the river, a projection like a cape, we found on looking for it in the
chart that we were forty miles above Montevideo. This was about ten
o'clock in the forenoona pretty good run since twelve o'clock the
night before, all the circumstances taken into consideration.
Our `watch below' were waked at twelve o'clock, just after we had
passed the point above mentioned. They had slept without stirring
hand or foot for four hours. They waked heavily at first, but were
soon made to understand where they were and what was wanted of
them. The first thing they did was to look sharply all about to see if
any enemy was in sight; and they did so with such eagerness and
suspicion
that, sleepy as
we
were, we could not help laughing.
I now proposed that we should dine before going to sleep; this was
seconded and carried. Our dinner was corned beef and hard-tack, like
our breakfast, but instead of beer was washed down with champagne.
Fairfax and I now coiled ourselves up in the bottom of the boat, and in
three minutes were both in oblivion.
At four o'clock we were called out, and found to our regret that we
had been laying almost becalmed, and that the watch had rowed two
hours out of their four. We had, however, gained six miles, which
was something. We now all four took to the oars, and began to pull
vigorously up the river, for there was not a breath of air. We were
desirous of getting as soon as possible out of the neighborhood of the
blockading squadron and their cruisers; and we were aware that the
farther we ascended the less likely we were to fall in with them.
The shores along which we pulled, and towards which we had
gradually
approached till we were within four miles of them, still presented
no feature of cultivation or of inhabitants. The whole coast was a
black sun-burnt ridge, with here and there a patch of stunted trees.
Our chart showed us no inhabited spot until we should come to
Colonia
,
a fort and small town, directly opposite to which was Buenos Ayres.
But as Colonia, with all the shore on this side of the river, was in the
possession of Brazil, we had no intention of going up so high before
crossing over; we also deemed it best to keep a good offing, as possibly
there might be parties of the enemy on the land provided with boats.
We might have crossed the river where we were, but as it was fifty
miles wide there, and
pamperos
often came up suddenly, in which our
boat could not have lived, we thought it best to hug the Bonda Oriental
shore until we came near Colonia, where, the river being but two
leagues across, we might run less danger.
We now kept our glasses constantly sweeping the horizon, seaward
and landward, and up the river, scanning the shore and the offing with
the closest scrutiny. If we were seen by any cruiser, we felt quite
sure of being chased; and to render our skiff a less prominent object,
we began to discuss the expediency of keeping our mast and sail down
while daylight lasted, and sailing only at night. But in this we were
divided, as rowing all day was not by any means desirable or pleasant.
There was, however, no wind at present. As the sun drew towards the
west the night breeze began to blow in from the sea, at first gently.
We hailed its approach for its refreshing influence, as well as a relief to
our rowing. We again put it to vote whether to hoist sail or not, and
we decided to make sail and run as long as we could in safety, but to
keep a good look-out all around.
`We shall be sure to see any vessel before it can discover us,' said
Fairfax; `they will loom up so much larger than ourselves; and if we
douse sail at once and keep low or pull in shore we shall escape.'
We therefore hoisted sail, and once more glided smoothly along.
The sun was about half an hour high. Nothing was visible but sky
and water, and the strip of barren coast, parallel with which we were
steering. I had the helm and Fairfax the look-out, while the other
two were seated amidships dozing, for they had not slept since noon.
I had just taken the glass and swept the horizon outside, but seeing
nothing was about to lay it down, when it occurred to me that I would
look in shore, from which we were about three and a half miles. I
levelled the glass and slowly swept the line of beach, when, at the
mouth of a ravine, I discovered a large boat or lugger with two masts.
I could hardly credity my eyes, but after exnmining closely I was
convinced
that it was no delusion, and what was more, that it contained
men, while others were ashore.
`Fairfax,' said I, `take the glass and look at that dark hollow in
shore, and see what you can discover.'
He came aft and took the spy-glass, and the next instant cried out
aloud,
`Portuguese, by Heaven!'
The exclamation roused our two dozers, and springing to their feet
bewildered, they gazed wildly round, and cried,`Where? where?'
One of them at the same time grasped a pistol and the other seized a
sabre. We laughed at their alarm, and then cautioning them to be
silent
and keep collected, we gave them the spy-glass and showed them
the enemy.
`They are skinning cattlet,' said Bedrick; `it is a gun-boat that has
run in there for fresh provisions. Boys, we must douse sail and take
to the oars, and pull dead out into the river.'
The mast was struck instantly, and we seized our oars and began to
run away from the land. After pulling about ten minutes at a hard
rate, I took the spy-glass and levelled it at the land. To my dismay I
saw that the lugger was in motion towards us, pulled by at least six
sweeps on a side.
`Now, boys,' said I, `we must run for it; it is neck or nothing
Portuguee and Yankee! They have seen us, and put off after us with
as many legs as a centipede!'
Each one took the glass in turn to satisfy himself, and then we took
off our jackets and began to pull like club-oarsmen racing for a
silver
cup. The sun was now about a quarter of an hour high; it
seemed
to me it would never go downfor on the darkness depended our
escape; for in a dead pull in daylight the lugger was sure to have the
best of it, for we should by and by have to give in for want of wind.
We watched the slow sun with the most anxious eyesyet there was
no signs of fear on any facewe were cool and firm: yet we were by
no means solicitous to be any nearer the gun-boat than we were!
`For my part,' said Radsworth, as he kept his eyes fixed on the sun,
`I can't conceive what Joshua wanted it to stand still for
I
would
give a bag of dollars, if I had it, if it would take a dive and disappear.
If it should stand still now where it is, we should have to fight or be
taken and shot.'
The sun at length went down, and as it disappeared we shouted and
bent with more energy to our oars. The little skiff fairly jumped
beneath
our efforts, and in truth all the life we had in us we lent her.
The lugger gained perceptibly, but the twilight was as rapidly
deepening
into night.We began to gain confidence.
`I wonder,' said I, `if that lugger does n't carry a long Tom? If
she does we are likely to have a game at bowls with herwe playing
the part of the nine pins.'
Hardly had the words fallen from my mouth when a flash lighted up
the dusk; the next instant a rushing was heard in the air above us,
and then a splashing in the water beyond us, and then the deep roar of
the gun upon our ears. For a moment we were appalled.
`Let us up sail and drive her,' I cried; `they can't do more than sink
us, and they have seen us already as plain as they can.'
The mast was stepped, the sail hoisted, and away we went scudding
before a six-knot breeze, the starboard gunwale dipping under water.
CHAPTER XIV.
An Adventure.
How anxiously we watched the progress of darkness over sky and
water! Night alone could save us! The dark form of the lugger
could be seen nearer and nearer, her sails hoisted and oars flying in
eager pursuit. It may be regarded as surprising that a small whale
boat, scarcely visible to them, should have been deemed an object
worthy of pursuit; but when the rigid character of the blockade is
taken into consideration, in reference to which every object upon the
river was taken notice of, this surprise will be removed. Lobo would
have stopped a carrier-pigeon if he could have done so!
Slowly, oh! how slowly the darkness came on! The masts of the
lugger faded fast from view, and then gradually the dark mass of her
hull was blended with the haze of night. When, at length, she was
no longer visible, our hearts beat freer; yet each instant we watched
for the flash which should send another shot after us.
`Now that she can no longer see us,' said Radsworth, who had the
helm, `suppose we tack and stand towards the shore, so as to reach it
higher up. They will probably keep straight on this way, and by
tacking
and running in shore we shall be likely to get them off the scent.'
This suggestion was unanimously approved of, and the next minute
we had put the helm hard up, and were running for the shore, which
was about seven miles distant. We were as silent as possible; not a
word was spoken above a whisper. Our little skiff pranced on like a
well-trained steed, dashing from her prow the foaming waters. We
kept up the river obliquely towards the land, so as to give the lugger as
wide a berth as possible. After we had run on this course about ten
minutes, closely scanning the darkness to windward to see if we
could discern our enemy, we were startled by a flash not a quarter
of a mile abeam of us, which showed us for an instant all the
proportions
of the gun-boat. To our great joy we saw that she was standing
straight upon our former course, and firing in the direction she
supposed
we were.
`She will run her nose against the south shore if she keeps on long
enough,' said Fairfax. `What an escape we have made!boys,
fortune
favors us, there is no mistake!'
The report of the gun sounded like closely exploding thunder to
our ears, she was so near us; but it did not alarm uswe saw that we
had eluded her by our ruse, and that so long as she kept on that tack
and we on ours we could laugh at her. Each moment the space
between us was widening, and when, fifteen minutes afterwards, she
fired again, we could but just detect the distant, dull report, at least
three miles off.
There was cause for mutual congratulations at defeating her, and
we expressed our satisfaction in very exulting words. We did not,
however, intermit our vigilance; we knew that we had a dangerous
enemy in our neighborhood, and that, though darkness now befriended
us, daylight might reveal us to them, or to some other.
`She will be sure to tack before she runs on another hour,' said
Bedrick; `and then we shall run a chance of falling in with her.
Suppose we pull about now dead before the wind, and stick her nose
up river? We shall be able to run her out of sight by daylight.'
This suggestion was adopted, and just as we came within sight of
the dark line of the shore, we cast the sheet free and sailed merrily
along parallel with the coast.
`There goes another gun,' cried Radsworth, who was looking in
the direction of the lugger's course; `but the flash is as faint as the
report.'
`She is full six miles off,' answered Fairfax; `we have fully done
her brown!'
`Don't be too sauguine,' said Bedrick; `we may find two for this
one before we go far up the river.'
`It is our determination to fight to the last, is it not, boys?' said I.
`Yes!' was the unanimous reply, `we will not be taken alive!'
And in this purpose we were all thoroughly determined. Our
situation
was each moment one of the most imminent peril, yet we kept
up good spirits and firm courage, and had but one heart and one mind.
I have no doubt that if the lugger had come up with us, we should
have fought to desperation before yielding. We were well armed, and
like most youths, perfectly fearless;yet, as the reader will have
noticed
,
our reckless daring was tempered by prudence and discretion.
At length we could neither see nor hear any thing more of the
lugger
,
and having taken a tin cup of champagne all roundfor we had
nothing else to drink save ale and the rum-waterwe set the watch
for the night. Fairfax and I had the first `watch below,' and coiling
ourselves up between the thwarts, we were soon oblivious.
I had slept about three hours when I was awakend by Bedrick
calling
,
in a hushed tone,
`Fellows, up quickly!'
`What is it?' I cried, grasping my cutlass and gazing round.
To my surprise I found we were lying becalmed within a hundred
yards of the shore, which hung its dark shadow over us. We seemed
to be in a small cave, for land was all around us except on one side.
`Where are we? What place is this?' asked Fairfax and I in
surprise
.
`The wind went down an hour ago, and we had to take to the oars,'
answered Radsworth; `and coming up with a point of land which
jutted
far out into the river, we found this cave and pulled into it to rest,
and dropped the keeleg. We thought we wouldn't call you till your
four hours were out.'
`And not now,' chimed in Bedrick, `but we have been listening the
last quarter of an hour to the most infernal howls from the shore that
mortal ever heard. They have been growing louder and nearer, till
just as I waked you we were saluted by a yell from the beach as if
we had been hailed by a hyena. There it is again!'
And there it was, sure enough! Such a howlso wild, so fierce
and fiendishnever saluted my ears. My blood ran cold in my veins.
`What under heavens can it be?' cried Fairfax in amazement.
`That is more than I know,' answered Bedrick. `Hear that again!'
`The scream was repeated, followed by a crackling in the bushes
and a splash in the water, as if a horse had plunged in. Then came
the dashing noise of swimming, as if some huge animal was making
his way towards us. I sprang to the locker and took out four or five
pistols and handed them to my companions. Our sabres were also
taken in hand, and thus armed we stood awaiting the coming of the
foe. I believed it to be a wild horse, but Fairfax was very positive it
was a panther or hyena. We stood awaiting him calmly; I
remembered
then having read of a traveller in India whose boat had been
attacked
by a tiger and overset; I thought we might have some such
enemy, and cautioned my friends. Nearer and nearer came the
monster
;
the splashing of his passage was tremendous. We could hear
his heavy panting, and then two glaring balls of fire emerged from the
darkness.
`It is a panther,' I cried. `When he comes within ten feet of us
let us fire!'
Coolly and firmly we awaited his approach. We would gladly have
taken to our oars and pulled out of his wayfor his visit was by no
means welcomebut this course was from the first too late, as he
swam very rapidly, giving us no time to do more than seize our arms
and prepare to defend our boat as well as we could.
When about ten feet from us we made out his head and shoulders
and white breast with distinctness; his eyes seemed to emit a
phos-phorescent
fire. By one impulse, with the eager cry, `Now let him,
have it!' we discharged our pistols at his head.
The report of five pistols (for Bedrick blazed away with two,) and
the smoke for a moment confused us. No cry or sound of pain
followed
the furious volley, and not seeing him when we looked we
believed
we had finished the monster, and that he had sunk lifeless
without
a struggle. But our respite was but brief. A splash and an
excrutiating
yell, like the screaming of a gigantic file, heard behind us,
told us that the fight had but just began. He had dived at the flash of
our pistols, and risen on the other side of the boat, and within six feet
of it. Before we could recover fully from our astonishment, he had
floundered towards the boat and flung his huge paw over the gunwale.
The weight of his huge bulk at once caused the boat to begin to take
in water, while we shouted to each other to keep on the upper side.
We were not idle withal: Radsworth and I seized our cutlasses, and
at the same moment brought them down upon the monster's paw with
all our strength. He opened his tremendous jaws, showing double
rows of glittering sharp teeth, and from the cavernous depths of his
throat there issued a sound that has no likeness on earth save to itself,
a compound of a locomotive whistle, the bellowing of a mad bull,
and the letting off steam from the escape-pipe of a high-pressure
engine
.
Perhaps what is called an `Arkansaw yell' might come near to
it. The paw was pulled back bleeding and dangling by the tendrons,
and the panther, thinking he had enough of our quality, turned away
and began paddling for the shore, every two or three seconds on his
retreat uttering a sharp cry of pain.
We did not fire after him, for we felt no disposition to goad a
discomfited
foe, and were glad enough to get rid of him on his own terms.
We listened until he reached the shore, and heard him for some time
afterwards cracking the dry brush as he limped over it, ever and anon
lifting up his voice in a shrill cry of suffering. We could not but feel
pity for the poor fellow, who had doubtless been attracted by the smell
of our larder, and had paid us a visit to take a cold bite. The animal
was doubtless one of the Paraguay panthers, a very fierce and
courageous
animal, and formidable to the Quacho hunters, whom he
sometimes
overthrows, horse and rider.
We felt thankful for our escape, and consulting upon our situation
and prospects we finally came to the conclusionespecially as we
heard a good deal of stir upon the shore, as if a new attack was
contemplated
by the panther's kindredthat it would be best to pull up
the river without waiting for a wind, and keeping at least half a mile
from the shore. We were apprehensive too that the firing of our
pistols
might bring upon us enemies quite as dangerous as the panther,
either from passing cruisers or parties of Quachos upon the land.
So we hoisted in our keeleg, and taking our oars pulled out of the
cove and so up along the shore. The stars shone brightly, the air was
pure and soft, and the river perfectly smooth. We pulled on till past
midnight, when the wind began to blow gently from the land, and we
spread our sail to it gladly, for we were no friends to rowing. We had
hardly got our sail set, and taken our seats astern began to talk over
the affair we had had with the panther, and to promise that we would
serve in the same way any of the Portuguese that should dare to board
us, (the considerate reader must allow something for the boastings of
youths under nineteen!) when we were all taken by surprise by
discovering
a large vessel within a cable's length of us to leeward. She
was so near that we all discovered her at the same moment, and should
have done so much sooner but for the intervention of our sail.
Not a word was uttered; the sheet was cast loose; we sprung to
the mast and unshipping it dropped it flat into the boat, and then threw
ourselves at length upon our backs, so as to show as little surface above
the water as possible. Our eyes, however, were at liberty. The
vessel
was a large gun-brig under top-gallant sails, and standing down the
river. She passed us within pistol shot without seeing us, and soon
disappeared in the distance and darkness. We let her get well out of
sight before we sat up. We then took two or three long breathes
a-piece, and began to consult what was best to be done, for the river
seemed full of enemies; for a Brazilian we knew she must be, as no
Patriot vessel would trust herself alone so far down the river. Two
of us were for running under sail, and two for rowing. At length we
cast lots, and the lot fell in favor of wind against arms. So we up
mast, sheeted home, and let her go again, the wind blowing us along
about five knots. In this manner we hugged the shore till day began
to dawn, keeping about half a mile from it, and occasionally serenaded
with a howl from a ravine or wood. With the dawn of day our
vigilance
and weariness increased; and when the full light of the morning
showed us a schooner and a barque outside of us, and a sloop-of-war
of twenty guns (for we could count them with the glass, as well as see
the Brazilian flag flying.) four miles ahead, we began to think that
`darkness was better than light,'
though we would not admit our deeds
to be `evil.'
CHAPTER XV
The Ravine.
Our
surprise and consternation on finding ourselves at day break in
the vicinity of two vessels of the enemy were very great. At first we
could hardly believe our eyes, but as the growing light revealed them
in all their warlike proportions, we could not longer disguise from
ourselves
the fact that we were caught in a very intricate position. Our
first act was to drop the mast and sail, and we then consulted what was
to be done.
The sloop-of-war was under easy sail standing down the river, and
the schooner was at anchor with her main-sail only set. We were about
three quarters of a mile from the shore, which presented a level,
barren
plain only here and there relieved by a stunted tree, and covered
with grey looking grass eight feet high.
`There is nothing to do but to pull for it in shore,' said Radsworth.
`But the confounded panthers,' objected Fairfax.
`It is Portuguee or panther,' said I. `We must choose one or the
other.'
`Then let us risk the panthers,' said Bedrick. `And we will have
to move quickly too. If by any chance they look this way we will be
seen, and then we are gone citizens.'
There was, indeed, no time to deliberate or delay acting. A slight
haze that rose from the water as the sun rose, doubtless concealed us,
while we could see them distinctly above it. This would soon
disappear
,
and only the grey color of our boat blending us with the hues of
the shore could prevent our being seen.
We took our oars and began to pull in dilligently towards the land.
I kept my eye upon both vessels as we rowed and was encouraged by
not discovering any signs of their having seen us. In twenty minutes
we reached the mouth of a small ravine, and in defiance of our
enemies
,
the panthers, ran our skiff into it. We ascended rapidly, rowing
the crooked canal about fifty yards, when a turn: in it hid us from the
river. We could proceed no further on account of the reeds which
obstructed it, and the branches of trees and huge vines that overhung
it, tangled together in gigantic meshes.
Glad to have got out of sight of the two vessels, we began to look
with misgiving upon the dark cavities of the ravine, the recesses of
which, seemed fit lairs for wild beasts. The first living object that we
saw was a large bird with a white head and black wings tipped with
white, that was seated upon the limb of a fallen tree. He did not fly
at our intrusion, but flapping his wings, uttered a shrilly note of
mingled
defiance and alarm. He was about the size of a wild turkey. I
was about to fire at him when Fairfax laid his hand on my pistol barrel.
`We can't be too still here,' he said. `The sound of a pistol might
bring us into trouble.'
I thanked him for his warning, and putting down the weapon I
sprung ashore to fasten the boat to a wild vine that lay trailing upon the
low bank. I had scarcery touched the ground when I leaped back
into the boat again with the most commendable celerity. My vine
proved to be an enormous serpent at least eighteen feet in length, of
the anaconda species. Quicker than thought we pushed the boat out
into the stream, and stood with our pistols cocked watching the
motions
of the unwieldy animal, and prepared to do battle if he made any
hostile demonstrations. His head, which he had been resting upon the
bank out of sight, basking in the warm morning sun, while his body
extended to the water, he now raised and gazed around with quick,
menacing glances. We increased the distance between us by crossing
to the other bank and there waiting. After looking about for a few
moments he slowly drew his lengthy form up the bank and in huge
hoops rolled himself over the edge out of our sight.
We were greatly relieved at his departure, and began to inspect
narrowly
such dangerous shores before again trusting ourselves upon them.
`The safest course for us, is to down keeleg and anchor,' sald
Radsworth
.
This was done about five feet from the brook. I was anxious to
land to climb up the side of the ravine and look off to see what had
become of the two vessels; and after a close scrutiny of the shore, a
suspicious and wary examination of every vine and limb to see that it
was veritably vegetable and not animal, I once more jumped ashore
from the end of the boat swung round for that purpose, and climbed
the bank. The bank was a level plain covered with high grass, to
overlook
which, I was forced to climb a wild peach tree. From this
elevation
I had a wide view of the ocean-like river. The two vessels were
in sight; but the sloop of war was nearly opposite the mouth of the
ravine standing down and less than a mile off. I could plainly see the
gorgeous Brazilian flag floating over her stern. Her men upon deck
were also distinguishable. She stood steadily on her course and
passed
by greatly to our relief; for I regularly reported what I saw to my
companions in the boat beneath me. The schooner was no longer at
anchor. She was under full sail and standing across the bows of the
larger vessel as if to speak her. This she did do evidently from the
manuvres, and then the schooner tacked and stood south towards the
open river, while the sloop kept on her way. I watched them till both
were full four miles away, when I prepared to get down confidant that
we had not been seen, and that we had nothing to fear from them.
As I was leaving the tree, Bedrick called to know if any Anacondas or
Panthers were in sight. I looked all around but could see none, not
even a sign of my friend, the grape-vine serpent. I was, nevertheless
very wary, and cautiously surveyed the premises about me before I
descended; and when at length I safely reached the boat, once more
I felt that I had great cause for gratitude. I had, however, been
successful
in my object, in watching the movements of the enemy, and as
were now free to proceed again I felt sufficiently recompensed for my
risk. Once while I was in the tree I got very much alarmed. I
detected
about thirty yards off, a motion in the tall, reed-like grass. It
swayed this way and that, and seemed to be agitated by some kind of
beast crouching and creeping through it. I watched it with a
palpitating
heart and an unwinking eye. I drew one of my pistols, (for I
had taken two in a belt with my cutlass,) and cocking it prepared to
receive whatever might make its appearance with evil designs upon
me. The motion however, shortly ceased and was not renewed again;
but I have no doubt it was caused by some animal whose departure was
more gratifying than his visit would have been.
The coast being now clear, we gladly took to our oars and pulled
out of this ravine where serpents and also wild beasts made their abode,
and felt quite safe when we once more found ourselves on the open
river, albeit we had enemies there as usual; and as we discussed the
merits of our respective foes, we could not come to a decision which
were the least to be dreaded, anacondas, panthers, or Portuguese, as
Brazilians are more commonly called in that region. For my part, I
felt that I had rather face six Portuguese than one anaconda or
panther
.
But, as I have said, we were not unanimous upon that point.
After we had fairly got on our course again, we proposed to breakfast,
and did so heartily upon corned beef, champagne and hard tack.
Having cleared away the table, which was the after thwart of the boat,
we finished in a bumper, in which we drank confusion to panthers,
Portuguese
and anacondas.
It was now moved and seconded that we should consult our chart
to ascertain where we were.
`If we can find Anaconda Creek,' said Fairfax, `there will be no
mistaking our latitude.'
`Or grape-vine ravine,' said Radsworth looking at me slyly. `What
is the Spanish of grapes, Paul?'
`I'll never forget that,' said I laughing.
We now compared the indentures in the coast with those on the
chart, and after careful examination and comparing of notes, we
calculated
ourselves to be about eighty-five miles from Montevideo. This
was our second day out of port, and under all circumstances, we
thought we had done pretty well.
Further examination of the chart showed us that we had nearly fifty
miles farther to ascend the river before we should get opposite to
Buenos
Ayres, and there would be the river to cross which was there thirty
miles wide. Thus we had about as far to go as we had come.
`It won't do to go too near Colonia,' said Bedrick.
`No,' answered Fairfax, `We had best run up until we come in
sight of it, for we can see the town before they can see us, and then
strike across for Buenos Ayres.'
`As we approach Colonia, `I remarked, `we shall have to be very
careful. You all know that it is in the hands of the Brazilians as well
as Montevideo, and that between the fleet and the fortress of Colonia,
vessels, as we have seen, are constantly passing. My opinion is, that
we had best cross the river at once and take the other shore.'
`Sir John,' answered Fairfax, `advised us to keep on the northshore
aslong as we could, saying that the main channel was on the south
side, and that we should be the more likely to fall in with Brazilian
cruisers there.
Radsworth was of my opinion and Bedrick was with Fairfax. So,
as we were all captains equally, we resorted as was our custom to
drawing
lots. The result was, that we decided to keep up the shore we
were then upon until we came pretty well up to Colonia, and then cross
over.
The wind being light and the current strong, we kept close in shore
and hoisted sail, and in this manner we sailed pleasantly along for
several hours without encountering anything upon the water or having
our attention arrested by any striking object on shore. There was but
one barren waste, now a limitless plain, now a broken ridge sloping to
the river; but in no part was there the slightest sign of cultivation or
the possessions of man. Once in a while we saw huge cranes
stalking
into the water, and large birds unknown to us sailed above the
beach on lazy pinions. We looked sharp for panthers and anacondas
but did not discover any evidence of the presence of our legitimate
foes; indeed the Portuguese had got to be quite secondary affairs in
our estimation.
About three o'clock in the afternoon, while all three of my
companions
were napping, it being my `trick' at the helm, I took up the
spy-glass
to sweep the shore and horizon in the offing, as we made a
practice
of doing every half hour through the day, when I discovered
about a mile ahead of us a boat drawn up on the beach, and under a
bank was visible a small rude hut. This was the first sign of
habitation
we had met for nearly one hundred miles, for that distance had we
now come. I was quite as much surprised at the discovery as if I had
seen an anaconda. I let the boat keep steadily on, just as we had been
running for the last few hours at about three and a half miles an hour,
and continued to examine the hut without disturbing my companions.
I saw, as we advanced, that the boat was a small piroque a few feet
longer than our whale-boat, and that it was run upon the shore half out
of the water. I knew it would take three or four men to launch it,
and I scanned the hut closely, to see if any persons were about. At
length we came opposite, and about a mile off from it. At this
moment
two men made their appearance in the door of the hut and I
could see by their gestures that we were observed and that our
presence
caused them surprise. I now waked my companions and pointed
out the persons, the hut and the boat. We speculated upon their
probable
character, and finally decided that they were poor fishermen, and
that we had nothing to fear from them. They now made signs to us
and we could distinctly hear them shout to us. But we paid them no
attention, keeping on our way in dignified silence, though eyeing them
askance, for we had misgivings that they would launch their boat and
put out after us. But we gradually lost sight of them and the hut, and
after sailing a few miles further came opposite a delightful little nook
in the shore, with a green natural lawn, bordered by trees, sloping to
the water side. It looked so inviting that we resolved to go in there,
and land and take our supper on the grass, under a wild fig tree that
stood aloof from the rest. As we could see neither Portuguese,
panther
or anaconda about the spot, we steered boldly in and beached our
boat almost upon the edge of the lawn. The sun was within half an
hour of setting as we stepped on shore armed to the teeth; for
precaution
was one of our rare virtues.
CHAPTER XVI.
The Landing.
We
had scareely landed ere a terrible roar from the wood caused us
to leap into the boat and put off, when a spotted panther came leaping
like a grey hound towards us. He paced up and down the beach
lashing
his tail and howling with rage at the invasion of his domains. We
fired at him without any apparent effect, though he shortly retired into
the forest.
At sunset the wind died quite away and we came to anchor in twelve
feet of water right abreast of a ridge over which were dispersed a few
trees. We resolved to lay here all night and sleep it out, for we were
pretty well wearied, having slept but little since we left Montevideo.
It was decided that two should sleep half the night and the other two
the other half, thus giving us all that opportunity for repose of which
we stood so much in need.
Bedrick and Radsworth watched till twelve o'clock, but without any
thing to interrupt the quiet of the night. The land was in darkness,
and silence reigned on the broad river. At midnight, Fairfax and
myself
were aroused and took our turn to watch. I felt greatly relieved
by the six hour's sleep I had enjoyed and felt in good spirits. The
watch we had relieved had hardly laid the heads down ere they were
sound asleep.
It was a beautiful night. The air had that delicious quality which
has given to that region the name of Buenos Ayres, or `good air.' It
was fresh, pure, soft and delightful to breathe. The stars sparkled in
splendid constellations, unknown to Northern skies, and the placid
bosom
of the river reflected them with increased lustre. Not a breath of
wind stirred. Our boat seemed to float in the atmosphere, with sky
and stars above and sky and stars below; while the black mass of the
shore seemed like some dark cloud stationary in mid air.
I sat in the stern of the boat and thought of my native land; of my
father's house, my friends, and the familiar and past scenes which I had
left, for a foreign land. Fairfax was similarly occupied and neither of
us spoke for an hour, but sat silent and thoughtful. At length I
supposed
he was asleep, and spoke to him to ascertain. He answered
promptly,
`I have not been asleep, but thought you were.
`I have been thinking of home,' said I.
`And so have I, and what fools we were to start off on this South
American adventure.'
`Yes, we have not shown either wisdom or prudence in coming
from the United States with Mr. Bedrick,' said I. `But we have put
our hand to the plough and we must make the furrow.'
`Well, we are young, and have our health, and if we can't make out
in this country we can by and by get back to our own,' answered
Fairfax
.
`We ought to be up with Colonia by to-morrow noon, and
to-morrow
night reach Buenos Ayres.'
`Yes. I am tired of voyaging in such a little boat,' said I. `I
would give a bottle of champagne, though we have but five left to
stretch my legs upon the land once more.'
`So would I,' said Fairfax. `Suppose we up keeleg, pull in shore,
and have a race.'
`Anaconda!' said I dryly.
`A plague on this confounded country,' answered Fairfax angrily;
`it isn't fit for Christians to live in! Well, suppose we take to rowing.
I had rather than sit here; and we shall be gaining something. When
we get tired we can anchor.'
We took in our little anchor, and placing the oars in the row-locks,
began to pull steadily along the line of the shore.
After rowing about an hour, we anchored again within a hundred
rods of a projecting point dark with trees; and beyond rose the
summit
of a higher elevation than we had seen since we had left
Montevideo
.
After watching its shape sometime, I became satisfied that it
was shaped into angles and bastions, and directed the attention of
Fairfax
to it.
`There never was a natural hill so square upon the top, and with
such projections like towers,' he said.
`That is my opinion,' I answered. `It looks to me like a fort, or
the ruins of one.'
`It does indeed,' said Fairfax in a low tone; `suppose we pull away
from this?'
`I should like to know first if it is a fort,' I replied. `If you will
agree to it, we will pull close in and examine it.'
`I am agreed,' answered Fairfax, taking an oar, while I pulled in the
anchor.
We pulled in close to the shore and then by the aid of the glass, we
clearly made it out to be the ruins either of a fort or convent. All
was silent and there was no signs of inhabitants. We should have
landed but for our former experiences in that way, and for some
mysterious
sounds heard among the trees; and satisfied for the present,
with our scrutiny, again pulled out and continued our course up the
river.
Twice during the next hour we heard howlings upon the land, and
on each occasion we congratulated ourselves on not having landed.
At length the morning broke, upon us, and as the light increased we
scanned the river both up and down, but could see nothing. On shore
we discovered three huts and an enclosure, which, when the sun fairly
rose and lighted up the scene, we saw was filled with several hundreds
of wild cattle. We examined at a mile distant, this place of curiosity;
and not without emotions of pleasure; for anything like signs of
human
habitation were a relief to the barren monotony of the shores we
had been coasting.
We were soon discovered, and six or seven men came out and gazed
after us; but as we could see nothing like boats upon the beach, we
did not apprehend any danger from them. We now breakfasted, and
by the time we had done had lost sight of the huts, and had abreast of
us only the sloping
pampas
, vast plains, receding from the river and
extending to the base of the Andes, hundreds of leagues, the only
inhabitants
hunters (quachos) whose occupation is the chase and
slaugh-ter
of the countless herds of wild cattle that roam over the boundless
plains.
About noon, the sun pouring down excessive heat upon our heads.
we resolved to arm
ourselves
, and go into a shady cove and bathe and
refresh ourselves under the trees. We therefore, steered in shore, and
run the boat upon the beach. We had previously surveyed the place,
without sign of panther, anaconda or Portuguese. We stepped ashore
each armed with a brace of pistols, and our cutlasses, and as a first
precaution, marched together to the ridge top to have a look round to
see that no enemy was in the neighborhood, either man or beast.
After reaching the top of the bank we could see nothing on pampa
or river, brute or human, and secure in our possession of the spot, we
descended to the skiff and undressed ourselves to bathe. Our bath
was truly refreshing to us, and greatly invigorated us. We how took
a lunch of beef and ale, and then went under a tree where the grass
and shade were inviting. There we sat, pistol in hand, and our
cutlasses
lying by our sides upon the grass, enjoying the coolness of the
spot; such a contrast as it was with our former situation in the skiff
upon the river, the boat acting as it were, as a focus to collect and
condense upon us all the sun's rays.
We now really enjoyed ourselves, and laughed and told jokes, and
talked about `old Bedrick's consternation and wrath when the
information
of our departure was communicated to him. We felt that we had
done' the old gentleman fairly and justly, and reflection upon our
present course always gave us high spirits. It was true we had not yet
achieved our escape. We were but little more than two-thirds of the
way, and we had yet dangers to pass ere we should rerch our
desttnation
.
At any moment we might fall into peril which would menace
both our liberties and lives. Yet we had now, as it were, got
habituated
to the excitement, and began to take everything coolly and easily.
Our successes thus far had inspired us with confidence, and familiarity
with our situation had rendered us less nervous in the presence of
difficulties
.
Experience had increased in us that coolness and courage
which is necessary to the successful result of any enterprize, and
especially
one of the kind we had undertaken.
Tempted by the shade and agreeable change from the narrow limits
of the skiff, which the reader will remember was an ordinary
whale-boat
eighteen feet in length, we remained three hours reposing.
Fairfax
fell asleep, and Radsworth, for fear of what might happen, climbed
into a tree, and tying himself to a limb also gave himself up to
luxurious
repose. Bedrick lay upon his back with his hands clasped over
the top of his head, and stretched out with the most comfortable ease
of posture, his eyes half-closed. I felt more like walking about and
exercising my limbs; and so taking a pistol in one hand and my
cutlass
in the other, I took a run up the bank. Upon reaching the top,
seeing another ridge or mound farther off, I resolved that I would go
and ascend it, supposing that from its summit I should see Colonia.
Warily stepping along, as it expecting enemies on every quarter, I
crossed the level space to the mound, the distance being about a
quarter
of a mile. I ascended it and then looked around me. On two
sides of me, North and West, stretched the interminable pampas like
a sea. Before me was the ocean-like river, whose opposite shore we
had not yet seen. Following the coast on the side upon which we had
landed, I beheld, to my great joy, about ten miles off, the towers of
Colonia, a high, and low one. They were scarcely visible but were
not to be mistaken. I was about to hasten down to my companions
with the news, when I discovered about a mile distant a party of
horsemen
,
some thirty in number. They were galloping along a sort of
road that led to the river, and moving in a direction that would bring
them near the mound. At first I thought they were hunters, but the
flashing of steel in the sun, and the scarlet color of many of their
dresses, showed me that they were cavalry; perhaps either a body of
Quacho cavalry going to join the Patriot army, or of Brazilian
cavalry
making a sortie from Colonia for forage. In the uncertainty which
enveloped their true character, it was only left for us to act as if they
were toes. If I could have known them to be Patriot cavalry I would
have awaited their coming, and I have no doubt my companions as well
as myself would have joined them at a moment's notice. But how was
I to ascertain? Before they could approach nigh enough for this
purpose
,
they might prove to be enemies and then it would be too late for
me to escape.
I therefore resolved to return without delay and alarm my
companions
and take to our boat. I could not descend the mount, however,
without being seen; but to make myself as little conspicuous as
possible
,
I bent double and started on a run down and across the level space
to the river. In the meanwhile, the horsemen were galloping on at the
same rapid rate at which they were going when I discovered them, and
so were within half a mile of me when I crossed the plain in full view
of them.
They saw me, and I beheld three or four of the foremost spur
forward
and heard them shout. I did not wait to honor their notice of
me, but straightening my body, I flew over the ground like the wind
and dashed down the steep bank, shouting to the ears of my startled
comrades.
`The Portuguese! The Portuguese! Thirty of them are close
upon us! To the boat and let us pull for our lives.'
I had no cause to repeat my warning. The two under the tree
springing to their feet grasped their weapons and sprang for the boat.
I reached it at the same moment, and we launched it with a single
effort. We sprang into it, when looking round I missed Radsworth.
He was still struggling in the tree to release himself, and his
handkerchief
having got into a hard knot in his haste, he was fairly caught.
`For Heaven's sake don't leave me here!' he cried.
Leave him! The bare idea made our cheeks tingle. We would
have stood by him at all odds. I was just about to spring ashore and
cut him down with my cutlass, when he severed it with a clasp knife,
and dropped to the ground. He did not take many seconds in
reaching
the boat and bounding into it. We took our oars and using them
as poles, pushed swiftly away from the beach till the water deepened,
when we began to row like heroes. Our skiff fairly jumped. It
seemed to be quite as much frightened as ourselves, and did its best to
show the enemy a clean pair of heels.
CHAPTER XVII.
Colonia.
We
had got about eighty yards from the shore, and were pulling
away with all our might to widen the distance, when we heard the
trampling of horses, and the next moment appeared two of the mounted
troop upon the verge of the ridge. They wore scarlet jackets, white
trowsers, and broad-brimmed straw hats, boldly looped up in front.
Carbines were slung at their backs, and long curved swords swung at
their belts. Their saddles were without holsters, their belt answering
the purpose by holding a formidable brace of pistols.
Upon reaching the bank and discovering us pulling away in the boat
for dear life, they set up a shout, made signals to the rest of their
company
who were not yet come up in sight, and then dashed down the
bank at a mad rate. As they approached the water the one in advance
a fiery-looking, dark-complexioned fellow, with long black locks and
moustachecalled to us in Spanish to stop.
We paid no attention to him, but rowed the faster; he, therefore,
spurred into the water at huge leaps, for it was shoal for many yards
from the shore, and at the same time discharged a pistol. His
comrades
followed him, unslinging their carbines as they rode, and the
ridge was at the same moment filled with the remainder of the troop.
Two or three of them followed the leading ones, but the rest remained
quietly seated in their saddles looking at the scene.
The shot from the pistol did not reach us, for we saw it plainly strike
and spurt up the water twenty yards astern of us. As we were rowing
our faces were of course turned towards the shore, so that we could
see all that passed.
`Pull away, boys!' cried Fairfax; `pull like good fellows!'
`That fellow with the carbine will hit us if we don't get out of his
way rapidly,' said I; `there he levels it!now stoop all!'
We bent ourselves forward as low as we could; the carabine was
discharged, and we distinctly heard the balls, at least half a dozen of
them, whistling over and about us.
We felt that it was becoming rather a ticklish affair, so far as we
were concerned. We encouraged each other to row, but hardly had
we raised ourselves and taken three strokes, when another carbine
was levelled, and down we ducked. The shot must have fallen far
short of us, or wide of us, for we heard no whistling.
`Now make her jump!' cried Bedrick; `in a few moments we will
get out of their reach.'
But this did not seem likely: two of the horsemen, after having
galloped
their horses in as far as they were able to advance in this
manner
,
pressed them forward to swimming, and they came on at such a
rate that I verily believed they would come up with us.
To check them I took up a pistol and fired at them; this set a good
example to the rest, and in three seconds we had given them the
contents
of eight pistols. As we fired with one hand we rowed with the
other, and so we kept increasing our distance. At this reception the
two horsemen reined up, and began to swim back towards the shore,
while the rest discharged a volley over their heads at us. Nearly every
shot fell short except one, which dropped harmlessly into the boat as
if it had been thrown from the hand, the force being spent by the
distance
it had come. I picked it up; it was quite warm, and in size as
large as four common musket balls; it was made of iron, not of lead,
and roughly enough cast at that.
We soon gained a safe distance from our foes, and then lay upon
our oars to rest, and gaze back upon the horsemen. They continued
to fire every now and then a carbine in our direction, and then
rejoining
their troop the whole party rode out of sight over the ridge, and
we saw no more of them. They afterwards were proved to be a party
of Patriot cavalry going to join Llavelleja before the walls of
Montevideo
,
and having despatches to him from the Buenos Ayrean
Congress
.
But our ignorance of their character, and their ignorance of
our friendly wishes, made us, meeting as we did, foes of course. They
supposed us to be Brazilian spies, and we naturally took them for
Brazilian
cavalry, seeing them so near Colonia.
`That was a close brush, boys,' said I, as the last horseman
disappeared
.
`I was pretty sure one of us was booked that time for the land of
Nod,' said Bedrick.
`I believe,' remarked Radsworth, instinctively flinching as he spoke,
`that if I had n't stooped as I did, one of the bullets would have gone
through my headit seemed to singe my ear-locks as it was.'
`The fellows aimed well,' observed Fairfax. `What thundering
things those carbines are that they carry; I would as lief be hit by a
four pound shot as one of themjust look at this!' and he exhibited
the ball which had come on board.
`It is my opinion,' said Bedrick, `that these fellows were Patriots.'
`But Patriot or Portuguese,' answered Fairfax, `we were all the
same to them. We did right in keeping out of their way; before
we could have assured them of our friendly feelings, we might all
have had our throats cut. There is no trusting a party like that
here in this desert plain.'
We perfectly agreed with him, and were quite satisfied at our escape,
whatever they might be. There was some wind, and we spread our
sail to woo it. It was about three o'clock in the afternoon, and
although
Colonia was not in view from the boat, I pointed out its
direction
,
and proposed that we should stand on until we came in sight of
it, and then strike across. To this proposal all acceded, and we seated
ourselves in the stern, reloading our pistols and talking over our
recent
escape.
Bedrick was strongly of the opinion that we could not too soon get
away from this shore, for he firmly believed that some of the three
horsemen wounded would go back to Colonia and have a gun-boat sent
out to intercept us. We discussed the probability, and finally came
to the conclusion that they would not take so much trouble about us.
The shores now appeared more pleasing to the eye. In the distance
were cultivated spots and farms, and we observed many white dwellings
of the inhabitants. The houses were square, with flat roofs, and
usually
but one story high. We could see also, as we glided along,
persons
in the fields and men on horseback; but as we kept out full a mile
from the land, we did not apprehend any danger. We discovered,
moreover, several small boats at one place where a dozen houses were
congregated; but we paid them no other regard than keeping farther
out from the land.
At length, about one hour before sunset, a distant projection of land
over which had hung a haze, gradually resolved itself into the
battlements
of Colonia, about two leagues off. We now stood on with
caution
;
two of the party were for putting the helm up, and striking
straight across for Buenos Ayres, but Fairfax and I opposed it, wishing
to have a good view of the place before turning aside from it. The
others yielded, and we kept on until within about four miles, when we
were able to discern, rising over the battlements, the masts of several
vessels. We suspected that they were Brazilian vessels of war, and
with the spy-glass we made out distinctly the brilliant flag of the
Emperor
,
one of the most gorgeous flags in the world.
We now concluded that it was best to be wary. The wind, which
had been getting light, now died away as usual towards sunset, and we
took down our mast and resumed our oars. With the glass we saw
near the town four or five small boats from which men were fishing,
and it occurred to us that we might approach much nearer, so as to
get a view of the vessels in the port, reflecting that our report would
be useful to Admiral Brown on the other side.
This step, however, was warmly opposed; but finally the objections
were overruled, and we rowed on till we came within two miles of the
fort and town. We then pulled out so as to open the harbor, and were
enabled to look in. With the aid of the glass we counted three brigs
of war, five schooners, and nine or ten lugger-rigged gun-boats. The
fort was a low fortification on a point of the shore, and the harbor a
snug cove, around which were a few farm houses; but near the fort
was quite a large collection of houses, with a tower and one or two
turrets, a long high wall with embrasures, and a battery with cannon.
We could see the soldiers upon them, and also persons taking the air
upon the tops of the houses. The town did not probably contain more
than five or six hundred inhabitants. The country was not elevated,
but was pleasant to the eye. Very few trees were visible, and these,
like all of those on the pampas, of stunted growth.
We took our observations at the distance of about two miles, the
atmosphere clear, and the sun brightly illumining the landscape.
`I think if we had twenty whale boats, with ten Yankees in each,'
said Radsworth, `we might take the town, vessels and all.'
`I hope Brown will try it,' observed Fairfax with animation. `What
a fine opportunity for him to run over in the night and surprise the
place! They don't seem to have a single vessel off the port on the
look-out to guard against it.'
`I am not so sure of that, boys,' said I, as I caught sight of a large
brig coming up the river.
They all uttered an exclamation of surprise on discovering her. She
was within five miles, and had only been seen by us so lately for the
reason that our attention had been so intently fixed upon the town.
She had the green and gold Brazilian flag flying and flashing in the
light of the setting sun.
Our first movement was to take to our oars and pull out into the
river
,
so as to get an offing and elude her as night came on. Whether
she saw us or not we did not know, nor did we care to wait to
ascertain
.
Bedrick had suggested the idea that she might be just from
Montevideo with knowledge of our escape, and perhaps with orders to
look us up. This conjecture gave us strength and energy. Colonia
was behind us, and the brig on the larboard beam standing straight for
us, but we pull ed on, wishing for night. We could say with
Wellington
at Waterloo, `Oh that Blucher or night were come!' only that we
would substitute `Brown' the Admiral, for Blucher, the General.
We had witnessed some quick movements of boats in the harbor
from shore to vessel, which had to our mind a suspicious appearance,
else we should have kept on straight past the mouth of the harbor,
instead of standing straight across, which course would bring the brig
nearer to us each instant until we had the offing.
The sun set. Colonia was four miles astern, and the brig two miles
to leeward.
`She has not changed her course,' said I watching her. `She
steers as at the first, direct for Colonia. I don't think she even
suspects
us!'
Scarcely were the words out of my mouth, when a flash lightened
from her bows, dash, dash, dash! came a shot along the surface of the
water within a hundred rods on our starboard hand, and plunged
beneath
it about two hundred yards ahead of us. The brig at the same
instant kept away from us.
`We are in for it now,' said I, after the first surprise at this
salutation
was over.
`What shall be done?' said Radsworth.
`We have not a particle of wind. She brings it only with herself,'
said Bedrick.
`The wind is full a mile ahead of her,' cried I. `See it ripple. It
will reach us in a few minutes, and then let us up sail, and scud and
row at the same time!'
`In a few minutes we may be sunk,' said Bedrick. `I move that we
pull back into Colonia. Seeing us turn they will cease firing,
supposing
they have mistaken us; for I have not the least doubt but they have
orders respecting us!'
This proposition was not carried. We resolved to do our best with
our oars till the wind came, and then add the sail; and strongly did
we bend to the pliant sweeps making the water sing under our bows.
CHAPTER XVIII.
The Passage Across.
The
brig kept on for a few minutes longer in ominous silence, and
then banged away at us again. The shot roared above us, and made
our hearts to cease beating for full half a minute, when they began
again like trip-hammers to make up for lost time. Our hopes of escape
were, as on a previous occasion, in the coming night, which in that
latitude rapidly follows sunset.
`A small object like our boat is hard to hit at two miles' distance,'
said I, straining my oar and snapping it in two as I spoke.
This was a severe accident to us in this dilemma; but most
fortunately
the wind struck us at this very moment. Our sail was hoisted
in an instant, and as the breeze was of full five knot force we gave a
glad hurrah and bounded merrily before it. We still plied the three
oars, one of us being at the helm to steer. Night fell upon us swiftly
and we began to feel that if we could escape being hit for twenty
minutes
more, we should be hidden by the darkness from their view.
But twenty minutes with a brig firing upon one is a long time. We
trusted through the haziness of twilight and the smallness of our boat
to escape the shot, Several more discharges of cannon from the brig
only gave new energy to our efforts, and as none of the shot came very
near us, we began to be indifferent to the firing, and cracked more than
one joke upon the bad powder and unskillful gunnery of the Brazilians.
At length the brig was hidden from us by the increasing night, and of
course we were invisible to her. We therefore resolved to outwit her
as we had done the other vessel two days before, by tacking and
doubling on our course. We, therefore, put about and run towards
Colonia, supposing the brig, if she was after us, would stand on as we
had last seen her steering. We run along landward on our larboard
tack for about half an hour, and were just about preparing to go about
to cross the river, supposing we had eluded the brig, when suddenly
she appeared down directly towards us. At first we could scarcely
believe
our eyes, she came upon us out of the darkness so unexpectedly.
But there she was, covered with canvass from deck to truck, and not
two cables' length from us.
We were taken by surprise, but not disconcerted. The mast was
struck instantly, and in the impulse of the moment, I cried,
`Overboard and hang on to the sides!'
To escape was impossible. She would inevitably pass within forty
feet of us. To escape being discovered seemed impossible. In an
instant we were in the water and concealed by the starboard side of
the skiff from the brig's deck. We were immersed up to our chins,
and supporting ourselves by the gunwale of the boat. We could not
see the brig as she came on, except by tipping down the boat, so we
knew we could not be seen; and it the boat was discovered we hoped
they would pass it as a drift-boat, and not take the trouble to heave to
for it. This was the only chance of escape.
We had not been thirty seconds in the water, when the brig came
so near that we had to look almost over our heads to see her royals.
Nearer and nearer she came, moving at about six or seven knots, and
she was within sixty feet of us. For a moment we apprehended that
she would pass directly over us, and had spoken to warn each other to
dive deep if she should. She came on and surged by within seven
fathoms of us, the bow swell of our advance lifting us and our skiff
upon its roll. We could count distinctly her ports as she passed by
and hear the men talking between decks distinctly enough to
understand
that the language was Portuguese. She passed us, and the stern
light burning in her cabin window flashed upon our eyes. At the
same instant, just as we were about to congratulate ourselves upon our
escape, we saw an officer spring upon the taffrail and the next moment
call out in Portuguese,
`A boat adrift! See what it is!'
`It is neither of the brig's boats,' we heard answered by some one
in the gang way.
`Whatever it is, heave the brig to and let down a cutter and send
for it!' said the first speaker.
We thought our time had now come without remedy. But in
danger
one's wits are always active. Presence of mind and invention are
given us by Providence as weapons in dangers, as the quills are
bestowed
upon the `fretful porcupine.' In danger, men's energies and
coolness
always rises to a level with his peril. As the imminency
increases
,
so does firmness and wits meet it and master it.
We saw that it would take them at least five minutes to bring the
brig to and get down and man a boat. The brig, in the meantime,
would be forging to leeward, while our own little craft would be
stationary
.
`By the time a boat can reach us,' was our rapid decision as we
spoke with each other, `the brig will be full half a mile to leeward.
Let us get in,' said we unanimously, `up sail and stick her nose right
into the wind's eye!'
No sooner said than done. In an instant, dripping like fish, we had
clambered again into the skiff, and the mast was at once raised, the
main sheet drawn aft, and the bows of the skiff stuck `right into the
eye of the wind.'
The brig was by this time far to leeward. She had laid her
maintop-sail
aback, and we could hear the creaking of blocks as she
lowered
down her cutter. But every instant of time thus occupied by them
we were widening our distance from the brig, while the latter was of
necessity drifting to leeward. We could lay a point and a half closer
to the wind than a large vessel, and in the superior ability of our little
bark, we hoped to get away from them. We trimmed our boat with
the nicest precaution and fairly eat into the wind right away from the
brig. One had the helm, another kept a sharp look-out for the flash
to tell us when to dodge, while the other two rowed to help along her
sail. In five minutes after we had got under progress, the brig was
scarcely visible to leeward. By laying our ears down close to the
water
,
we could distinctly hear the noise of the oars of the pursuing boat,
rattling in the row-locks. But as they were invisible to us, we knew
we were equally so to them. Steadily we worked our way to
windward
.
Gradually the brig faded from sight, and the sounds of the
distant
oars of the cutter grew fainter, until they were no longer to be
heard.
We did not, however, speak to begin to congratulate ourselves.
We had not yet fairly insured our safety, and we chose to be sure of
it, ere we gave free vent to our joy. At length hearing no more of
the enemy, we were partly well convinced of our security, and began
to express to one another our glad emotions. We had not before come
so near capture. It was now proposed to bear away and steer directly
across to Buenos Ayres, which was thirty miles distant. We hoped
to reach it by at least three o'clock in the morning, it being now about
ten.
The helm was accordingly put up, the sheet eased off, and the bows
of the skiff set direct for Buenos Ayres, the bearings of which we
took by compass, which we were enabled to examine by means of a
dark lantern we had brought with us. The shores of Colonia
gradually
faded from view, and nothing but night and its stars with the
wave-tossed
water was about us. Merrily we danced on, and although we
were so thoroughly wet by our bath, we were in great spirits, and sang
in full chorus the Canadian boat-song. As singing made us dry (I do
not mean outside) we opened the locker and cracked a bottle of
champagne
.
We had but one more remaining, which we resolved to open
only when we should come in sight of Buenos Ayres.
The excitement of our recent escape, our wet clothes, in which, if
we slept we feared we should take cold, and the prospect of shortly
seeing Buenos Ayres, kept us from sleep. There was no `watch
below
.'
We sat together talking over the past, and discussing the future.
What we were to do when we reached Buenos Ayres, neither of us
were very decided. Fairfax and Bedrick thought of trying to get a
clerkship, and if unable to join Brown's squadron. Radsworth and I
thought of Llavelleja and his brave army, and looked to distinction and
fame under his banner; our purpose being to join some party going to
reinforce him and offer to him our services. But in the main we were
to be governed most by circumstances. We resolved to do whatever
fortune had for us to perform.
The little skiff danced merrily over the white capped waves. As
we talked over our affairs, and about two in the morning, while we
were about preparing to look out ahead for the Buenos Ayrean shore,
Bedrick suddenly cried out,
`Land ho!'
We looked eagerly forward, and saw the dark mass of the Southern
shore just perceptible in the darkness. We were rejoiced beyond
measure and shouted a welcome. We knew that we were now safe;
that we were now beyond the reach of Portuguese cruisers and under
the protection of the Patriot flag.
We now eagerly watched the shore towards which our bark was
bounding, anxious to make out the outlines of the city, its towers,
domes and fortification. We stood in until we could discover that
there was a forest before us, instead of a city; and in vain our eyes
sought through the gloom of night for the signs of human habitation.
We ran in within a quarter of a mile of the shore, and then coming
to, gazed with blank surprise upon the dark forest which stretched
along the bank.
`This is odd,' said I. `We have missed the city and fallen upon
the land either above or below it.'
`Below it, most likely,' said Fairfax in a disappointed tone; `the
current has drifted us below it.'
`We ought to have calculated for that,' said Radsworth.
`We steered straight for the city by compass,' I remarked, `and
supposed of course we should fetch it. But not making allowance for
the lee-way of the river's current, we have struck the land I dare say
a dozen miles below the city.'
`I should n't be surprised if we had,' was the general response.
`We shall know where we are by daylight,' said Bedrick. `So,
fellows
,
suppose we down the sail, anchor, and all hands go to sleep till
morning.'
We anchored and unshipped the mast, and Bedrick and Fairfax went
to sleep; but I was too watchful and also too anxious to get the first
sight of the shore by dawn to lay down. So Radsworth and I chatted
and watched for the day. At length it began to dawn, and slowly as
the darkness receded, the outline and aspect of the shore were
apparent
.
We now awoke our friends and began to survey our position as
the morning slowly threw light upon it. The shore was one unbroken
forest for miles up and down the river, save an inlet very narrow which
penetrated it just before us. When the sun rose, we could see that
this inlet wound into the land through the forest. We resolved to
explore
it. So raising the keeleg we took our oars and rowed shoreward
and entered the mouth of the inlet. It was deep and canal-like in its
appearance, and very serpentine. We cocked our pistols and laying
them by our sides, pulled steadily on for five or six minutes, when,
suddenly
in turning a bend, we came in sight of the masts of two brigs
and three schooners appearing over the top of the trees not a quarter
of a mile distant. We stopped rowing at once and gazed upon this
sight with doubts and misgivings. Not knowing where we were, we
were not sure they were not Brazilian vessels. We examined their
yards and rig, and at length Fairfax roundly swore that one of the
brigs was a Yankee.
The vessels seemed to be lying in another bend of the creek; and
what they could be doing up there looked to us at the least, very
suspicious
.
But as we could get no information by talking, we resolved
to row carefully on until we came in sight of them, when we should
be able to judge by their appearance of their country; and besides we
expected to be able to see the colors, which probably flying from the
peak could not be seen by us where we were. So we pulled on, but
with the wariness of a party about to surprise an enemy.
CHAPTER XXI.
The Arrival at Buenos Ayres.
After rowing on about five minutes and almost in a circle, the creek
was so tortuous, we opened all at once upon an extensive natural
basin several acres in extent, in which were anchored five vessels,
three schooners and two brigs. At the peak of one of the brigs, a
handsome bright-sided vessel, floated the Yankee
stars and stripes!
As soon as we saw this flag we sprung upon our feet, took off our
caps and swinging them above our heads gave three hearty cheers.
We then seized our oars and pulled strait for the brig. We saw as we
rowed on that the basin was nearly round and on one side stood a
wretched looking village of huts mostly built of reeds and mud.
Our shouts had drawn to the side of the brig the mate and several
of the crew, who looked at us with no little surprise and curiosity
as we came near. Without a word we pulled under the gangway
ladder, and securing our boat, clambered one after another upon deck.
The mate looked as if he was undecided whether to receive us as
friends or buccaneers. I approached him and said:
`We are four Americans who have escaped from Monte Video,
and seeing your vessel, have come on board to learn where we are and
also have the satisfaction of being once more under our country's flag.'
When I had spoken these words the mate, a fine, clever,
whole-hearted
Marble- head man, grasped my hand and said he was very glad
to see us. He shook hands with all round, and then inviting us down
into the cabin, sung out to the steward to cook breakfast for four,
`and see,' he added, `that you get double allowance, for these young
gentleman must be hungry!'
We now told him our story, to which he listened with very great
interest. He then told us that we were in the port of Ensenaca, thirty
miles below Buenos Ayres by water, but only eighteen by land,
and that we had been borne down by the strong current instead of
making that port as we had intended to do. He said the brig was the
Caroline Augusta, commanded by Captain Reed of Boston, son of the
celebrated High Constable Reed. The Captain, he continued, was
then up to the city (Buenos Ayres) where he was transacting business
with his merchants.
We had a capital breakfast and did full justice to the mate's `double
allowance.' After we had finished our meal we all went on deck
and began to hold a consultation as to our further movements.
Bedrick
and Fairfax were for leaving the boat at Ensenaca and taking it on
horseback across to the city, as the mate said they could hire a horse
for a dollar each, and a guide to show them the way and bring the
horses back.
Finally, completely tired of the skiff, Bedrick and Fairfax resolved
to quit it and try the land route.
`We shan't get to the city before to-morrow morning, if we do
then,' argued Fairfax, and on horseback we will be less than two hours
going!'
Radsworth and I did not like to leave the skiff and give up before
we had reached the city in her. As we were equally divided, it was
finally settled that they should go up by land, and we by water; that
they would find lodgings for us by the time we come and also meet us
at the quay.
We all went on shore to see our friends off. The place where we
landed was a wretched collection of huts thatched with straw and
arranged
with some attempt at the regularity of a single street. There
was one principal shanty around which were sailors, half-bred Indians
and ragged Spaniards. It was the
pulpesia
orrum-shop of the place.
Near the door were several half-naked quachos, who upon seeing our
approach, came running towards us, crying out each louder than the
other,
`Caballo, senores? tendran ustedes, caballos?' (will you have horses,
gentlemen?)
Fairfax answered in his Spanish that he would like to have two
horses to take him to Buenos Ayres. Each fellow clamoured for the
precedence, and at length a bargain was struck with one of them for
the use of himself and horses at a dollar and a half. In a little while
he brought up two horses with old tattered Spanish saddles strapped
upon theirbacks, the pummel half a foot high. The horses were small,
fierce looking animals with wild eyes, uncombed manes and fet-locks
streaming with hair like a trooper's helmet. They had ropes for
bridles.
Fairfax mounted one of them, though with some misgivings, and
Bedrick the other. Their owner then vaulted upon the back of a
third, and giving a sharp wild cry as a signal, the three horses with
their riders dashed off at a furiousrate. The last we saw of our two
friends for that day was as they were disappearing in a distant jungle,
their heads level with their horses necks, around which they were
clinging as if their necks depended on their hold.
We were very well satisfied with our choice of the skiff, after
witnessing
this feat of horsemanship and being told that the three horses
would probably keep up the same speed till they reached the city or
pitched over their own heads.
`And if they tumble down with them,' I asked of one of the
bystanders
,
`and break their necks?'
`They take a fresh horse at the first rancho,' was the quiet reply
of the man who never seemed to think that the rider might happen to
get his neck broke as well as the horse.
The mate then informed us that horses were scarcely of any value
there. That fine ones could be bought for five and ten dollars; that
they were to be had for the catching; and that they usually rode them,
when they went any distance, till they broke down, when they would
transfer the saddle to another. The plains or pampas, he added, which
every where surrounded the city of Buenos Ayres, and which from
the vessel stretched like a wide ocean of grass before the vision, are
filled with droves of horses and cattle, thousands and thousands of
which are killed, especially the latter, only for their hides. The bee
when it is killed to preserve is hung up in pieces in the air and dried;
for such is the purity of the atmosphere, that nothing taints or
putrifies
.
In this manner is made all the jerk-beef, such quantities of
which are exported from Buenos Ayres, the meaning of which is
in English, `Good Air!'
We returned on board the brig and passed two or three hours
very pleasantly, and then prepared to resume our voyage in the skiff.
After taking a lunch we got into it once more, and with the hearty
farewells of the mate and crew, we pulled down the creek and
were soon again on the main river. As the wind was fair, though
light, we hoisted our sail and seating ourselves in the stern let the
skiff run along by the shore at about two and a half miles an hour.
We kept near the land, for the mate had told us that two days before
he had seen from the main-top of the brig a large Brazilian schooner
of war standing up the river within four miles of the shore. He said
that she kept on her course about a league up the river, and then
hauled her wind and stood over towards Colonia.This, we at once
decided, must have been the vessel from which we had had such a
narrow escape off Colonia.
The shores along which we sailed were strait and presented to
the eye neither beauty nor variety, Now and then a few stunted
peach trees would relieve the monotonous level line of the banks,
and sometimes they would be broken by a ravine. For twenty
miles there was but a single hut visible, and this was without any
inhabitant. The night at length gathered about us when we were
within about three or four leagues of the city, though we could not
see it. We sailed on by the star-light keeping about half a mile from
the shore. The wind was still very light so that our progress was slow.
At length we were startled and rejoiced to hear the barking of a dog
upon the land. We could see nothing but knew we must be in the
vicinity of some dwelling. By our calculation, we ought to have been
within three miles of the city. We kept on when gradually the banks
of the river carved so as to show ahead of us two or three miles the
dark outlines of domes, towers and ranges of roofsthe whole profile,
though indistinct, of a large city.
Our joy now was boundless. We clapped our hands and hurraed.
As we drew nearer we could see lights sparkling in the distance, and
soon after the deep tone of the cathedral bell tolling for midnight
mass fen solemnly upon our ears. We passed what appeared to us
the mouth of a creek in which we saw several small vessels; and
with the glass I could make out four or five miles off in the outer
roads, several square-rigged vessels at anchor. We knew they were
merchantmen from what the mate had told us. They were anchored
there on account of the shoal water which would not allow vessels of
any size to approach nearer than a league and a half of the town
All cargo was landed in lighters.
Each moment we drew nearer the city, making out more
distinctly
in the star-light, its imposing outlinefor to the eye Buenos
Ayres is one of the most striking and noble looking cities in South
America. At length the barking of dogs fell upon our ears in
deep-mouthed
baying, as if hundreds were engaged in this canine pastime.
When we judged we were about a third of a mile from the shore
and were looking to see where we should find the quay, we suddenly
found ourselves aground. Upon trying the depth of water with our
oars, we found that it was scarcely eighteen inches any where within
our reach, and close along side it was scarcely a foot. Supposing that
we had run upon a shoal, we tried to push off, but finding ourselves
fast we concluded to lay there quietly till morning. We, therefore,
threw over our small anchor, and then lowering our sail made as good
a bed of it in the bottom of the boat as we could, and then prepared
to turn in and sleep, both of us, till day light should reveal to us our
true position. In a few minutes we were both snugly ensconced in
the bottom of the skiff. But it was sometime before I could get to
sleep.The incessant baying, yelping, howling, of at least twenty
thousand dogs (for there are one hundred thousand inhabitants and
at least a dog to every five) kept me awake. I had never listened
to such an uproar not even in Monte Video. They made night hideous,
and I began to reflect upon our good fortune in not having to land
by night in the midst of such a ferocious horde as doubtless prowled
in every street and thronged the landing. At one time a band of
them were heard scouring along the shore with a terrific chorus of
howls, and swept on till their voices were lost among the miscellaneous
yelping and baying of the main body. Doubtless they were in pursuit
of some miserable horse or wretched cow. At intervals the deep tolling
of a bell would reach my ear, awakening strange sensations. At
every new sound I would raise my head and look over the edge of the
boat to reconnoitre.
At length gradually overcome with fatigue and watching, I sunk into
a deep sleep from which I was awakened by the splashing of water
and loud shouts. Radsworth and I both sprung to our feet. It was
broad day. The sun had just risen and was shining brightly upon
the domes and towers of the city. I recollect my impression of this
first sight of it. It seemed to me the most magnificent place on
earth with its seven vast domes, and twice the number of lofty
towers with turrets innumerable and vast ranges of battlemented roofs.
But we had no time to admire the novelty of the scene. Close
at hand, the nearest not twenty yards from us, were galloping and
splashing towards us about a score of wild-looking fellows, mounted on
horses wilder looking, if possible, than their riders.
CHAPTER XXII.
The Reception.
We were at a loss to understand what this movement, which seemed
so hostile in its bearing, could mean. We thought that we were about
to be attacked and put to the sword, being probably mistaken for
Brazilians. No sooner did the idea seize upon our minds than we
resolved
to sell our lives as dearly as possible. We each seized a pistol
and cutlass and stood upon the defensive.
No sooner did these wild looking fellows witness these
demonstrations
on our part than the foremost drew rein and came to a full stop.
The others did the same, and then they commenced shouting at us
and making the wildest gestures. One fellow in particular would
call out to us in unintelligible language, then waving his hand, point
to his crupper and make his horse curvet and whirl round in the
foaming
water like a top.
We didn't understand their manuvres and maintained our
war-attitude
.
At length one of them in a moment of comparative stillness,
for what with the dashing of the water by their horses' hoofs, and their
uproar of voices, there was the utmost confusion prevailing, one of them
called out in Spanish
`Senores, somos amigos. (We are friends.) We have come to
ask you to ride ashore on the backs of our horses. We charge you
only two
reales
apiece.'
As I was able to understand him, our fears of being massacred as
Brazilians at once subsided; and when we come to look at the great
distance we were grounded from the shore, it seemed to us that the
only way we could get to land would be by mounting a horse.
`They are Buenosayrean Hackmen,' said Radsworth.
`Yes,' I answered, `and for this business just the hackmen we want.
Come along side,' said I to the man, you and another, and we will
talk with you.'
Two of them came galloping up, splashing us with water like
a shower of rain. They looked like half-bred Indians, with coal-black
hair worn long upon their shoulders. One of them had a broad
straw hat upon his head, the other wore a red cap. Both of them had
dirty scarlet blankets with a hole in the centre to thrust their head
through, and soiled white cotton drawers fringed around the bottom.
Beneath the drawers their brawny brown legs were thrust naked.
One of the fellows had buckled on his bare heel an enormous iron
spur with the rowel as large as a dollar. Its weight could not
have been less than a pound.
As we did not care about landing except with the boat at the quay,
which we could no where see, we told them we would pay them to
help us shove off our boat and show us where the Mole was. They
said that the Mole was full two miles off around the bend of the
shore, and that it would be a hard row, as there was no wind, to reach
it. One of them proposed that we should ride ashore with them, and
that when he had landed us he would come back to the boat and take
it round to the landing-place for us.
We consulted together upon this movement. The quacho had told
us that the house of the American Charge de Affairs, Col. Forbes, to
whom I had a letter, was not far from the place where we then
were, and he would send a boy with us to show the way.
We were quite tired of rowing and were anxious to get ashore
and traverse the streets of the city that lay before us. The fellow
looked honest, and at length we resolved to mount behind him and
his friend and land where we were, leaving them to take the skiff round
to the quay.
There was nothing of any consequence to steal in the skiff. We had
sundry empty champagne bottles and porter bottles and a few pounds
of beef and bread. These they were welcome to. Our baggage we
could pack away in our pockets. The chart, spy glass and compass
were all that were of any value and these we took with us under our
arms. Having got all ready we prepared to mount behind our guides.
The process of backing up to the boat so that we could get on, was,
after several trials, successfully accomplished, and almost before we
knew it we found ourselves each astride the crupper and galloping on
towards the shore dashing the water twenty feet around us. These
fellows always ride as if they were sent for! and in five minutes
we were high, but not
dry
, upon the beach. Here we dismounted and
paid over two reales and off went the fellows back again to look
after our boat.
We stood on the shore watching them until we saw four of them
dismount and together push the skiff into deep water. Then one of
them fastened the boat's `painter,' to the crupper of the saddle, and
mounting his horse lady-fashion, began to whip him up and drag the
skiff along through the water towards its destination. It was the
coolest act I ever saw done, and to our minds, appeared from its
novelty, infinitely ludicrous. After we had watched its progress for
a few minutes and seen that it was likely to reach its destination,
we began to ascend the bank to the town. The shores for two miles
are in their natural state. Not a wharf obstructs the complete range
of beach. The city streets all terminate at the range of the bank,
which is about eighteen feet above the beach. Upon the sands we
saw about a quarter of a mile below us, more than a hundred
women washing clothes, piles of which lay around them, like heaps
of soiled snow. Some of them were mid-knee in the water, others
upon the beach. Children were playing round them or sporting in the
waves. Up and down the shore there were footmen, quacho
horsemen
,
galloping `like mad' here and there, and dogs ranging about in
countless numbers. The whole scene was one of life and novelty.
At the distance of five miles in front of the town, we saw several
vessels at anchor all of which I supposed were merchantmen; but on
looking at them with a glass I recognized the Buenos Ayres flag, (a
rising sun,
gold
, on a blue ground) flying at the mast head of several
of the vessels, which I saw were armed. One of them was a sloop
of war of twenty guns, and others were brigs and schooners. There
were also two merchant ships with English and Danish colors, and
one American. Colonia, which was beyond them on the other shore,
thirty miles distant, I could not see with the glass, though from the
towers of the city it is visible in a clear day.
We now ascended the river bank and came upon the level on which
the city stands. There was a space of about eighty yards between
the verge of the bluff and the beginning of the walls and streets of
the town. This space is a common; and was covered with the
bleaching skeletons of thousands of horses, dogs and cattle, and
here and there, within range of our eye, were visible, groups of
dogs tearing to pieces the flesh of dead animals. Yet, with all this,
there was no stench perceptible, an evidence that Buenos Ayres well
deserves its name, of pure, or `Good Air.' The houses did not front
the river, but turned to it the high convent-like walls of their
court-yards
.
The streets opened at once into the town between two angles
of a court wall, or between two houses without windows on the lower
floor.
We passed up a street, preceded by a ragged Spanish lad, whom
the quacho had given us for a guide. The houses were similar to
those in Monte Video, with stuccoed fronts, doors wide enough for
coaches, balconies projecting from the second story windows, many
of which were barred, and in which stood flowers, and often a
beautiful
woman looking down upon the scenes in the street.
After passing along four squares, we came to the heart of the city
and into a street which is the Broadway of BuenosAyres. It was
thronged with people, and had in it some very fine houses. At length
we came to a stately orange colored edifice, of an appearance
altogether
imposing. Upon the flat roof was a flag staff on which
to our great joy we beheld flying the stars and stripes of our
native
land. Who that has not been in a foreign land can understand
the emotion with which the wanderer from home hails the sight of his
country's flag. It is an emotion enjoyed and appreciated only by the
traveller. He alone can feel what it is. It is like the sight of an old
friend, but the feeling is deeper than friendship; and was mingled
with a sort of pride and sense of patriotism that cannot be
explained
to the home-stayer.
Our pulses throbbed with joy, and a sense of security which we
had not felt for a long time, filled our bosoms. We did not need the
information communicated by the boy that, `This is la casa del
ministro Americano!'
We entered the court-yard and crossing the
patio
where a fountain
was playing amid the foliage of orange trees, we came to a spacious
stair-way which conducted to a broad piazza facing the interior of the
court. Here we saw a mulatto servant of whom we inquired for
Col. Forbes, when a stout, fleshy gentleman of about fifty-five came out
of a door opening upon the gallery, and looking at us, said in English,
`I suspect you are the two young Americans whom I have been
expecting. Your friends reached here yesterday.'
We told him that we were the persons he supposed, when he shook
us heartily by the hand, and invited us into his breakfast-room,
where the table was already laid.
We breakfasted with him, and at the same time related to him our
adventures. He said that he had heard them briefly from Fairfax
the day before, and that he was glad to have an opportunity of
hearing them in detail. I will pass over his praises of our courage
and perseverance.
After breakfast we were delighted with the appearance of Fairfax
and Bedrick. We met as if we had been parted a year. They told us
that their arrival had created the greatest excitement throughout the
city, and that they had been constantly followed by crowds. There
had been no intelligence from below for ten weeks, and the news
brought by us was important to the merchants; for we had with us,
it will be recollected, a list of all the merchant vessels in the harbor.
During the day hundreds of persons called upon us, particularly
merchants, to learn the news, and many to gaze on us; for we had
all at once, to our surprise, risen into the rank of heroes.
In the evening Commodore Brown called at the Charge's to
see us, and question us respecting the fleet in the harbor, and the
state of naval matters, and to learn if we had heard of any
contemplated
movement of Admiral Lobo's squadron. We were potently
able to give him much information that was valuable and received his
thanks, and at the same time very flattering compliments upon our
`daring exploit,' as he was pleased to call our expedition.
The Commodore was dressed in full uniform, and was
accompanied
by two lieutenants and a midshipman. One of the lieutenants
was a New Yorker, the other a Buenos Ayrean, and one of the
handsomest looking men I ever saw. The midshipman was an
English
youth. Brown himself was an Irishman. He was formerly a
lieutenant in the British navy, but for some reason, withdrew from it
and attached himself to the fortunes of Buenos Ayres. He was about
forty-five years of age, short and stout, with a fine, bold countenance,
and looked every inch a sailor. He limped when he walked, from
a wound received in the leg in some of the numerous sea-fights he
had been engaged in. He was a brave and useful man in the Buenos
Ayrean service, or indeed, the only person who could at such a
time get together a navy. He was now in command of a corvette, four
brigs, six or seven schooners, and about a dozen gun-boats, These
he had been diligently fitting for service, and the fleet was now
nearly ready. His greatest difficulty was in obtaining officers.
His intention was, as soon as he could obtain them, to weigh anchor
and sail down the river, attack the Brazilian fleet, and try and break
the blockade.
After conversing aside for a few moments with the Charge, the
Commodore turned to us, and said in a frank, hearty tone,
`Now, my young friends, as you don't seem to be engaged yet in any
particular business, how would you like a berth each in the navy.
I am told you have some knowledge of the sea, as you must have,
to have come the voyage here, but the Buenos Ayreans have hardly
seen salt water. They make good soldiers, but are no sailors. If
you will enter the navy, you shall each of you have a lieutenant's
commission
and pay, seventy-five dollars a month. Come, what do
you say?'
We told him in reply that we would talk over the subject together,
and give him an answer the next morning.
After he left, I showed to Col. Forbes my letter of introduction,
which, in the hospitality of his reception, I had forgotten. He
immediately
manifested a new interest in my affairs; and calling me into
his library, advised me not to consent to enter the navy, as I should
see nothing but hard knocks, no pay, and little credit. He talked
with me a long time, and finally I gave up the idea, which I warmly
seized upon, the moment Commodore Brown had suggested it.
That night we discussed the matter, and Bedrick was the only
one who resolved to join the navy. The next day he entered it and
went on board. Fairfax in a day or two after, got a clerkship in the
house of Frazier & Co. Mr. Gilbert, a Connecticut gentleman, the
editor of the `Gaceta Mercantel,' kindly invited me to share the
hospitalities
of his house, which I did so, as Colonel Forbes had to leave
for a few days for San Isidro up the river.
CHAPTER XXIII.
The Conclusion.
The
account of our adventures appeared in the Spanish paper El
Gaceta Mercantil, and for some days we were quite lions. As we
had nothing to do but to enjoy ourselves, and as every facility was
afforded us for going into the best society, we passed our time for two
or three weeks very pleasantly.
But as I felt no disposition to intrude upon the hospitality of my
friends, and had very little money, I began to look about me to find
something to do; but all business was suspended. Fairfax had by
great good fortune, obtained a place in a commercial house.
Bedrick
had gone into the navy which in a few days afterwards weighed
and stood down the river to fight the Brazilian squadron. Radsworth
and I were without any prospect of doing any thing. We at length
sold our skiff, which brought us eighty dollars, and this was divided.
The skiff had safely been
towed
round to the mole; and when the
rumor
that four `Americanos' had come up from Monte Video in it
spread, hundreds flocked to see it, and for some days we shared
with it equally, the honors of the popular admiration.
But it is time that I bring the narrative of my famous South
American
expedition to a close, which I shall do in the present chapter;
as I have nothing more to write that has not been written before of
the manners and customs of the people of Buenos Ayres.
After remaining there a portion of the winter, and finding that I
could do nothing to advantage on account of the war, I resolved to
return
to the United States in the brig Caroline Augusta which was to
go out of the river in ballast. The Brazilians did not object to
vessels
going out of the river from Buenos Ayres. They would have
been glad to have them all left before Brown had bought and
converted
any of them into vessels of war, as he had done; nearly every
vessel in the squadron under his command, having been a
merchant
vessel. The Commodore had offered Captain Read a large
sum for his, but the Captain preferred returning home in her.
The day at length came for sailing.At nine o'clock in the
morning
I startedupon horseback for Ensenada, escorting with the Captain
and two sailors, a cart containing stores and baggage. The cart
was as rude as if it had been made before the flood. It had huge
wooden wheels, and the body was made of poles and covered like a
huge coop with a lattice of withes. It was drawn by an ox and a
mule, driven by a half-breed Spaniard. It was the most grotesque
affair
in the way of a carriage, that ever came before my eyes. After
various adventures, we reached Ensenada, and once more I stood
on the deck of the brig which we had first seen on coming up from
Monte Video. Radsworth had concluded to remain and go into the
navy, and we had only two passengers besides myself. One of them
was a large Frenchman by the name of Ducosse, who had with
him about four thousand dollars in gold and silver, and used to
amuse himself on the passage in pouring it out on the cabin floor and
counting it over. He said he had been a captain under Napoleon,
and showed numerous scars in attestation of his having been in battle.
The other passenger was from Wilmington, North Carolina, by
the name of Bennett, a mere youth who had a brother as consul
in some part of South America. Captain Reed himself proved to be
one of the finest men in the world; a thorough seaman, and as bold
and fearless as a true man ought to be. His mate by the name of
Durgin, was a large red-haired man, and a person of excellent
temper
.
He was also an exemplary Christian. He had some
mechanical
genius, and on the passage invented a perpetual motion machine,
on the principle of the repelling and attracting magnet.
The day after we got on board, the brig weighed anchor and was
towed out of the creek into the river La Plata. As we were moving
out, I heard the sound of heavy and distantcannonading, and going
aloft, could see clouds of smoke rolling along the horizon in the
direction of Colonia. The sound was like far off thunder. We
understood afterwards that Brown was bombarding Colonia, and the
Brazilians were playing their batteries in return. The result,
however
,
was, that the Buenos Ayrean Commodore finally withdrew and
stood down the river.
After gaining deep water outside of the mouth of the creek of
Ensenada
,
we called our boat aboard, made sail, and lay our course
down the river. The afternoon of the next day we came in sight
of the Brazilian fleet, and then I fearned for the first time that
Captain Reed intended to run the gauntlet by.He had got into
Buenos Ayres by doing it when he came up, for he had reached
Buenos Ayres after the blockade was established. In going up he
had kept well to the south, and been chased and fired into for twenty
hours, but escaped by his superior sailing and reached his port in
safety.
He was, therefore, as well as myself marked by them. He knew
that, if he was recognized he would be stopped and taken into Monte
Video, and perhaps imprisoned, besides losing his vessel.
All the while going down, I had been feeling some misgivings, if I
should happen to be recognized by the boarding officer, as I might
be, for nearly every Brazilian officer had doubtless seen me in `the
soda shop.'
When, therefore, Captain Reed told me that he should drive by, I
felt very much relieved. All vessels leaving a blockaded port are
compelled not only to leave in ballast, but they are brought too and
boarded, and strictly searched. Captain Reed was in ballast, but he
resolved not to be boarded; for he knew that his vessel would be
recognized and seized. So as we approached the squadron, he said
to me,
`I shall try your plan coming up. I shall make a bee-line right
between yonder brig of war and corvette. We shall, with this breeze
get by 'em before they can harm us! They will not suspect us
either, till too late, for I shall run down and begin to clew up and
take in my royals, as if I was going to come to!'
The fleet lay, as before, stretched across the ocean-like river, in
a line that diminished towards the horizon northand south. Directly
before us and within three miles lay the brig and corvette, both at
anchor. We steered directly for them, and as we approached the
brig loosened her top-sails and hove short. When we got so near
that we could see the men on deck and distinguish the officers,
Captain Reed began to clew up, but still standing on. In this
manner
we passed the range of their guns and were pursuing our way
astern of them before they suspected our intention. But they waked
up, when they saw us point away our royals again, shut home our top
gallant sails, and instead of backing the main-topsail, square away
before the wind. Gun after gun was fired from both vessels, but
we were too far out of range as they lay, for the shot to hit us; and
before they could wear so as to bring their broadsides to bear upon
our stern, we were a mile and a half below them.
We were not, however, out of danger. Below us about four miles,
we saw a brig and schooner, cruising. These, hearing the firing,
and seeing us pass as we did, bore up to intercept us. To avoid
them we had to make a long stretch towards the shore, and having
the wind of them, we got by in safety, though they bowled away at
us at long shot, though without touching us. Indeed, we could not
see where their balls hit the water.
Monte Video with its fortress on its summit was now in full sight,
and soon we opened the mouth of the harbor and had a full view of
the town. I began to fear we should not get by so easily. The sound
of the firing had started three vessels from the port and we saw
them standing out. Again we had to manuvre, and try the speed
of our brig. It was however impossible to pass without going very
near one of them, and Captain Reed resolved to risk her fire. We
stood boldly for her, and acted precisely as if we were going to speak
her. Captain Reed with his trumpet in his hand, sprung into the
main rigging and took his stand with his trumpet ready as if to hail.
The fellows in the Brazilian brig were at their guns. Our royals
were dropped, and topgallant sails clewed up as before. We seemed
to them as we were dashing by, just about to round to under their
stern, when we up helm, squared the yards, and went like an eagle
on our way. In three minutes
bang bang
came the guns. Captain
Reed ordered us all to lay on our knees. The shot rattled and
whizzed
about our ears, passed through our sails and
pudded
into our
wood-work. As we were in a raking exposure, nothing but the bad
gunnery of the Brazilians saved us from being greatly damaged. As
it was, in twenty minutes we were out of reach of their shot, and
dashing
down the river at the rate of eight knots.
At sun-down the distant towers and mount of the city faded into
the haze of twilight, and in the morning we had passed Cape St.
Mary's, and were bounding over the blue ocean
homeward
.
After seventy-six days we reached Boston. The last land we had
seen had been Cape St. Rogue, and so true had been our reckoning,
that we made Cape Cod within two hours of the time in which the
Captain said we should. The sail up the harbor of islands, was most
refreshing to the eye after be long at sea. The sight of land, of green
trees, and verdant slopes, seemed to me more beautiful than any sight
I have ever beheld. Coming from the sea after a long voyage, during
which the eye has forgotten to reflect anything but the ship and the
sea, the green earth looks like a paradise. The voyager wonders he
never thought it so filled with beauty before.
I found my friends well, and very much surprised to learn the
result of my foreign mercantile expedition. When the merchants
who had been referred to were called upon, they denied all knowledge
of Bedrick's intentions, supposing that he really meant to do what
he professed to. As I had no redress, I took my experiences for my
pains and turned my attention to making my fortune in my native
country.
I had been but three months at home, when one evening a person
called at my father's who was shown into the parlor. What was my
surprise and joy at beholding Radsworth! He had tried to get
something to do after I left, but without success. He went on board
of one of the brigs of war, the sight of which was enough for him. He
was glad to get on shore again, with less lofty notions patriotic than
he had before entertained touching the affairs of the country. He soon
took passage home in a ship that left in ballast. We sat and talked
over our adventures till the `small hours' came round, and then parted.
He is now, I believe, a merchant in Calais, Maine. In a few weeks
afterwards, Hewitt returned from Monte Video, having embarked on
board an American vessel for Boston. From him we learned the rage
and fury of Bedrick at our departure, and how he informed the
Captain-general
where we had gone, who sent a gun-boat with twelve
soldiers in it after us. Fortunately for us, and perhaps for them, they
didn't overtake us. Hewitt has given up foreign travel and is now
we believe, a very successful Dr. in Bangor.
Bedrick, I have heard, had his leg shot off in an engagement under
Brown. His subsequent career is unknown to me. His brother
Edgar
was engaged in smuggling goods between Monte Video and Buenos
Ayres with his father; for the soda business did not last a great while.
Ned was way-laid and assassinated. The old gentleman still resides in
that country. Fairfax also remained there and has been a merchant of
some property. He lives on a vacienda about twenty miles from Buenos
Ayres, and is the owner of thousands of cattle. I see by the Gaceta
Mercantil, that he was lately the interpreter between General Rosas
and the American Commodore.
Thus I, Paul Perril, finish the narrative of my adventures, and with
many thanks, gentle reader, for your kind company, now take my
courteous leave of you.
END OF PAUL PERRIL.